Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB197.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.020 is amended to read as follows:
In addition to the powers and responsibilities established in Section 3 of this Act, the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education
in Kentucky] shall:
(1) Develop and implement the strategic agenda with the advice and counsel of the
Strategic Committee on Postsecondary Education. The authority[council] shall
provide for and direct the planning process and subsequent strategic implementation
plans based on the strategic agenda as provided in KRS 164.0203;
(2) Revise the strategic agenda and strategic implementation plan with the advice and
counsel of the committee as set forth in KRS 164.004;
(3) Develop a system of public accountability related to the strategic agenda by
evaluating the performance and effectiveness of the state's postsecondary system.
The authority[council] shall prepare a report in conjunction with the accountability
reporting described in KRS 164.095, which shall be submitted to the committee, the
Governor, and the General Assembly by December 1 annually. This report shall
include a description of contributions by postsecondary institutions to the quality of
elementary and secondary education in the Commonwealth;
(4) Review, revise, and approve the missions of the state's universities and the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System. The Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] shall have
the final authority to determine the compliance of postsecondary institutions with
their academic, service, and research missions;
(5) Establish and ensure that all postsecondary institutions in Kentucky cooperatively
provide for an integrated system of postsecondary education. The
authority[council] shall guard against inappropriate and unnecessary conflict and
Page 1 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
duplication by promoting transferability of credits and easy access of information
among institutions;
(6) Engage in analyses and research to determine the overall needs of postsecondary
education and adult education in the Commonwealth;
(7) Develop plans that may be required by federal legislation. The authority[council]
shall for all purposes of federal legislation relating to planning be considered the
"single state agency" as that term may be used in federal legislation. When federal
legislation requires additional representation on any "single state agency," the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall establish advisory groups necessary to satisfy federal legislative or
regulatory guidelines;
(8) (a) Determine tuition and approve the minimum qualifications for admission to
the state postsecondary educational system. In defining residency, the
authority[council] shall classify a student as having Kentucky residency if the
student met the residency requirements at the beginning of his or her last year
in high school and enters a Kentucky postsecondary education institution
within two (2) years of high school graduation. In determining the tuition for
non-Kentucky residents, the authority[council] shall consider the fees
required of Kentucky students by institutions in adjoining states, the resident
fees charged by other states, the total actual per student cost of training in the
institutions for which the fees are being determined, and the ratios of
Kentucky students to non-Kentucky students comprising the enrollments of
the respective institutions, and other factors the authority[council] may in its
sole discretion deem pertinent, except that the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System may assess a mandatory student fee not to exceed
eight dollars ($8) per credit hour to be used exclusively for debt service on
amounts not to exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the total projects cost of
Page 2 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System agency bond
projects included in 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 117, Part II, J., 11.
(b) The Kentucky Community and Technical College System mandatory fee
established in this subsection shall only be used for debt service on agency
bond projects.
(c) Any fee established as provided by this subsection shall cease to be assessed
upon the retirement of the project bonds for which it services debt.
(d) Prior to the issuance of any bonds, the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System shall certify in writing to the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet that sufficient funds have been raised to meet the
local match equivalent to twenty-five percent (25%) of the total project cost;
(9) Devise, establish, and periodically review and revise policies to be used in making
recommendations to the Governor for consideration in developing
recommendations to the General Assembly for appropriations to the universities,
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System, and to support strategies
for persons to maintain necessary levels of literacy throughout their lifetimes. The
authority[council] has sole discretion, with advice of the Strategic Committee on
Postsecondary Education and the executive officers of the postsecondary education
system, to devise policies that provide for allocation of funds among the
universities and the Kentucky Community and Technical College System;
(10) Lead and provide staff support for the biennial budget process as provided under
KRS Chapter 48, in cooperation with the committee;
(11) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, review and approve all
capital construction projects covered by KRS 45.750(1)(f), including real
property acquisitions, and regardless of the source of funding for projects or
acquisitions. Approval of capital projects and real property acquisitions shall
be on a basis consistent with the strategic agenda and the mission of the
Page 3 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
respective universities and the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System.
(b) The organized groups that are establishing community college satellites as
branches of existing community colleges in the counties of Laurel, Leslie, and
Muhlenberg, and that have substantially obtained cash, pledges, real property,
or other commitments to build the satellite at no cost to the Commonwealth,
other than operating costs that shall be paid as part of the operating budget of
the main community college of which the satellite is a branch, are authorized
to begin construction of the satellite on or after January 1, 1998;
(12) Require reports from the executive officer of each institution it deems necessary for
the effectual performance of its duties;
(13) Ensure that the state postsecondary system does not unnecessarily duplicate
services and programs provided by private postsecondary institutions and shall
promote maximum cooperation between the state postsecondary system and private
postsecondary institutions. Receive and consider an annual report prepared by the
Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities stating the
condition of independent institutions, listing opportunities for more collaboration
between the state and independent institutions and other information as appropriate;
(14) Establish course credit, transfer, and degree components as required in KRS
164.2951;
(15) Define and approve the offering of all postsecondary education technical, associate,
baccalaureate, graduate, and professional degree, certificate, or diploma programs
in the public postsecondary education institutions. The authority[council] shall
expedite wherever possible the approval of requests from the Kentucky Community
and Technical College System board of regents relating to new certificate, diploma,
technical, or associate degree programs of a vocational-technical and occupational
nature. Without the consent of the General Assembly, the authority[council] shall
Page 4 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
not abolish or limit the total enrollment of the general program offered at any
community college to meet the goal of reasonable access throughout the
Commonwealth to a two (2) year course of general studies designed for transfer to a
baccalaureate program. This does not restrict or limit the authority of the
authority[council], as set forth in this section, to eliminate or make changes in
individual programs within that general program;
(16) Eliminate, in its discretion, existing programs or make any changes in existing
academic programs at the state's postsecondary educational institutions, taking into
consideration these criteria:
(a) Consistency with the institution's mission and the strategic agenda;
(b) Alignment with the priorities in the strategic implementation plan for
achieving the strategic agenda;
(c) Elimination of unnecessary duplication of programs within and among
institutions; and
(d) Efforts to create cooperative programs with other institutions through
traditional means, or by use of distance learning technology and electronic
resources, to achieve effective and efficient program delivery;
(17) Ensure the governing board and faculty of all postsecondary education institutions
are committed to providing instruction free of discrimination against students who
hold political views and opinions contrary to those of the governing board and
faculty;
(18) Review proposals and make recommendations to the Governor regarding the
establishment of new public community colleges, technical institutions, and new
four (4) year colleges;
(19) Postpone the approval of any new program at a state postsecondary educational
institution, unless the institution has met its equal educational opportunity goals, as
established by the authority[council]. In accordance with administrative regulations
Page 5 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
promulgated by the authority[council], those institutions not meeting the goals shall
be able to obtain a temporary waiver, if the institution has made substantial progress
toward meeting its equal educational opportunity goals;
(20) Ensure the coordination, transferability, and connectivity of technology among
postsecondary institutions in the Commonwealth including the development and
implementation of a technology plan as a component of the strategic agenda;
(21) Approve the teacher education programs in the public institutions that comply with
standards established by the Education Professional Standards Board pursuant to
KRS 161.028;
(22) Constitute the representative agency of the Commonwealth in all matters of
postsecondary education of a general and statewide nature which are not otherwise
delegated to one (1) or more institutions of postsecondary learning. The
responsibility may be exercised through appropriate contractual relationships with
individuals or agencies located within or without the Commonwealth. The authority
includes but is not limited to contractual arrangements for programs of research,
specialized training, and cultural enrichment;
(23) Maintain procedures for the approval of a designated receiver to provide for the
maintenance of student records of the public institutions of higher education and the
colleges as defined in KRS 164.945, and institutions operating pursuant to KRS
165A.310 which offer collegiate level courses for academic credit, which cease to
operate. Procedures shall include assurances that, upon proper request, subject to
federal and state laws and regulations, copies of student records shall be made
available within a reasonable length of time for a minimum fee;
(24) Monitor and transmit a report on compliance with KRS 164.351 to the director of
the Legislative Research Commission for distribution to the Interim Joint
Committee on Families and Children;
(25) (a) Develop in cooperation with each public university and the Kentucky
Page 6 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Community and Technical College System a comprehensive orientation and
education program for new members of the authority[council] and the
governing boards and continuing education opportunities for all
authority[council] and board members. For new members of the
authority[council] and institutional governing boards, the authority[council]
shall:
1. Ensure that the orientation and education program comprises six (6)
hours of instruction time and includes but is not limited to information
concerning the roles of the authority[council] and governing board
members, the strategic agenda and the strategic implementation plan,
and the respective institution's mission, budget and finances, strategic
plans and priorities, institutional policies and procedures, board
fiduciary responsibilities, legal considerations including open records
and open meetings requirements, ethical considerations arising from
board membership, and the board member removal and replacement
provisions of KRS 63.080;
2. Establish delivery methods by which the orientation and education
program can be completed in person or electronically by new members
within one (1) year of their appointment or election;
3. Provide an annual report to the Governor and Legislative Research
Commission of those new board members who do not complete the
required orientation and education program; and
4. Invite governing board members of private colleges and universities
licensed by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] to participate in the
orientation and education program described in this subsection;
(b) Offer, in cooperation with the public universities and the Kentucky
Page 7 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Community and Technical College System, continuing education
opportunities for all authority[council] and governing board members; and
(c) Review and approve the orientation programs of each public university and
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System for their governing
board members to ensure that all programs and information adhere to this
subsection;
(26) Develop a financial reporting procedure to be used by all state postsecondary
education institutions to ensure uniformity of financial information available to
state agencies and the public;
(27) Select and appoint an[a] executive director[president] of the authority[council]
under KRS 164.013;
(28) Employ consultants and other persons and employees as may be required for the
authority's[council's] operations, functions, and responsibilities;
(29) Promulgate administrative regulations, in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A,
governing its powers, duties, and responsibilities as described in this section;
(30) Prepare and present by January 31 of each year an annual status report on
postsecondary education in the Commonwealth to the Governor, the Strategic
Committee on Postsecondary Education, and the Legislative Research Commission;
(31) Consider the role, function, and capacity of independent institutions of
postsecondary education in developing policies to meet the immediate and future
needs of the state. When it is found that independent institutions can meet state
needs effectively, state resources may be used to contract with or otherwise assist
independent institutions in meeting these needs;
(32) Create advisory groups representing the presidents, faculty, nonteaching staff, and
students of the public postsecondary education system and the independent colleges
and universities;
(33) Develop a statewide policy to promote employee and faculty development in state
Page 8 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
and locally operated secondary area technology centers through the waiver of
tuition for college credit coursework in the public postsecondary education system.
Any regular full-time employee of a state or locally operated secondary area
technology center may, with prior administrative approval of the course offering
institution, take a maximum of six (6) credit hours per term at any public
postsecondary institution. The institution shall waive the tuition up to a maximum
of six (6) credit hours per term. The employee shall complete the Free Application
for Federal Student Aid to determine the level of need and eligibility for state and
federal financial aid programs. The amount of tuition waived shall not exceed the
cost of tuition at the institution less any state or federal grants received, which shall
be credited first to the student's tuition;
(34) Participate with the Kentucky Department of Education, the Kentucky Board of
Education, and postsecondary education institutions to ensure that academic content
requirements for successful entry into postsecondary education programs are
aligned with high school content standards and that students who master the high
school academic content standards shall not need remedial courses. The
authority[council] shall monitor the results on an ongoing basis;
(35) Cooperate with the Kentucky Department of Education and the Education
Professional Standards Board in providing information sessions to selected
postsecondary education content faculty and teacher educators of the high school
academic content standards as required under KRS 158.6453(2)(l);
(36) Cooperate with the Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics and ensure the
participation of the public institutions as required in KRS 151B.133;
(37) Pursuant to KRS 63.080, review written notices from the Governor or from a board
of trustees or board of regents concerning removal of a board member or the entire
appointed membership of a board, investigate the member or board and the conduct
alleged to support removal, and make written recommendations to the Governor
Page 9 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
and the Legislative Research Commission as to whether the member or board
should be removed; and
(38) Exercise any other powers, duties, and responsibilities necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to grant the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] power[authority] to disestablish or eliminate any college of law which
became a part of the state system of higher education through merger with a state
college.
Section 2. KRS 164.746 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The authority shall be governed, all of its powers shall be exercised, and its duties
and functions shall be performed by a board of directors.
(a) Voting members of the board shall consist of ten (10) members who shall be
appointed from the general public residing in the Commonwealth of Kentucky
by the Governor from nominees submitted by the Governor's Postsecondary
Education Nominating Committee under KRS 164.005.
(b) Additionally, there shall be three (3) student members.
1. One (1) member shall be enrolled as a full-time undergraduate student
at a public postsecondary institution.
2. One (1) member shall be enrolled as a full-time graduate student at a
public postsecondary institution.
3. One (1) member shall be enrolled as a full-time student at a private
postsecondary institution.
4. The student members shall be selected annually. No later than June 1
of each year, the eight (8) student body presidents of the four (4) year
state public institutions of higher education, the two (2) student
members to the Kentucky Community and Technical College System,
and one (1) student body president representing the members of the
Page 10 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities shall
elect by majority vote three (3) nominees to submit to the Governor for
each member position under this paragraph. From these lists of
nominees, the Governor shall appoint the three student members.
(c) In addition, [the president of the Council on Postsecondary Education, ]the
president of the Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and
Universities, the State Treasurer, the commissioner of education, and the
secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or their designees who
shall be another official of the same cabinet or agency, shall serve as voting
ex officio members.
(d)[(c)] The term of office of appointed members under paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall be four (4) years. Each member shall serve for the term for
which he or she is appointed and shall serve until his or her successor is
appointed.
(2) Appointments to fill vacancies on the board shall be made in the same manner as
regular appointments. The person appointed shall hold the position for the
unexpired portion of the term only.
(3) The board shall elect from its voting membership a chair, chair-elect, and secretary-
treasurer who shall each serve for a term of one (1) year. At the conclusion of the
chair's term of office, the chair-elect shall become the chair for the succeeding year
and the board shall elect from its voting membership a new chair-elect.
(4) Board members, except officers or employees of the state, shall receive
compensation for their services, in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per
day, and may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties under KRS 164.740 to 164.785.
(5) The board shall provide for the holding of regular meetings and special meetings.
(a) A majority of the voting members shall constitute a quorum for the
Page 11 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
transaction of any business, special meetings shall be called by the chair in
accordance with KRS 61.823, and either the chair or the chair-elect shall be
present for the transaction of any business.
(b) In lieu of personal attendance by members of the board at the same location,
the board may conduct meetings by teleconference or other available
technological means suitable for conducting its business. Meetings of the
board shall be open and accessible to the public in accordance with KRS
61.805 to 61.850, and any alternate method of conducting a meeting in lieu of
personal attendance shall ensure public access.
(6) The board shall adopt bylaws and policies governing its internal affairs and the
conduct of its business, and shall adopt administrative regulations pursuant to KRS
Chapter 13A, not inconsistent with law, in connection with the administration of the
authority's programs and the performance of its functions and duties.
(7) The board may:
(a) Appoint such officers and employees as necessary and may fix their
compensation, and shall prescribe their duties notwithstanding personnel
limits established by KRS 18A.010 or the biennial budget and its related
documents; and
(b) Adopt the provisions of KRS 45A.345 to 45A.460, pursuant to KRS 45A.343.
Section 3. KRS 164.748 is amended to read as follows:
The board shall have the following powers, functions, and duties:
(1) To provide loan guarantees, upon terms and conditions the board may prescribe
within the limitations provided by KRS 164.740 to 164.770, and the federal act in
respect of loans to eligible borrowers. The board may require additional security,
including endorsers it deems necessary and desirable and is not in contravention of
the federal act. The purpose of the loans shall be to assist individuals in meeting the
expense of their education.
Page 12 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(2) To enter into agreements and undertakings with the secretary as may be required
and necessary pursuant to the federal act in order to constitute the authority as a
state agency qualified and empowered to insure student loans within the meaning of
the federal act and to qualify insured student loans for interest payments,
reimbursement, reinsurance, and other benefits available under the federal act to the
authority.
(3) To issue loan guarantees in respect of loans made to eligible borrowers by
participating lenders, including the authority. No loan guarantee shall be issued,
executed, and delivered by the authority unless any insured student loan resulting
shall be the subject of agreements pursuant to the federal act by which the insured
student loan is made the subject of interest payments, reimbursements, reinsurance,
and other benefits to the extent provided by the federal act.
(4) To promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A pertaining
to insured student loans, loan guarantees, loans, and work-study payments and the
awarding of grants, scholarships, and honorary scholarships, as provided in KRS
164.740 to 164.7891.
(5) To enter into contracts with eligible lenders, approved by the state to lend moneys,
upon terms and conditions agreed upon between the authority and the eligible
lender, to provide for the administration of student financial assistance programs,
including, but not by way of limitation, the authority's program of insured student
loans.
(6) To enter into contracts with eligible institutions, upon terms and conditions agreed
upon between the authority and the eligible institution, to provide for the
administration of student financial assistance programs, including, but not by way
of limitation, the authority's program of insured student loans.
(7) To receive funds from any source, public or private, by gift, grant, bequest, loan, or
otherwise, either absolutely or in trust, and to expend them, on behalf of the
Page 13 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
authority and for any of its purposes; and to acquire from any source, public or
private, by purchase, lease, gift, bequest, or devise, any property, real, personal, or
mixed, absolutely or in trust, and to hold, administer, and dispose of it, on behalf of
the authority and for any of its purposes. The authority shall not make its debts
payable out of any funds except those of the authority.
(8) To administer federal funds allotted to the state in respect of insured student loans,
loan guarantees, loans, work-study, grants, scholarships, administrative costs, and
related matters.
(9) To sue and be sued in the name of the authority and to plead and be impleaded, and
to purchase, on behalf of members of the board or officers and employees of the
authority, liability insurance for individual protection from liability for acts and
omissions committed in the course and scope of the individual's employment or
service.
(10) To collect from individual borrowers loans made by the authority and insured
student loans on which the authority has been compelled to meet its loan guarantee
obligations following the inability of the participating lender involved to collect the
insured student loans.
(11) To gather information on all loans, scholarships, honorary scholarships, grants, and
work-study opportunities available to Kentucky residents attending or planning to
attend an eligible institution and to disseminate the information through the
methods of mass communication necessary to ensure that Kentucky residents are
aware of financial resources available to those attending or desiring to attend an
eligible institution.
(12) To request reports from each eligible institution or eligible lender necessary for the
effective performance of its duties and to publish the information it deems
necessary.
(13) To approve, disapprove, limit, suspend, or terminate the participation of, or take
Page 14 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
emergency action to withhold authority funds and insured student loans from
eligible institutions or eligible lenders in programs administered by the board,
subject to the provisions of the federal act and this chapter.
(14) To perform other acts necessary or appropriate to carry out effectively the purposes
of the authority as provided by KRS Chapters 164 and 164A[164.740 to 164.7891
and KRS 164A.010 to 164A.380].
(15) If any conflict exists between KRS 164.740 to 164.770 and the federal act, which
conflict would result in a loss by the authority of any federal funds, including, but
not by way of limitation, federal funds made available to the authority under the
federal act, including interest payments and reimbursement for insured student
loans in default, to promulgate regulations and policies consistent with the federal
act not in derogation of the Constitution and general laws of the Commonwealth.
(16) Except where specifically prohibited by law, to secure data from any other
Commonwealth of Kentucky agency or instrumentality or from any other source in
furtherance of any purposes of the authority related to any program or function
administered by the authority.
(17) To enter into contracts with public or private nonprofit agencies, eligible to hold or
insure student loans under the federal act, to provide for the exchange of
information, not in contravention of any federal or state law, or the provision of
services necessary to the administration of the authority's insured student loan
programs.
(18) To enter into contracts with the Kentucky Higher Education Student Loan
Corporation, the Kentucky Educational Savings Plan Trust, and the Commonwealth
postsecondary education prepaid tuition trust fund as necessary or appropriate to
facilitate their common administration, operation, and management, as required
pursuant to KRS Chapter 164A.
(19) To act as the board of directors of the Commonwealth postsecondary education
Page 15 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
prepaid tuition trust fund under KRS 164A.700 to 164A.709.
(20) To conduct, in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, administrative hearings
pertaining to any adverse action by the authority affecting participating institutions
and lenders, eligible students, and borrowers of loans made by the authority and
insured student loans guaranteed by the authority. Wage garnishment hearings and
administrative review procedures pertaining to disputes concerning setoff of federal
tax refunds shall be exempt under KRS 13B.020 and shall be conducted in
accordance with applicable federal law. In an exempt hearing, the board or a
hearing officer designated by the board may issue administrative subpoenas for the
attendance of witnesses and the production of documents relevant to the issues in
dispute. Compliance with the subpoenas shall be enforceable by a court of
competent jurisdiction.
(21) To provide upon termination of the retirement plan authorized by Executive Order
75-964 to active and retired employees of the authority who participated in that
plan, health insurance premiums and disability insurance benefits as provided to
employees who participate in a state-administered retirement system pursuant to
KRS 18A.225 to 18A.229, 61.600, and 61.702.
(22) To delegate to the executive director general supervision and direction over the
administrative function of the authority and its employees in carrying out the
policies, programs, administrative regulations, and directives of the board. The
executive director shall be selected pursuant to Section 4 of this Act.
Section 4. KRS 164.013 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall set the qualifications for the position of executive
director[president of the council]. [Except for the first president appointed under
subsection (2) of this section, ]The authority[council] may employ a search firm
and conduct a nationwide search for candidates. Any search firm employed by the
Page 16 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
authority[council] shall consider, interview, and propose three (3) or more
candidates for the position of executive director[president]. The authority[council]
may seek additional names from the search firm or from other sources.
(2) [In the selection of candidates for the first president of the Council on
Postsecondary Education, the Strategic Committee on Postsecondary Education
shall serve as a search committee, employing a search firm for assistance. The
committee shall recommend three (3) candidates to be considered by the council
and shall repeat this process until it finds a satisfactory person to appoint as the first
president of the council.
(3) ]The executive director[president] shall possess an excellent academic and
administrative background, have strong communication skills, have significant
experience and an established reputation as a professional in the field of
postsecondary education and student financial aid, and shall not express,
demonstrate, or appear to have an institutional or regional bias in his or her actions.
(4) The executive director[president] shall be the primary advocate for postsecondary
education and advisor to the Governor and the General Assembly on matters of
postsecondary education in Kentucky. As the primary advocate for postsecondary
education, the executive director[president] shall work closely with the committee
and the elected leadership of the Commonwealth to ensure that they are fully
informed about postsecondary education issues and that the authority[council] fully
understands the goals for postsecondary education that the General Assembly has
established in KRS 164.003(2).
(5) The executive director[president] may design and develop for review by the
authority[council] new statewide initiatives in accordance with the strategic
agenda.
(6) [(a) The council shall set the salary of the president at an amount no greater than
the salary the president was receiving on January 1, 2012.
Page 17 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(b) ]The salary of the executive director[president] shall be exempt from state
employee salary limitations as set forth in KRS 64.640.
(7) The executive director[president] shall be accorded a contract to serve for a term
not to exceed five (5) years, which is renewable at the pleasure of the
authority[council].
(8) The executive director[president] shall determine the staffing positions and
organizational structure necessary to carry out the responsibilities of the
authority[council] and may employ staff.[ All personnel positions of the Council on
Higher Education, as of May 30, 1997, with the exception of the position of
executive director, shall be transferred to the Council on Postsecondary Education.
All personnel shall be transferred at the same salary and benefit levels.
Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 11A.040, any person employed by the
Council on Higher Education prior to May 30, 1997, may accept immediate
employment with any governmental entity or any postsecondary education
organization or institution in the Commonwealth and may carry out the
employment duties assigned by that entity, organization, or institution.]
(9) The executive director[president] shall be responsible for the day-to-day operations
of the authority[council] and shall report and submit annual reports on the strategic
implementation plan of the strategic agenda, carry out policy and program
directives of the authority[council], prepare and submit to the authority[council]
for its approval the proposed budget of the authority[council], and perform all other
duties and responsibilities assigned by state law.
(10) With approval of the authority[council], the executive director[president] may
enter into agreements with any state agency or political subdivision of the state, any
state postsecondary education institution, or any other person or entity to enlist staff
assistance to implement the duties and responsibilities under KRS 164.020.
(11) The executive director[president] shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary
Page 18 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
expenses incurred in the performance of all assigned duties and responsibilities.
Section 5. KRS 164.001 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Administrator" means the chief executive officer of the institution;
(2) "Adult basic education" means instruction in mathematics, science, social studies,
reading, language arts, and related areas to enable individuals to better function in
society;
(3) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(4) "Benchmarks" means objective measures developed where applicable or practical
by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] to judge the performance of the postsecondary education
system and progress toward the goals as stated in KRS 164.003(2);
(5)[(4)] "Board" or "governing board" means the board of trustees for the University
of Kentucky or the University of Louisville, the board of regents for a
comprehensive university, or the board of regents for the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System;
(6)[(5)] "Board of regents" means the governing board of each comprehensive
university and the Kentucky Community and Technical College System;
(7)[(6)] "Committee" means the Strategic Committee on Postsecondary Education
created in KRS 164.004;
(8)[(7)] "Comprehensive university" means the following public institutions: Eastern
Kentucky University, Kentucky State University, Morehead State University,
Murray State University, Northern Kentucky University, and Western Kentucky
University;[
(8) "Council" means the Council on Postsecondary Education created in KRS
164.011;]
(9) "Customized training" means training in specific academic areas, work processes,
Page 19 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
or technical skills that are designed to serve a specific industry or industries to
upgrade worker skills;
(10) "Goals" means the six (6) goals specified in KRS 164.003(2);
(11) "Independent institution" means a nonpublic postsecondary education institution in
Kentucky whose instruction is not solely sectarian in nature, is accredited by a
regional accrediting association recognized by the United States Department of
Education, and is licensed by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education];
(12) "Institution" means a university, college, community college, health technology
center, vocational-technical school, technical institute, technical college, technology
center, or the Kentucky Community and Technical College System;
(13) "Kentucky Community and Technical College System" means the system
composed of public community and technical colleges, including those
postsecondary institutions operated by the former Cabinet for Workforce
Development and those community colleges in the University of Kentucky
Community College System on May 30, 1997.
The system also includes institutions created by the board of regents for the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System and approved by the General
Assembly;
(14) "Literacy" means an individual's ability to read, write, and speak in English and
compute and solve problems at levels of proficiency necessary to function on the
job and in society to achieve one's goals and develop one's knowledge and
potential;
(15) "Lower division academic course" means any academic course offered for college
or university credit that is designated as a freshman or sophomore level academic
course;
(16) "Nonteaching personnel" means any employee who is a full-time staff member,
Page 20 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
excluding a president, chancellor, vice president, academic dean, academic
department chair, or administrator;
(17) "Postsecondary education system" means the following public institutions:
University of Kentucky, University of Louisville, Eastern Kentucky University,
Kentucky State University, Morehead State University, Murray State University,
Northern Kentucky University, Western Kentucky University, and the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System;
(18) "P-16 council" or "council of partners" means a local or state council that is
composed of educators from public and private preschools, elementary, secondary,
and postsecondary education institutions, local board of education members, and
may include community and business representatives that have voluntarily
organized themselves for the purpose of improving the alignment and quality of the
education continuum from preschool through postsecondary education as well as
student achievement at all levels;
(19) "Public" means operated with state support;
(20) "Relative" means a person's father, mother, brother, sister, husband, wife, son,
daughter, aunt, uncle, son-in-law, or daughter-in-law;
(21) "Remedial education" means any program, course, or activity that is designed
specifically for students who have basic deficiencies in reading, written or oral
communication, mathematics, study skills, or other skills necessary to do beginning
postsecondary work as defined by the institution;
(22) "Standardized degree program" means a program, approved by the Kentucky
Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], that
consists of specific competencies, curriculum, and performance requirements
regardless of the providing institution;
(23) "Strategic agenda" means the state strategic postsecondary education agenda
described in KRS 164.0203;
Page 21 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(24) "Technical institution" means an educational institution that offers certificates,
diplomas, or technical degrees in technical or occupational-related programs,
including a facility called a vocational-technical school, technical institute, health
technology center, technology center, technical college, or similar designation; and
(25) "Learning outcomes" means the knowledge, skills, and abilities that students have
attained as a result of their involvement in a particular set of educational
experiences.
Section 6. KRS 164.004 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Strategic Committee on Postsecondary Education is hereby created and
established. The committee shall be composed of members appointed by the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education], the Governor, and the General Assembly. The authority's[council's]
representatives shall consist of the chair of the authority board of
directors[council], the executive director[president] of the authority[council], and
five (5) members of the authority[council] designated by the chair. The Governor's
representatives shall consist of the Governor and six (6) persons designated by the
Governor. The General Assembly's representatives shall consist of the President of
the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Majority and Minority
Floor Leaders of both chambers of the General Assembly, the minority caucus chair
of each chamber, a member appointed by the President of the Senate, a member
appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, a member appointed by
the Minority Floor Leader of the Senate, a member appointed by the Minority Floor
Leader of the House of Representatives, and the chair of the Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue of each chamber.
(2) The chair of the authority board of directors[council] shall serve as chair of the
committee. The committee shall meet at least quarterly and at other times upon the
written call of the chair or of majorities of any two (2) of the three (3) groups that
Page 22 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
compose the committee.
(3) Nonlegislative members of the committee shall serve without compensation but
shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses, as set forth in KRS
12.070(5). Committee members who are Kentucky legislators shall be compensated
for attendance at committee meetings from the legislative branch budget bill and as
set forth in KRS 6.190.
(4) The committee shall serve as a forum for the authority[council] and the elected
leadership of the Commonwealth to exchange ideas about the future of
postsecondary education in Kentucky.
(5) The authority[council] shall periodically review its strategic implementation plan
for the strategic agenda under KRS 164.0203 and advise the committee of the
actions necessary to meet the goals established in KRS 164.003(2). The elected
leaders shall review and comment on the strategic agenda and the timetable for
implementation.
(6) The Governor shall advise the committee about the financial condition of the
Commonwealth and the probable funds the executive branch intends to recommend
to the General Assembly to be appropriated for postsecondary education.
(7) The legislative members shall react to the comments of the authority[council] and
the Governor.
(8) The authority[council] shall advise the committee about its opinion of how the
postsecondary education funds projected to be available should be allocated based
on priorities and projected resources. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
infringe upon the Governor's duty under KRS 48.100 to recommend appropriations
to the General Assembly or upon the General Assembly's power to make final
appropriations in the enacted budget.
(9) The committee shall have the advisory authority not explicitly prohibited by law
that is necessary to carry out and effectuate its advisory functions, duties, and
Page 23 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
responsibilities, including the following:
(a) Receive reports from the authority[council] on the development and
implementation of the long-term strategic agenda, including biennial budget
requests for postsecondary education and any subsequent and related budget
requests;
(b) Review the authority's[council's] proposed objectives and benchmarks for the
next fiscal biennium for furthering the Commonwealth's achievement of the
goals set out in KRS 164.003(2);
(c) Consider and advise the authority[council] on the general budget parameters
regarding development of the postsecondary budget for the next fiscal
biennium;
(d) Review biennial budget requests from the authority[council] for the next
fiscal biennium including base funding, increases in base funding, and
funding for a strategic investment and incentive funding program, including
criteria to be used in allocating these funds to institutions; and
(e) Receive from the authority[council], at least annually and on a more frequent
basis if requested by the committee, accountability reports, budget
information, and other information the committee deems proper[; and
(f) Serve as the search committee for the review and consideration of candidates
to be presented to the council for the initial appointment to the position of
president of the Council on Postsecondary Education. Each group of the
committee shall have one (1) vote on the search committee. The vote of each
group shall be determined by a majority of the members of that group].
Section 7. KRS 164.005 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is established the Governor's Postsecondary Education Nominating
Committee which shall consist of seven (7) members representing each of the
Supreme Court districts who shall be appointed by the Governor with the consent of
Page 24 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
the House of Representatives and the Senate. If the General Assembly is not in
session at the time of appointment, the consent of the General Assembly shall be
obtained during the time the General Assembly next convenes.
(2) (a) In order to be eligible to serve on the Governor's Postsecondary Education
Nominating Committee, a member at the time of appointment shall have no
conflict of interest pursuant to KRS 45A.340. In addition, no member shall
have a relative employed by a public postsecondary institution[, the Council
on Postsecondary Education], the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority, the Kentucky Higher Education Student Loan Corporation, or the
Kentucky Authority for Educational Television during his or her tenure on the
committee. No more than two (2) persons holding an undergraduate degree
from the same institution of higher education shall be members of the
committee.
(b) The Governor shall make the appointments so as to reflect, inasmuch as
possible, equal representation of the two (2) sexes and no less than
proportional representation of the two (2) leading political parties of the
Commonwealth based on the state's voter registration and to assure that
appointments reflect the minority racial composition of the Commonwealth.
In filling vacancies to the committee, the Governor shall act so as to provide,
inasmuch as possible, equal representation of the two (2) sexes by appointing
a member of the sex that is the lesser represented at the time of the
appointment. If the remaining membership already has an equal number of
males and females, the Governor may appoint a member of either sex.
(c) In selecting the members of the committee, the Governor shall solicit
recommendations from each of the following:
1. Advisory Conference of Presidents;
2. Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Page 25 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Postsecondary Education] Student Advisory Committee;
3. Associations representing faculty from universities, technical
institutions, and community colleges;
4. Associations representing university, technical institutions, and
community college alumni;
5. Postsecondary education advocacy groups;
6. The Kentucky Board of Education;
7. Associations representing business and civic interests; and
8. Associations representing independent, nonprofit colleges and
universities.
(3) (a) Members of the committee representing Supreme Court districts shall serve
six (6) year terms and until a successor is appointed, except the initial
appointments shall be as follows:
1. Two (2) members shall serve a two (2) year term;
2. Two (2) members shall serve a four (4) year term; and
3. Three (3) members shall serve a six (6) year term.
(b) The terms of the original appointees shall expire on April 14 in the year
designated for the term, and the terms of each member appointed thereafter
shall begin on April 15. Appointments shall be submitted to the Senate and to
the House of Representatives for confirmation by February 1 in each year that
a regular session of the General Assembly convenes. Each appointment shall
be consented to by both chambers in order for the person to be confirmed. At
the first regular meeting of the committee each fiscal year, a chairperson shall
be selected by the membership.
(4) The members of the committee may be reimbursed for actual and necessary
expenditures incurred in the performance of their duties. The expenses of the
committee shall be paid out of the appropriation for the Governor's office.
Page 26 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(5) (a) The committee shall be responsible for submitting three (3) nominations from
which the Governor shall select each gubernatorial appointment to a
university or Kentucky Community and Technical College System governing
board made pursuant to KRS 164.131, 164.321, and 164.821[ and to the
Council on Postsecondary Education pursuant to KRS 164.011]. The
committee shall not make recommendations for alumni, faculty, and staff
appointments made pursuant to KRS 164.131 and 164.821 and the student
appointments made pursuant to KRS 164.131, 164.321, and 164.821. If more
than one (1) equivalent gubernatorial appointment is being made to a
governing board[ or the Council on Postsecondary Education] at the same
time, the committee shall submit a number of nominees equal to three (3)
times the number of vacancies. The committee shall provide to the Governor,
inasmuch as possible, an equal number of male and female nominees. If the
Governor needs nominees of a particular sex in order to make an appointment,
the committee shall only provide nominees of that sex. The Governor shall
select the appointees from among the nominees.
(b) The committee shall be responsible for submitting three (3) nominations from
which the Governor shall select each gubernatorial appointment to the
Kentucky Authority for Educational Television made pursuant to KRS
168.040, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority pursuant to
KRS 164.746, and the Kentucky Higher Education Student Loan Corporation
pursuant to KRS 164A.050. If more than one (1) appointment is being made
at the same time, the committee shall submit a number of nominees equal to
three (3) times the number of vacancies. The Governor shall select the
appointees from among the nominees.
(c) Nominations shall be made thirty (30) days prior to the expiration of a term or
as soon as practicable following an unforeseen vacancy. The Governor shall
Page 27 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
make the appointment within sixty (60) days following receipt of the
nominations. If the Governor does not make the appointment within sixty (60)
days, the committee shall select one (1) of the nominees to serve.
(6) In making its nominations, the committee shall consider the needs of the respective
institutions, locate potential appointees, review candidates' qualifications and
references, conduct interviews, and carry out other search and screening activities
as necessary.
(7) The Governor's office staff shall provide support services for the committee.
Section 8. KRS 164.0053 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No appointing authority shall appoint himself or herself or his or her spouse, or the
Governor or his or her spouse, to a governing board of a postsecondary institution
created pursuant to KRS 164.131, 164.321, or 164.821, or to the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education created
pursuant to KRS 164.011].
(2) No full-time employee of a public institution of postsecondary education shall be
eligible to serve on the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council
on Postsecondary Education] or on the governing board of another institution of
postsecondary education, except the community and technical college faculty and
nonteaching personnel serving on the board of regents for the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System[, and except the faculty member
appointed under KRS 164.011(3)].
(3) No postsecondary institution shall award an honorary degree to a sitting governor.
(4) All governing board members created pursuant to KRS 164.131, 164.321, and
164.821 and the members of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] shall have no conflict of interest
pursuant to KRS 45A.340, except for compensation paid to faculty, staff, or student
members.
Page 28 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Section 9. KRS 164.0203 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall adopt a strategic agenda that identifies specific short-term
objectives in furtherance of the long-term goals established in KRS 164.003(2).
(2) (a) The purpose of the strategic agenda is to further the public purposes under
KRS 164.003 by creating high-quality, relevant, postsecondary education and
adult education opportunities in the Commonwealth. The strategic agenda
shall:
1. Serve as the public agenda for postsecondary education and adult
education for the citizens of the Commonwealth, providing statewide
priorities and a vision for long-term economic growth;
2. State those important issues and aspirations of the Commonwealth's
students, employers, and workforce reflecting high expectations for their
performance and the performance of the educational institutions and
providers that serve them; and
3. Sustain a long-term commitment for constant improvement, while
valuing market-driven responsiveness, accountability to the public,
technology-based strategies, and incentive-based motivation.
(b) The authority[council] shall develop a strategic implementation plan, which
may be periodically revised, to achieve the strategic agenda. The strategic
agenda shall serve as a guide for institutional plans and missions.
(3) The framework for the strategic implementation plan of the strategic agenda shall
include the following elements:
(a) A mission statement;
(b) Goals;
(c) Principles;
(d) Strategies and objectives;
Page 29 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(e) Benchmarks; and
(f) Incentives to achieve desired results.
(4) The implementation plan for the strategic agenda shall take into consideration the
value to society of a quality liberal arts education and the needs and concerns of
Kentucky's employers.
(5) The authority[council] shall develop benchmarks using criteria that shall include
but not be limited to:
(a) Use of the statistical information commonly provided by governmental and
regulatory agencies or specific data gathered by authorization of the
authority[council];
(b) Comparison of regions and areas within the Commonwealth and comparisons
of the Commonwealth to other states and the nation; and
(c) Measures of educational attainment, effectiveness, and efficiency, including
but not limited to those set forth in KRS 164.095.
(6) The authority[council] shall review the goals established by KRS 164.003(2) at
least every four (4) years and shall review its implementation plan at least every
two (2) years.
(7) In developing the strategic agenda, the authority[council] shall actively seek input
from the Department of Education and local school districts to create necessary
linkages to assure a smooth and effective transition for students from the
elementary and secondary education system to the postsecondary education system.
Upon completion of the strategic agenda and strategic implementation plan, the
authority[council] shall distribute copies to each local school district.
(8) The strategic agenda shall include a long-term strategy, developed in partnership
with the Office of Adult Education, for raising the knowledge and skills of
Kentucky's adult population, and ensuring lifelong learning opportunities for all
Kentucky adults, drawing on the resources of all state government cabinets and
Page 30 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
agencies, business and civic leadership, and voluntary organizations.
Section 10. KRS 164.0205 is amended to read as follows:
The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education in Kentucky] shall promote, support, and assist in the program created in KRS
158.798 by:
(1) Identifying college students who have a superior academic aptitude or achievement
in math, science, and technology related course work to participate in this program;
(2) Educating higher education institutions as to the availability of this program and
encouraging participation by administrators, faculty, and students;
(3) Establishing liaison and assisting in the coordination of any specific program
component which involves college-level internships, scholarships, or career
development.
Section 11. KRS 164.0206 is amended to read as follows:
A public postsecondary education institution with a degree program in speech-language
pathology and a teacher education program, under the direction of the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], and in
consultation with the Education Professional Standards Board and the Kentucky Board of
Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology, shall:
(1) Align the programs of studies for speech-language pathology and teacher education
to permit a student to successfully prepare for licensure as a speech-language
pathology assistant and certification as a bachelor's level teacher of exceptional
children/communication disorders;
(2) Increase the number of qualified students accepted into programs leading to
licensure as a speech-language pathologist or speech-language pathology assistant
and certification as a teacher of exceptional children/communication disorders,
subject to:
(a) Requirements for program certification by national certifying bodies,
Page 31 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
including, but not limited to, student to faculty ratios;
(b) The strategic plans of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] and the postsecondary
education institution; and
(c) The budgetary considerations of the postsecondary education institution.
(3) Provide expanded opportunities for speech-language pathology assistants working
in public schools to pursue licensure as a speech-language pathologist and
certification as a teacher of exceptional children/communication disorders, which
may include:
(a) Expanded opportunities for admission to on-campus programs;
(b) The development and expansion of distance learning opportunities in
collaboration with the Kentucky Commonwealth Virtual University; and
(c) Admissions requirements that take into account successful professional
experience as a speech-language pathology assistant in lieu of other
admissions requirements.
Section 12. KRS 164.021 is amended to read as follows:
The president or chief executive officer of each four (4) year state institution of higher
learning, the president of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System, and
the president of the Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities shall
serve on an advisory conference for the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education]. The Advisory Conference of Presidents
will receive the full agenda for each meeting of the authority[council] a reasonable time
prior to the authority[council] meeting and, in the event of viewpoints differing from the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education], an elected spokesperson for the conference may meet with the
authority[council] and the executive committee to present before the authority[council]
the institutional positions on such issues. At least once each year the Kentucky Higher
Page 32 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] will meet with the
Advisory Conference of Presidents.
Section 13. KRS 164.0211 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The student body president of each four (4) year public university, the two (2)
student regents to be designated by the board of regents of the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System, and one (1) student body president
representing the members of the Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and
Universities shall serve on an advisory board to be known as the Board of Student
Body Presidents. The student body president representing the independent colleges
and universities shall be selected under a process established by the Association of
Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities.
(2) The Board of Student Body Presidents shall advise the legislative and executive
branches regarding postsecondary education issues and concerns of students.
(3) At least once each year, the Board of Student Body Presidents shall meet with the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] and the Advisory Conference of Presidents.
(4) The Board of Student Body Presidents shall submit the names of three (3) nominees
to the Governor for consideration in the appointment of [a ]student
members[member] to the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority as
required under Section 2 of this Act[Council on Postsecondary Education pursuant
to KRS 164.011].
Section 14. KRS 164.027 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall have authority to provide for a program of occupational
qualification development in the Commonwealth. The program may be provided for
by contract with any recognized and accredited municipal junior college located
within the Commonwealth. The contract shall provide that the college shall admit to
Page 33 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
its course of instruction, up to such percentage of its full teaching capacity as may
be fixed by contract, residents of the Commonwealth who make application to
pursue the course of study of the college; provided, however, that the persons shall
be classified as residents according to authority[council] administrative regulations
and shall be eligible for admissions to the junior college.
(2) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall pay to the college not more than two hundred dollars ($200) per
school year for each student enrolled. The payments shall be additional to the
annual tuition fees paid by each student. The authority[council] shall have
power[authority] to provide by contract that it pay the expense of specific research
projects or programs conducted by the college. The authority[council] shall make
an annual report of its occupational qualification development program after June
30 of each year, including an accounting of all moneys received and disbursed. The
authority[council] shall have no power[authority] to incur any obligation in excess
of the sums that have been appropriated to it.
Section 15. KRS 164.028 is amended to read as follows:
There shall be established in the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] an Office of Professional Education
Preparation Programs. The office shall have as its principal responsibility the
coordination, development, and implementation, through appropriate means, of
educational activities directed toward solving the problem of professional manpower
distribution in the Commonwealth. For the purposes of KRS 164.028 to 164.029, the
words "profession" and "professional" mean medicine and dentistry.
Section 16. KRS 164.0282 is amended to read as follows:
The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall:
(1) Employ a director and sufficient staff to administer the professional education
Page 34 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
preparation programs;
(2) Formulate guidelines and policies governing program activities and fund
expenditures;
(3) Allocate funds to appropriate agencies, organizations, and institutions for the
purpose of conducting activities approved in accordance with guidelines and
policies;
(4) Recognize regional groups made up of professionals, educators, and consumers,
which shall serve in an advisory capacity to the authority[council] in accordance
with guidelines and policies;
(5) Recognize a group made up of professionals, educators, and consumers which shall
serve in an advisory capacity to the authority[council] on all program matters;
(6) Develop and maintain a mechanism for evaluating the impact of the program
activities on admissions to, and graduation from, professional schools, and on
professional manpower distribution;
(7) Conduct specific program activities which are beyond the capability of a single
institution, agency, or organization, or when it is determined that it would be
inappropriate for such institutions, agencies, or organizations to conduct the
activity;
(8) Establish liaison with and provide assistance to the Kentucky Board of Education in
developing counseling and other related programs to encourage students from
shortage areas to prepare for professional careers;
(9) Coordinate the development of a financial support system to enable potential
professional students in underserved areas which will enhance their ability to apply
for, be admitted to, and graduate from professional education programs;
(10) Report at least annually to the appropriate committees and interim committees of
the General Assembly on the operation of the program.
Section 17. KRS 164.0284 is amended to read as follows:
Page 35 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(1) In order to help prospective students make more informed decisions about their
futures and ensure that they are adequately aware of the cost of college and other
career paths, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] shall compile on an annual basis the following
information:
(a) The most in-demand jobs in the state along with the starting salary, the
median salary, and the typical education level for those jobs;
(b) For the University of Kentucky, the University of Louisville, each
comprehensive university, and each college within the Kentucky Community
and Technical College System:
1. The average cost;
2. The average three (3) year student loan default rate;
3. The average student loan debt for students who have attended the
institution;
4. The percentage of students taking out student loans;
5. The average graduation rate and average time to completion;
6. The number of students completing high school credential programs and
career and technical education programs, and, as available, the number
of students completing apprenticeship programs; and
7. The median and range of starting salaries for graduates; and
(c) For each college within the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System, the percentage of students employed by program area and, as data
becomes available, the rate of students gainfully employed in the recognized
occupation for which the student was trained or in a related comparable
recognized occupation.
(2) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall maintain and ensure access to the information by prospective
Page 36 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
students in the state. The authority[council] shall work with the Kentucky Center
for Statistics, the Kentucky Department of Education, and the Education and Labor
Cabinet, [and the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority ]and other
stakeholders the authority[council] determines necessary to develop a delivery
method to carry out the objectives of this section.
(3) The authority[council] may promulgate administrative regulations necessary to
carry out this section and may require and compile information for specific
programs within the postsecondary institutions identified in subsection (1)(b) of this
section.
Section 18. KRS 164.0286 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall create a STEM Initiative Task Force for the purpose of providing
leadership and strategic direction to a comprehensive, statewide STEM initiative to
improve Kentucky's position for success in the knowledge-based economy by
expanding and strengthening educational and economic development opportunities
in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics. The STEM Initiative Task
Force shall be composed of representatives from the executive and legislative
branches of government, postsecondary education, elementary and secondary
education, professionals within the STEM disciplines, and the business community.
(2) The executive director[president] of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] shall appoint members to the
STEM Initiative Task Force, except that the President of the Senate shall appoint
two (2) members of the Kentucky Senate and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives shall appoint two (2) members of the House of Representatives to
the task force. The task force members appointed by the executive
director[president] of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] shall include but not be limited to
Page 37 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
the representatives on the STEM Initiative Steering Committee under subsection (4)
of this section. The total number of members of the STEM Initiative Task Force
shall be determined by the executive director[president] of the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education].
(3) The task force shall have a chair, who shall be the presiding officer and shall
coordinate the functions and activities of the task force. The chair shall be elected
by majority vote of the members present at the first meeting of the task force after
July 15, 2008. Thereafter, the chair shall be elected each calendar year.
(4) The STEM Initiative Task Force shall have a steering committee to provide
oversight and coordination of the implementation of the STEM strategic and
business plans developed by the task force under KRS 164.0287, and to determine
the allocation of funds from Kentucky STEM Initiative fund under KRS 164.0288.
The chair of the STEM Initiative Task Force shall be the chair of the steering
committee, and a vice chair shall be elected by members of the steering committee.
The steering committee shall be composed of task force members as follows:
(a) Two (2) representatives of the Kentucky Cabinet for Economic Development;
(b) One (1) representative of the Center for Applied Energy Research at the
University of Kentucky;
(c) One (1) representative of the Kentucky Rural Energy Consortium at the
University of Louisville;
(d) Two (2) representatives of the Kentucky Chamber of Commerce;
(e) One (1) representative of the Kentucky Science and Technology Corporation;
(f) Two (2) representatives of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education];
(g) One (1) president of a public university;
(h) One (1) representative of the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System;
Page 38 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(i) One (1) representative of the Association of Kentucky Independent Colleges
and Universities;
(j) Two (2) representatives of the Kentucky Department of Education;
(k) Two (2) representatives of the Kentucky Education Association;
(l) One (1) representative of the Kentucky School Boards Association;
(m) One (1) representative of the Kentucky Association of School Administrators;
(n) One (1) representative of the Education Professional Standards Board; and
(o) The task force chair.
(5) When making the appointment of a representative required under subsection (4) of
this section, the executive director[president] of the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] shall seek the advice of
the chief executive officer of the organization, agency, or association being
represented, except that the advice of the Kentucky Council of Presidents shall be
sought regarding the selection of a public university president to serve.
(6) Each STEM Initiative Task Force member shall serve a term of three (3) years, or
until a successor is appointed or qualified, except that, to the degree possible, for
members appointed by the executive director[president] of the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], the initial
term of one-third (1/3) of the members shall be for one (1) year, one-third (1/3) for
two (2) years, and one-third (1/3) for three (3) years. A member may be reappointed
to the task force at the discretion of the executive director[president] of the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education].
(7) The task force shall meet at least semiannually or upon the call of the chair, and a
majority of the full membership shall constitute a quorum.
(8) The task force, under the leadership of the chair, may appoint committees,
subcommittees, advisory groups, or other work structures to accomplish its
Page 39 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
purposes.
(9) Members of the task force shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed
for necessary travel and expenses while attending meetings or conducting approved
activities at a per diem rate not to exceed the rate promulgated in administrative
regulation for state employees under the provisions of KRS Chapter 45.
(10) The task force shall be attached to the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] for administrative purposes. The
authority[council] may enter into a memorandum of agreement with the Kentucky
Department of Education for staff and other administrative expenses relating to the
implementation of KRS 164.0285 to 164.0288.
(11) The task force may create a public or nonprofit corporation or contract with an
existing nonprofit corporation to facilitate the public-private collaboration in the
development and implementation of the STEM Initiative.
(12) The task force or the public or nonprofit corporation which may be utilized under
subsection (11) of this section may receive and expend funds from state
appropriations and may solicit, apply for, and receive funds, grants, contracts,
contributions, property, or services from a person, government agency, or other
organization, public or private. Determination of the use of funds received by the
task force shall be established by the STEM Initiative Steering Committee pursuant
to this section.
(13) Funds appropriated to the task force or the public or nonprofit corporation which
may be utilized under subsection (11) of this section shall not lapse at the end of a
fiscal year but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year to be used solely to
support the purposes for which the funds were appropriated.
(14) The task force or the public or nonprofit corporation which may be utilized under
subsection (11) of this section shall:
(a) Follow standard accounting practices;
Page 40 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(b) Have an independent auditor conduct an annual financial audit; and
(c) Submit a quarterly report of receipts and expenditures no later than sixty (60)
days after the end of a calendar quarter. The task force shall file its report with
the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] and a public or nonprofit corporation shall file its
report to the STEM Initiative Task Force.
(15) The task force or the public or nonprofit corporation which may be utilized under
subsection (11) of this section shall submit an annual financial and progress report
for the previous fiscal year by September 30 to the Governor, the Legislative
Research Commission, the commissioner of education, and the executive
director[president] of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education].
Section 19. KRS 164.0288 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky STEM Initiative fund is hereby created to support the STEM
Initiative described in KRS 164.0286 and 164.0287, as directed by the STEM
Initiative Steering Committee established in KRS 164.0286(4).
(2) The fund may receive state appropriations, grants, gifts, federal funds, or any other
public or private funds.
(3) Fund amounts not expended or obligated at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse
but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year to be used solely to support the
purposes for which the funds were appropriated. Any interest earnings of the fund
shall become a part of the fund and shall not lapse.
(4) The Department of Education and the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] may expend available funds from
other sources on the STEM Initiative.
Section 20. KRS 164.029 is amended to read as follows:
The Area Health Education System in the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Page 41 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] is hereby recognized.
Section 21. KRS 164.030 is amended to read as follows:
The governing board of each of the state postsecondary educational institutions shall
make such changes or adjustments in the curricula and such rules and regulations
affecting their schools as are necessary to carry out and put into effect the rulings of the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education]
in regard to curricular offerings, entrance fees, and qualifications for admission to and
reports from their respective institutions.
Section 22. KRS 164.033 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Effective August 1, 2002, ]The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] shall administer a competitive
grant program to enable the establishment of local P-16 councils. A P-16 council
may be called a council of partners. The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] and the Kentucky Board of
Education shall jointly establish the criteria for participation in the grant program
and the amount of funds available to each local P-16 council based on funds
appropriated for this purpose. A postsecondary education institution shall assume
the leadership role for managing a local P-16 council grant.
(2) A local P-16 council shall promote the preparation and development of teachers, the
alignment of competency standards, and the elimination of barriers that impede
student transition from preschool through baccalaureate programs.
(3) Each local P-16 council shall provide an annual written report of its activities and
recommendations to its members and the institutions they represent, the Kentucky
Board of Education, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council
on Postsecondary Education], and the Education Professional Standards Board.
Section 23. KRS 164.035 is amended to read as follows:
The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Page 42 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Education], in consultation with the Office of Adult Education and the statewide reading
research center established under KRS 164.0207, shall assess the need for technical
assistance, training, and other support to assist in the development of adult education and
workforce development that support the state strategic agenda and that include a
comprehensive coordinated approach to education and training services. The
authority[council] shall promote the involvement of universities; colleges; technical
institutions; elementary and secondary educational agencies; labor, business, and industry
representatives; community-based organizations; citizens' groups; and other policymakers
in the development of the regional strategies.
Section 24. KRS 164.037 is amended to read as follows:
The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] may identify academic programs offered at institutions to which the criteria
for a standardized degree program shall be applied.
(1) If the authority[council] determines that a particular degree program offered by any
state postsecondary institution shall be a standardized degree program, then the
authority[council] shall direct each institution offering the degree program to
collaborate under the direction of the authority[council] and establish the courses
and the course content required for that degree program.
(2) If the various institutions cannot agree upon the courses required or the content of
the courses, then the authority[council] shall make these determinations.
(3) All courses approved for a standardized degree shall be transferable among all
institutions granting that degree.
Section 25. KRS 164.0401 is amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of KRS 164.0401 to 164.0407:
(1) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority["Council" means the Council on Postsecondary Education];
(2) "Dedicated funds" means a gift, grant, or donation to the fund that is subject to
Page 43 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
restrictions imposed by a private grantor under KRS 164.0401 to 164.0407;
(3) "Eligible healthcare credential" means:
(a) A licensed alcohol and drug counselor, licensed clinical alcohol and drug
counselor, licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor associate, professional
art therapist, professional art therapist associate license, or community health
worker certificate issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 309;
(b) Any emergency medical services license or certificate issued pursuant to KRS
Chapter 311A;
(c) Any medical imaging, radiation, or other license issued pursuant to KRS
Chapter 311B;
(d) A dental hygienist or dental assistant license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter
313;
(e) Any nursing license or certificate issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 314 or
registration as a state-registered nursing aide with the Kentucky Board of
Nursing;
(f) A respiratory care practitioner certificate issued pursuant to KRS Chapter
314A;
(g) Any psychology license or certificate issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 319;
(h) Any occupational therapy license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 319A;
(i) Any behavior analyst license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 319C;
(j) Any physical therapy certificate or license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter
327; and
(k) Any social worker, marriage and family therapist, or professional counselor
certificate or license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 335;
(4) "Grantor" means an individual or an entity that gifts, grants, or donates moneys to
the Kentucky healthcare workforce investment fund established in KRS 164.0402;
(5) "Healthcare partner" means a grantor to the Kentucky healthcare workforce
Page 44 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
investment fund that is:
(a) A healthcare provider as defined in KRS 367.4081;
(b) A healthcare facility licensed by and operating in Kentucky;
(c) A qualified mental health professional as defined in KRS 202A.011; or
(d) Any healthcare or healthcare-related association, individual, or corporation
doing business in and incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth;
(6) "Healthcare program" means an education or training program that is a specific
requirement to an eligible healthcare credential, including but not limited to a high
school healthcare vocational program;
(7) "Historically underserved county" means a county of the Commonwealth with
enhanced workforce demands, as demonstrated by:
(a) Objective healthcare workforce data that demonstrates needs and demands
upon its healthcare workforce that exceed the statewide average; and
(b) Final unemployment figures calculated by the Department of Workforce
Development demonstrating a countywide rate of unemployment that exceeds
the statewide unemployment rate of the Commonwealth:
1. In the most recent five (5) consecutive calendar years; or
2. By two hundred percent (200%) in the most recent calendar year; and
(8) "Kentucky resident" is a Kentucky resident as defined by the authority[council]
pursuant to KRS 164.020(8).
Section 26. KRS 164.0402 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to address Kentucky's persistent shortage of
a broad spectrum of certified and licensed healthcare professionals, including
nurses, mental health professionals, and emergency medical services professionals,
by incentivizing collaboration between healthcare programs, healthcare industry
partners, and the Commonwealth to grow and strengthen the education and training
pipeline of healthcare professionals within Kentucky to better serve patients across
Page 45 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
the Commonwealth by:
(a) Improving the ability of a broad variety of Kentucky's healthcare programs to
meet the workforce demands and capacity of the Commonwealth, including
the workforce demands of historically underserved counties;
(b) Raising awareness of and interest in a broad variety of healthcare occupations
and reducing the barriers of access to the healthcare programs necessary to
pursue these occupations, including financial barriers;
(c) Increasing knowledge and awareness of opportunities in high-need areas of
healthcare, including but not limited to geriatrics and neurology;
(d) Improving pathways between high school career and technical programs and
other healthcare programs; and
(e) Developing strategies for healthcare organizations to support career growth
and development for their employees.
(2) There is hereby created the Kentucky healthcare workforce investment fund to be
administered by the authority[council] for the purpose of funding:
(a) Public and private partnerships to provide healthcare training scholarships in
accordance with KRS 164.0403 to reduce the financial barriers of Kentucky
residents seeking high-demand eligible healthcare credentials;
(b) Healthcare program incentives in accordance with KRS 164.0404 to reward
performance and excellence among the Commonwealth's healthcare
programs; and
(c) The authority's[council's] administrative, research, consulting, fundraising,
planning, and analysis costs of KRS 164.0401 to 164.0407.
(3) (a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to encourage private financial and
philanthropic support of the Kentucky healthcare workforce investment fund,
as the healthcare industry directly benefits from a well-trained workforce
capable of meeting its employment needs and the needs of patients. To the
Page 46 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
extent allowed by applicable laws, the fund may directly accept gifts, grants,
or donations subject to restrictions imposed by a grantor.
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any moneys appropriated to the fund by the
General Assembly remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year prior to
the 2029-2030 fiscal year shall not lapse.
(c) Any moneys appropriated to the fund by the General Assembly remaining in
the fund at the end of the 2029-2030 fiscal year shall be forfeited and shall
lapse to the general fund.
(d) Any moneys contributed by grantors remaining in the fund at the end of the
2029-2030 fiscal year shall be returned to each grantor proportionally based
on the amount donated by the grantor in relation to the total amount donated
by all grantors.
(4) Subject to available funds, the Kentucky healthcare workforce investment fund
shall consist of any:
(a) Appropriations designated for the fund;
(b) Funds, grants, and receipts from the authority's[council's] fundraising
activities on behalf of the fund; and
(c) Other moneys made available for the purposes of the fund.
(5) Any interest earnings of the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall lapse
only as provided in subsection (3) of this section, except that interest on moneys
contributed by a grantor shall not lapse. Moneys in the fund are hereby appropriated
for the purposes set forth in this section.
(6) The portion of the fund expended towards the authority's[council's] costs of
administering KRS 164.0401 to 164.0407 shall not exceed four percent (4%) of all
gross moneys in the fund or one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000)
annually, whichever is less.
(7) (a) The authority[council] shall promulgate administrative regulations by July 1,
Page 47 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
2023, in accordance with this subsection and KRS Chapter 13A to administer
KRS 164.0401 to 164.0407.
(b) At least thirty (30) days before filing an administrative regulation with the
regulations compiler, the authority[council] shall first submit the draft
administrative regulation, a detailed implementation plan, and other
documents required to be filed by KRS Chapter 13A to the members of the
Interim Joint Committee on Education and the Interim Joint Committee on
Health Services for review and comment.
(c) The authority[council] shall consider any comments and recommendations
provided by the members of the Interim Joint Committee on Education and
the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services before filing the
administrative regulation.
Section 27. KRS 164.0403 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The authority[council] shall reserve at least sixty-five percent (65%) of all net
moneys in the Kentucky healthcare workforce investment fund for partnership
proposals between healthcare programs and healthcare partners to provide
healthcare training scholarships to Kentucky residents enrolled in healthcare
programs in Kentucky.
(2) In accepting partnerships, the authority[council] shall evaluate each partnership
proposal to determine if the proposal meets the requirements of this section and
administrative regulations promulgated by the authority[council]. The
administrative regulations shall create a process to prioritize accepting partnerships
to proposals:
(a) Targeted to address the specific needs of a historically underserved county or
to improve racial and ethnic diversity within a specific designated healthcare
credential targeted by the partnership;
(b) Targeted to reduce the workforce demand of a specific eligible healthcare
Page 48 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
credential that is determined by the authority[council], based on objective
criteria, to be among the highest in demand in the Commonwealth; or
(c) From healthcare partners with fifty (50) or fewer employees.
(3) A partnership shall require a written partnership contract between a healthcare
program, healthcare partner, and the authority[council]. The partnership contract
shall:
(a) Prohibit any disbursement of moneys from the Kentucky healthcare
workforce investment fund until the moneys appropriated by the General
Assembly to be distributed are matched, at least dollar for dollar, with moneys
deposited to the fund by the healthcare partner;
(b) Require the healthcare program to use all moneys distributed to the healthcare
program pursuant to the partnership contract to issue direct healthcare training
scholarships to Kentucky students enrolled in the healthcare program;
(c) If applicable to a healthcare program, require that the healthcare training
scholarship application process encourage applicants to complete the Free
Application for Federal Student Aid; and
(d) Meet all other requirements set forth in this section and administrative
regulation, including but not limited to any reporting requirements to the
authority[council].
(4) Disbursements of moneys from the Kentucky healthcare workforce investment fund
to support healthcare training scholarships shall be made directly to a healthcare
program pursuant to the terms of the partnership contract.
(5) A healthcare program that enters a partnership contract shall solicit, accept, and
review healthcare training scholarship applications submitted by students enrolled
in the healthcare program. A partnership contract may require that a healthcare
program do so in collaboration with the healthcare partner. The healthcare program
shall award healthcare training scholarships pursuant to any scholarship criteria set
Page 49 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
forth in the partnership contract, this section, and administrative regulations. The
decisions of the healthcare program in the issuance of scholarships shall be final.
(6) A healthcare training scholarship issued by a healthcare program pursuant to a
partnership contract shall be made directly to a recipient pursuant to a written
scholarship contract between the recipient and the healthcare program. The
scholarship contract shall not restrict the recipient's ability to utilize the scholarship
for the total cost of attendance. Each recipient of a scholarship shall:
(a) Agree in the written contract to practice as a licensed or certified medical
professional in the Commonwealth for a contract period of one (1) year for
each academic year funded by the scholarship up to a maximum of two (2)
total years; and
(b) Sign a promissory note as evidence of the scholarship and the obligation to
repay the scholarship amount upon failure to complete terms of the contract.
(7) A grantor may place restrictions upon a contribution to the Kentucky healthcare
workforce investment fund requiring specific criteria for a healthcare training
scholarship or scholarships funded by the grantor's dedicated funds to students who
agree in the scholarship contract required by subsection (6)(a) of this section to
practice as a certified or licensed healthcare professional, including but not limited
to criteria restricting:
(a) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, employment by the
healthcare partner for the contract period; or
(b) Employment at a location within a designated geographic area of the
Commonwealth for the contract period.
(8) The healthcare training scholarship contract shall grant the healthcare program, the
Commonwealth, or the healthcare partner the authority to initiate recoupment
proceedings for the recovery of the total amount of all healthcare training
scholarships awarded to an individual that fails to complete the terms of a contract
Page 50 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
entered into in accordance with subsection (6) of this section, together with
reasonable attorney fees and interest at a compound rate not to exceed eight percent
(8%) per annum from the date of disbursement from the fund.
(9) A healthcare training scholarship shall not:
(a) Be awarded to an applicant enrolled in a state registered nursing aide training
and competency evaluation program who is:
1. Not charged for any portion of the program pursuant to 42 C.F.R. sec.
483.152(c)(1); or
2. Eligible for reimbursement for the costs of the program pursuant to 42
C.F.R. sec. 483.152(c)(2) prior to entering the scholarship contract; or
(b) Include an employment restriction that would restrict the recipient to be
employed by a specific healthcare partner for the contract period required by
subsection (6) of this section or that would otherwise constitute an offer of
employment in accordance with 42 C.F.R. sec. 483.152(c)(1).
(10) An applicant who has been listed on the nurse aide abuse registry with a
substantiated finding of abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property shall not be
eligible for a healthcare training scholarship.
Section 28. KRS 164.0404 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The authority[council] shall reserve up to thirty-five percent (35%) of all net
moneys in the Kentucky healthcare workforce investment fund for healthcare
program incentives to reward performance and excellence among eligible
healthcare programs. Any appropriation applied towards the amount of a healthcare
program incentive award shall be matched, at least dollar for dollar, with moneys
deposited to the fund by the healthcare partner.
(2) The authority[council] shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish
criteria for issuing healthcare program incentives. The criteria shall consider the
following factors:
Page 51 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(a) The workforce demands and capacity for a specific eligible healthcare
credential;
(b) The workforce demands and capacity for a specific eligible healthcare
credential within historically underserved counties;
(c) The percentage of increase over a baseline standard in the number of students
completing the healthcare program;
(d) The passage rate and first-time passage rate of graduates of the healthcare
program on the healthcare credential examination; and
(e) Any other objective factors determined by the authority[council] to be
relevant to the evaluation of the performance and excellence of the healthcare
programs and the ability of the healthcare programs to meet the workforce
needs of the communities they serve.
(3) (a) The authority[council], or its designee, shall solicit, accept, and review
applications for healthcare program incentives by healthcare programs located
in Kentucky. The authority[council], or its designee, shall select the
healthcare programs to receive healthcare program incentives and the amount
thereof based on the criteria established by this section, administrative
regulations, and a grantor of dedicated funds, if applicable.
(b) A healthcare partner that is the grantor of dedicated funds may reserve the
right to require the authority[council], or its designee, to collaborate with the
healthcare partner in fulfilling the duties assigned under paragraph (a) of this
subsection for any healthcare program incentive funded by the grantor's
dedicated funds, except an incentive shall not be:
1. Awarded to a healthcare program that has gifted, granted, or donated
any moneys to the fund that are dedicated funds reserved for the purpose
of issuing incentives under this section; or
2. Restricted to a specific healthcare program or pursuant to criteria which
Page 52 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
would have the impact of effectively excluding all but a single
healthcare program from qualification.
(c) Decisions of the authority[council], or its designee, in these matters shall be
final.
(4) The authority[council] shall require the healthcare program to submit proof that the
entire amount of the incentive is invested in the continued excellence of the
program awarded by funding the:
(a) Education, recruitment, and training of the healthcare program's faculty and
staff; or
(b) Maintenance and acquisition of medical equipment utilized by the healthcare
program.
A healthcare program that fails to submit the proof required by the
authority[council] shall return the entire amount of the incentive to the Kentucky
healthcare workforce investment fund.
Section 29. KRS 164.0405 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The authority[council] shall submit a written report to the Interim Joint Committee
on Education, the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services, and the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue Budget Review Subcommittee on
Education no later than December 1 of each year. The report shall include:
(a) A detailed summary of the authority's[council's] costs throughout the year;
(b) Legislative recommendations to help grow and strengthen the education and
training pipeline of healthcare professions within Kentucky;
(c) A detailed overview of the Kentucky healthcare workforce investment fund,
including an accounting of all moneys raised and expended;
(d) A detailed analysis of healthcare training scholarships awarded pursuant to
KRS 164.0403, including but not limited to:
1. The criteria used to award the scholarships;
Page 53 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
2. The number of scholarships awarded and the amount of each
scholarship;
3. An overview of the demographic information of scholarship recipients,
including the county of residence;
4. The names of the healthcare programs with scholarship recipients and
the type of eligible healthcare credential corresponding to each program;
and
5. To the extent available, student and program outcomes, including but
not limited to:
a. Graduation rates of the healthcare program overall and of
scholarship recipients as compared to an established baseline
within any such program;
b. Employment and employment retention rates of the healthcare
program overall and scholarship recipients; and
c. The workforce participation of program graduates practicing in
Kentucky under an eligible healthcare credential in relation to the
workforce demand and capacity for that specific eligible
healthcare credential; and
(e) A detailed analysis of the number of the healthcare program incentives
awarded pursuant to KRS 164.0404, including but not limited to:
1. The criteria used by the authority[council] to award the incentives;
2. The number of incentives awarded;
3. The name of each healthcare program that received an incentive, the
corresponding eligible healthcare credential, and the amount of the
incentive; and
4. The qualifications of each healthcare program that received an incentive
in relation to the criteria identified by the authority[council] for
Page 54 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
awarding the incentives.
(2) If the report required by subsection (1) of this section is not filed by December 14
of each year, or a later date approved by the Interim Joint Committee on Education
and the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services, any appropriations to the fund
shall be forfeited and any remaining moneys in the fund appropriated by the
General Assembly shall lapse to the general fund. The authority[council] shall
return any remaining private moneys to its grantor, prorated as necessary.
Section 30. KRS 164.043 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created in the State Treasury a cancer research matching fund
designated as the "cancer research institutions matching fund." The fund shall be
administered by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council for
Postsecondary Education]. For tax periods beginning on or after June 1, 2005, the
one-cent ($0.01) surtax collected under KRS 138.140(1)(c) shall be deposited in the
fund and shall be made available for matching purposes to the following
universities for cancer research:
(a) One-half (1/2) of the moneys deposited in the fund shall be made available to
the University of Kentucky; and
(b) One-half (1/2) of the moneys deposited in the fund shall be made available to
the University of Louisville.
(2) All interest earned on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
(3) Any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall lapse to the
general fund.
(4) To receive the funds, the universities shall provide dollar-for-dollar matching funds.
The matching funds shall come from external sources to be eligible for the state
match. External source contributions are those that originate outside the university
and its affiliated corporations. The matching funds shall be newly generated to be
eligible for state match. Newly generated contributions are those received by the
Page 55 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
university after April 1, 2005.
(5) Moneys transferred to the fund pursuant to subsection (1) of this section are hereby
appropriated for purposes set forth in this section.
(6) The following funds are not eligible for state match:
(a) Funds received from federal, state, and local government sources; and
(b) General fund and student-derived revenues.
Section 31. KRS 164.050 is amended to read as follows:
The members of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each
authority[council] meeting attended and shall be reimbursed for their necessary traveling
and other expenses while attending the meetings of the authority[council], except a
member who resides outside the Commonwealth shall not be reimbursed for out-of-state
travel. Each institution shall pay the expenses of its own representatives. The expenses of
the chief state school officer shall be paid by the state in the same manner as his or her
other traveling expenses are paid.
Section 32. KRS 164.060 is amended to read as follows:
The authority[council] shall meet at least four (4) times each year at such times as it
determines by resolution. Special meetings may be called by the chairman. Upon request
of three (3) institutions represented on the authority[council], the chairman shall call a
special meeting.
Section 33. KRS 164.070 is amended to read as follows:
The authority[council] shall meet in the office of the executive director[president] or
such other place as it designates.
Section 34. KRS 164.080 is amended to read as follows:
Notice of each meeting shall be given by the chairman at least ten (10) days prior to the
time of the meeting, unless all members of the authority[council] waive notice.
Section 35. KRS 164.090 is amended to read as follows:
Page 56 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
A majority of the voting members of the authority[council] constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business, but no business shall be transacted and no proposition carried
unless a majority of the voting members votes for it.
Section 36. KRS 164.092 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(b) "Category I and Category II square feet" means square footage that falls under
space categories as defined by the Postsecondary Education Facilities
Inventory and Classification Manual published by the United States
Department of Education;
(c)[(b)] "Comprehensive university" has the same meaning as in KRS 164.001;
[(c) "Council" means the Council on Postsecondary Education;]
(d) "Equilibrium" means a condition in which every institution has an
appropriately proportionate level of resources as determined by the
performance funding model established in this section given each institution's
level of productivity in achieving student success outcomes, course
completion outcomes, and other components included in the model;
(e) "Formula base amount" means an institution's enacted general fund
appropriation amount minus debt service on bonds and appropriations for
mandated programs;
(f) "Hold-harmless provision" means a provision included in the funding
formulas as described in subsection (9) of this section that prevents a
reduction of a designated portion of funding for an institution through
operation of the funding formula;
(g) "Institution" means a college in the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System or a public university;
(h) "KCTCS" means the Kentucky Community and Technical College System;
Page 57 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(i) "KCTCS institution allocable resources" means the formula base amount net
of any equity adjustment as described in subsection (7)(b) of this section, any
amount protected by a hold-harmless provision, and any applicable increase
or decrease in general fund appropriations;
(j) "Mandated program" means a research or public service activity that is not
integral to the instructional mission of the institution and is identified by the
General Assembly in the biennial budget;
(k) "Nontraditional age students" means students between the ages of twenty-five
(25) and sixty-four (64);
(l) "Performance fund" means the postsecondary education performance fund
established in subsection (13) of this section;
(m) "Research universities" means the University of Kentucky and the University
of Louisville;
(n) "Stop-loss provision" means a provision included in the funding formulas as
described in subsection (9) of this section to limit reduction of an institution's
funding amount to a predetermined percentage, notwithstanding the amounts
calculated by operation of the formula; and
(o) "University allocable resources" means the formula base amount net of any
small school adjustment as described in subsection (5)(c) of this section, any
amount protected by a hold-harmless provision, and any applicable increase
or decrease in general fund appropriations.
(2) The General Assembly hereby finds that improving opportunity for the
Commonwealth's citizens and building a stronger economy can be achieved by its
public college and university system focusing its efforts and resources on the goals
of:
(a) Increasing the retention and progression of students toward timely credential
or degree completion;
Page 58 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(b) Increasing the number and types of credentials and degrees earned by all types
of students;
(c) Increasing the number of credentials and degrees that garner higher salaries
upon graduation, such as science, technology, engineering, math, and health,
and in areas of industry demand;
(d) Closing achievement gaps by increasing the number of credentials and
degrees earned by low-income students, underprepared students,
underrepresented students, and nontraditional age students; and
(e) Facilitating credit hour accumulation and transfer of students from KCTCS to
four (4) year postsecondary institutions.
(3) (a) The General Assembly hereby declares these goals can best be accomplished
by implementing a comprehensive funding model for the allocation of state
general fund appropriations for postsecondary institution operations that
aligns the Commonwealth's investments in postsecondary education with the
Commonwealth's postsecondary education policy goals and objectives.
(b) The General Assembly further recognizes that priority for state general fund
appropriations for postsecondary institutions should be given to each
institution's funding floor over appropriations to the performance fund. For
purposes of this section, "funding floor" means an institution's fiscal year
2020-2021 general fund appropriation included in 2020 Ky. Acts ch. 92, plus
any fiscal year 2020-2021 distribution from the performance fund, and minus
fiscal year 2020-2021 debt service on bonds and appropriations for mandated
programs.
(4) This section establishes a comprehensive funding model for the public
postsecondary education system to be implemented by the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education]. The
funding model shall include a public university sector formula and a KCTCS sector
Page 59 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
formula, and shall not include any race-based metrics or targets in the formulas.
(5) The funding formula for the public university sector shall:
(a) Recognize differences in missions and cost structures between research
universities and comprehensive universities to ensure that neither are
advantaged or disadvantaged during the first full year of implementation;
(b) Distribute one hundred percent (100%) of the university allocable resources
for all universities in the sector, based on rational criteria, including student
success, course completion, and operational support components, regardless
of whether state funding for postsecondary institution operations increases,
decreases, or remains stable;
(c) Include an adjustment to minimize impact on smaller campuses as determined
by the authority[council]; and
(d) Be constructed to achieve equilibrium, at which point the funding formula
rewards rates of improvement above the sector average rate.
(6) Funding for the public university sector shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Forty percent (40%) of total university allocable resources shall be distributed
based on each university's share of total student success outcomes produced,
including but not limited to:
1. Bachelor's degree production;
2. Numbers of students progressing beyond thirty (30), sixty (60), and
ninety (90) credit hour thresholds;
3. Science, technology, engineering, math, and health bachelor's degree
production; and
4. Bachelor's degrees earned by low-income students and underrepresented
students;
(b) Thirty percent (30%) of total university allocable resources shall be
distributed based on each university's share of sector total student credit hours
Page 60 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
earned, excluding dual credit enrollment, weighted to account for cost
differences by academic discipline and course level, such as lower and upper
division baccalaureate, master's, doctoral research, doctoral professional, and
nontraditional age students; and
(c) Thirty percent (30%) of total university allocable resources shall be
distributed in support of vital campus operations as follows:
1. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each university's share
of Category I and Category II square feet, net of research, nonclass
laboratory, and open laboratory space, to support maintenance and
operation of campus facilities and may include a space utilization factor
as determined by the authority[council] in collaboration with the
working group established in subsection (11) of this section;
2. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each university's share
of total instruction and student services spending, net of maintenance
and operation, to support campus administrative functions; and
3. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each university's share
of total full-time equivalent student enrollment to support academic
support services such as libraries and academic computing.
(7) The funding formula for the KCTCS sector:
(a) Shall distribute one hundred percent (100%) of KCTCS institution allocable
resources for all KCTCS colleges based on rational criteria, including student
success, course completion, and operational support components, regardless
of whether state funding for postsecondary institution operations increases,
decreases, or remains stable;
(b) May include an adjustment to account for community economic disadvantage
in some regions of the Commonwealth as determined by the
authority[council]; and
Page 61 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(c) Shall be constructed to achieve equilibrium, at which point the funding
formula rewards rates of improvement above the sector average rate.
(8) Funding for the KCTCS sector shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Thirty-five percent (35%) of total KCTCS institution allocable resources shall
be distributed based on each college's share of total student success outcomes
produced, including but not limited to:
1. Certificate, diploma, and associate degree production, weighted to
provide a premium for credentials that are aligned with the economic
needs of the state;
2. Numbers of students progressing beyond fifteen (15), thirty (30), and
forty-five (45) credit hour thresholds;
3. Credentials earned by low-income students, underprepared students,
underrepresented students, and nontraditional age students; and
4. Transfers to four (4) year institutions;
(b) Thirty-five percent (35%) of total KCTCS institution allocable resources shall
be distributed based on each college's share of total student credit hours
earned, weighted to account for cost differences by academic discipline; and
(c) Thirty percent (30%) of total KCTCS institution allocable resources shall be
distributed in support of vital campus operations as follows:
1. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each college's share of
Category I and Category II square feet, net of research, nonclass
laboratory, and open laboratory space, to support maintenance and
operation of campus facilities and may include a space utilization factor
as determined by the authority[council] in collaboration with the
postsecondary education working group established in subsection (11)
of this section;
2. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each college's share of
Page 62 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
total instruction and student services spending, net of maintenance and
operation, to support campus administrative functions; and
3. Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed based on each college's share of
total full-time equivalent student enrollment to support academic
support services such as libraries and academic computing.
(9) (a) The funding formula for both sectors shall include:
1. A hold-harmless provision for fiscal year 2018-2019 preventing a
reduction in an institution's funding amount based solely on the formula
calculation, and allowing a hold-harmless amount determined by the
formula in fiscal year 2018-2019 to be deducted from an institution's
formula base amount in whole or in part in fiscal years 2019-2020 and
2020-2021, as determined by the authority[council];
2. A hold-harmless provision for fiscal year 2021-2022, and every fiscal
year thereafter, preventing a reduction in an institution's funding amount
based solely on the formula calculation;
3. A stop-loss provision for fiscal year 2019-2020 limiting the reduction in
funding to any institution to one percent (1%) of that institution's
formula base amount;
4. A stop-loss provision for fiscal year 2020-2021 limiting the reduction in
funding to any institution to two percent (2%) of that institution's
formula base amount; and
5. A stop-loss provision for fiscal year 2021-2022, and every fiscal year
thereafter, limiting the reduction in funding to any institution to zero
percent (0%) of that institution's formula base amount.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be construed to limit the level of a
budget reduction that may be enacted by the General Assembly or
implemented by the Governor.
Page 63 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(10) (a) By May 1 each year, the authority[council] shall certify to the Office of the
State Budget Director the amount to be distributed to each of the public
universities and KCTCS as determined by the comprehensive funding model
created in this section, not to exceed the available balance in the performance
fund.
(b) The Office of the State Budget Director shall distribute the appropriations in
the performance fund for that fiscal year to the institutions in the amounts the
authority[council] has certified. The adjusted appropriations to each
institution shall be allotted as provided in KRS 48.600, 48.605, 48.610,
48.620, and 48.630.
(c) 1. The certified amounts distributed from the performance fund to the
institutions are nonrecurring funds that shall not be included in the
institutions' base budget amounts submitted in their biennial budget
requests.
2. The certified amounts distributed from the performance fund in the
previous fiscal year shall be included in the performance fund's base
budget amount submitted by the authority[council] in the biennial
budget request.
(d) For fiscal year 2017-2018, the Office of the State Budget Director shall
distribute to the public postsecondary education institutions, except for
Kentucky State University, those funds appropriated to the performance fund
by the General Assembly in 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 149, Part I, K., 12., in
accordance with the comprehensive funding model created in this section.
(11) (a) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] is hereby directed to establish a postsecondary
education working group composed of the following:
1. The executive director[president] of the authority[council];
Page 64 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
2. The president or designee of each public postsecondary institution,
including the president of KCTCS;
3. The Governor or designee;
4. The Speaker of the House or designee; and
5. The President of the Senate or designee.
(b) Beginning in fiscal year 2020-2021 and every three (3) fiscal years thereafter,
the postsecondary education working group shall convene to determine if the
comprehensive funding model is functioning as expected, identify any
unintended consequences of the model, and recommend any adjustments to
the model. The authority[council] may call the working group to convene
prior to the start of the required fiscal year to allow sufficient time for the
group to complete its work.
(c) The results of the review and recommendations of the working group shall be
reported by the authority[council] to the Governor, the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, and the Interim Joint Committee
on Education by December 1 of each fiscal year the working group convenes.
(12) The authority[council] shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS
Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of this section.
(13) (a) The postsecondary education performance fund is hereby established as an
appropriation unit to support improvement in the operations of the public
postsecondary institutions and achievement of the Commonwealth's education
policy goals and workforce development priorities. General fund moneys may
be appropriated by the General Assembly to this fund for distribution to the
public postsecondary institutions in amounts determined through the
comprehensive funding model created in this section.
(b) Any balance in the performance fund at the close of any fiscal year shall not
lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year and be continuously
Page 65 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
appropriated for the purposes specified in this section. A general statement
that all continuing appropriations are repealed, discontinued, or suspended
shall not operate to repeal, discontinue, or suspend this fund or to repeal this
action.
Section 37. KRS 164.095 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Disability" means hard of hearing, including deafness; speech or language
impairment; visual impairment, including blindness; orthopedic impairment;
other health impairment that substantially limits a major life activity; or
specific learning problem.
(b) "Institution" means public universities, their subdivisions, and the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System.
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly that an accountability process be
implemented which provides for a systematic ongoing evaluation of quality and
effectiveness in Kentucky postsecondary educational institutions and to provide a
method for evaluating each institution's progress toward meeting specific goals,
principles, strategies, objectives, and benchmarks as set forth in the strategic agenda
established in KRS 164.0203. It is further the intent of the General Assembly that
the accountability process monitor performance at the institutions in each of the
major areas of instruction, research, and public service, while recognizing the
individual missions of each of the institutions. The accountability process shall
provide for the adoption of systemwide and individual performance goals with
standards identified with the advice of the postsecondary educational institutions
and the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education].
(3) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall develop and implement a system of accountability for the
Page 66 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
postsecondary education institutions that measures:
(a) Educational quality and educational outcomes;
(b) Student progress in the postsecondary system;
(c) Research and service activities;
(d) Use of resources;
(e) Other performance or outcomes that support the achievement of the strategic
agenda, including involvement in quality enhancement of elementary and
secondary education; and
(f) Other indicators as deemed appropriate by the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education].
(4) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall collect information, maintain a comprehensive database, and
publish reports on the condition of the postsecondary education system that include
but are not limited to student enrollments, utilization of facilities, and the finances
of the institutions.
(5) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall submit to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission
an annual accountability report providing information on the implementation of
performance standards and the achievement of the performance goals during the
prior year and initiatives to be undertaken during the next year.
Section 38. KRS 164.096 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) No later than June 30 of each year, the president or chief executive officer of
each state institution or independent institution that is licensed or overseen by
the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education], and the chair of the governing board of each
institution, shall jointly execute a signed, sworn statement attesting to whether
the institution:
Page 67 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
1. Was in sound financial standing with a stable financial base to support
the mission of the institution and the scope of its programs and services
during the previous fiscal year;
2. Underwent an institutional audit for the most recent fiscal year prepared
by an independent certified public accountant or appropriate government
auditing agency employing the appropriate audit guide during the
previous fiscal year; and
3. Has an annual budget for the upcoming fiscal year that is preceded by
sound planning, subject to sound fiscal procedures, and approved by the
president of the institution and the chair of the governing board.
(b) In executing the statement required by paragraph (a) of this subsection, a
president or chief executive officer and chair of the governing board of an
institution may reasonably rely upon the representations of an employee of the
institution that is responsible for the financial management and accounting of
the institution, including the treasurer or chief financial officer of the
institution, and external financial service providers.
(2) Each institution shall provide the sworn statement required by subsection (1) of this
section to the executive director[president] of the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], the chairs of the
Budget Review Subcommittee on Education of the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue, and the co-chairs of the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue.
(3) If an institution fails to provide a statement as required by subsection (2) of this
section, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] shall have the authority to conduct an investigation and
request any financial documentation necessary to inform a report on the financial
data required by subsection (1) of this section. The authority[council] shall report
Page 68 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
its findings to the chairs of the Budget Review Subcommittee on Education of the
Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and the co-chairs of the
Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
Section 39. KRS 164.097 is amended to read as follows:
No postsecondary education institution shall receive funds from the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] from any trust
fund for the purposes of teacher education or model programs of teaching and learning
unless the Education Professional Standards Board has certified to the authority[council]
that the institution has met the following conditions:
(1) The college or university has developed viable partnerships with local school
districts and schools;
(2) There is evidence of ongoing dialogue and collaboration among liberal arts and
sciences faculty and administrators with faculty and administrators in the
department, school, or college of education;
(3) The college or university has demonstrated a commitment to participate in teacher
academies;
(4) The college or university has an active recruitment plan for attracting and retaining
minority faculty as well as students, and particularly in the department, school, or
college of education;
(5) The college or university has initiated the development of incentives or rewards for
faculty across the institution to participate in service activities to local schools;
(6) The department, school, or college of education has developed at least one (1)
accelerated alternative plan for teacher education or nontraditional program of
teacher preparation, or commits to developing an accelerated alternative or
nontraditional program;
(7) The department, school, or college of education provides consistent and quality
classroom and field experiences, including early practicums and student teaching
Page 69 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
experience for all students;
(8) The department, school, or college of education has, as an element of its
curriculum, substantial course work and classroom and field experiences directly
addressing teacher training in classroom management;
(9) There are no major accreditation deficiencies; and
(10) The institution has demonstrated at least one (1) or more innovations in teacher
education.
Section 40. KRS 164.098 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall promulgate administrative regulations that require public
postsecondary educational institutions to grant credit toward graduation to a student
who scores at least "3" on a College Board Advanced Placement examination.
(2) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall publish information, in print and electronic format, about the
scores required on College Board Advanced Placement examinations at which
credit toward graduation and completion of degree requirements will be granted at
all Kentucky public and private postsecondary educational institutions.
(3) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education], in conjunction with the Kentucky Board of Education and the
Education Professional Standards Board, shall develop guidelines for content
knowledge and teacher training in dual enrollment and dual credit programs offered
in Kentucky.
Section 41. KRS 164.125 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The University of Kentucky shall provide:
(a) Upon approval of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], associate and baccalaureate
programs of instruction;
Page 70 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(b) Upon approval of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], master degree programs,
specialist degree programs above the master's-degree level, and joint doctoral
programs in cooperation with other public postsecondary educational
institutions in the state;
(c) Upon approval of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], doctoral and post-doctoral
programs and professional instruction including law, medicine, dentistry,
education, architecture, engineering, and social professions.
(2) The University of Kentucky shall be the principal state institution for the conduct of
statewide research and statewide service programs and shall be the primary
institution authorized to expend state general fund appropriations on research and
service programs of a statewide nature financed principally by state funds. As
applied in this section, research and service programs of a statewide nature shall be
programs requiring the establishment and operation of facilities or centers outside
of the primary service area of the institution. In carrying out its statewide mission,
the University of Kentucky shall conduct statewide research and provide statewide
services including, but not limited to, agricultural research and extension services,
industrial and scientific research, industrial technology extension services to
Kentucky employers, and research related to the doctoral, professional, and post-
doctoral programs offered within the university. The university may establish and
operate centers and utilize state appropriations and other resources to carry out the
necessary research and service activities throughout the state. The university may
enter into joint research and service activities with other universities in order to
accomplish its statewide mission. Nothing contained in this subsection shall limit
the authority of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] to establish instructional programs that are consistent
Page 71 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
with the strategic agenda.
Section 42. KRS 164.131 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The government of the University of Kentucky is vested in a board of trustees
appointed for a term set by law pursuant to Section 23 of the Constitution of
Kentucky.
(b) All appointed and elected persons shall be required to attend and complete an
orientation and education program prescribed by the authority[council] under
KRS 164.020(25), as a condition of their service and eligibility for
appointment or election to a second term.
(c) The board shall periodically evaluate the institution's progress in
implementing its missions, goals, and objectives to conform to the strategic
agenda. Officers and officials shall be held accountable for the status of the
institution's progress.
(d) Board members may be removed by the Governor under the following
circumstances:
1. For cause, pursuant to KRS 63.080(2); or
2. Pursuant to KRS 63.080(3) or (4).
(e) The board shall consist of sixteen (16) members appointed by the Governor,
two (2) members of the faculty of the University of Kentucky, one (1)
member of the University of Kentucky nonteaching personnel, and one (1)
member of the student body of the University of Kentucky. The members
appointed by the Governor shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate. The
voting members of the board shall select a chairperson annually.
(2) (a) The terms of the appointed members shall be for six (6) years and until their
successors are appointed and qualified, unless a member is removed by the
Governor pursuant to KRS 63.080(2), (3), or (4), except the initial
appointments shall be as follows:
Page 72 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
1. Two (2) members shall serve one (1) year terms;
2. Two (2) members shall serve two (2) year terms, one (1) of whom shall
be a graduate of the university, selected from a list of three (3) names
submitted by the alumni of the university according to rules established
by the board of trustees;
3. Three (3) members shall serve three (3) year terms;
4. Three (3) members shall serve four (4) year terms, one (1) of whom
shall be a graduate of the university, selected as under subparagraph 2.
of this subsection;
5. Three (3) members shall serve five (5) year terms; and
6. Three (3) members shall serve six (6) year terms, one (1) of whom shall
be a graduate of the university, selected as under subparagraph 2. of this
subsection.
(b) 1. Three (3) of the appointments shall be graduates of the university and
may include one (1) graduate of the institution who resides outside the
Commonwealth;
2. Three (3) shall be representative of agricultural interests; and
3. Ten (10) shall be other distinguished citizens representative of the
learned professions and may include one (1) who resides outside of
Kentucky.
(c) The Governor shall make the appointments so as to reflect proportional
representation of the two (2) leading political parties of the Commonwealth
based on the state's voter registration and the political affiliation of each
appointee as of December 31 of the year preceding the date of his or her
appointment, and to reflect no less than proportional representation of the
minority racial composition of the Commonwealth based on the total minority
racial population using the most recent census or estimate data from the
Page 73 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
United States Census Bureau. If the determination of proportional minority
representation does not result in a whole number of minority members, it shall
be rounded up to the next whole number. A particular political affiliation shall
not be a prerequisite to appointment to the board generally; however, if any
person is appointed to the board that does not represent either of the two (2)
leading political parties of the Commonwealth, the proportional representation
by political affiliation requirement shall be determined and satisfied based on
the total number of members on the board less any members not affiliated
with either of the two (2) leading political parties.
(d) Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made for the unexpired term in the
same manner as provided for the original appointments.
(3) The two (2) University of Kentucky faculty members shall be of the rank of
assistant professor or above. They shall be elected by secret ballot by all University
of Kentucky faculty members of the rank of assistant professor or above. Faculty
members shall serve for terms of three (3) years and until their successors are
elected and qualified. Faculty members shall be eligible for reelection, but they
shall be ineligible to continue to serve as members of the board of trustees if they
cease to be members of the faculty of the university. Elections to fill vacancies shall
be for the unexpired term in the same manner as provided for original elections.
(4) The nonteaching personnel member shall be any full-time staff member, excluding
the president, vice-presidents, academic deans, and academic department
chairpersons. The staff member shall represent all nonteaching university
employees, including but not limited to building facilities and clerical personnel.
The staff member shall be elected by secret ballot by the nonteaching employees.
The staff member shall serve a term of three (3) years and until a successor is
elected and qualified. The staff member shall be eligible for reelection, but a staff
member who ceases being an employee of the university shall not be eligible to
Page 74 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
continue to serve as a member of the board. Elections to fill vacancies shall be for
the unexpired term and shall be held in the same manner as provided for the
original election.
(5) The student member shall serve a one (1) year term beginning on July 1 after being
elected and sworn in as student body president and ending on the following June
30. If the student member does not maintain the position of student body president
or the status of a full-time student at any time during that academic year, a special
election shall be held to select a full-time student member. The elected student
member shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(6) The number of student and employee trustees of the University of Kentucky elected
to the board shall not exceed four (4).
(7) Unless specifically approved by the board of trustees under the provisions of KRS
164.367, no member of the administrative staff of the university shall be directly or
indirectly interested in any contract with the university for the sale of property,
materials, supplies, equipment, or services, with exception of compensation to the
two (2) faculty members, and the one (1) nonteaching personnel member.
(8) New appointees of the board shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.
(9) The inability of the board to hold regular meetings, to elect a chairperson annually,
to establish a quorum, to adopt an annual budget, to set tuition rates, to conduct an
annual evaluation of the president of the university, or to carry out its primary
function to periodically evaluate the institution's progress in implementing its
mission, goals, and objectives to conform to the strategic agenda shall be cause for
the Governor to remove all appointed members of the board and replace the entire
appointed membership pursuant to KRS 63.080(4).
Section 43. KRS 164.283 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Academic" means a student's official record of academic performance,
Page 75 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
including, but not limited to transcript of grades or other action taken by the
institution directly related to academic performance. The term "academic"
does not include any nonacademically-related action the institution may take.
(b) "Universities and colleges" means all state supported postsecondary
educational institutions in Kentucky.
(c) "Institution" means all public supported institutions of higher learning in
Kentucky.
(2) All student academic records shall be confidential and shall not require a student's
Social Security number to identify the student, with the exception of the exemptions
stated in subsections (3) to (9) of this section, and shall not be released by any
public supported institution of higher education in Kentucky, to any person,
organization, institution, group, or agency, except with the express consent of the
individual student. This confidentiality shall apply only to student academic
records, including, but not limited to, official transcript of grades.
(3) All student academic records shall be made available upon request to any agency of
the federal or state government for the purpose of determining a student's eligibility
for military service and shall include making such records available to local draft
boards. This authority shall be limited only to determining the student's eligibility
for military service and shall not be extended, except with the individual student's
consent as specified in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Any institution may provide the legal parents of any student under twenty-one (21)
years of age with a copy of the student's academic record.
(5) All student academic records shall be made available to any federal, state, or local
law enforcement agency, the Department of Juvenile Justice, and any court of law
upon written request.
(6) All student academic records shall be made available upon request to any grantor of
scholarships or loans based upon the maintenance of a satisfactory level of
Page 76 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
scholarship, but shall be for the official use of the grantors only.
(7) All student academic records shall be made available upon request to a public or
private junior college from which the individual student was graduated or to a
public or private secondary school from which the individual student was
graduated.
(8) All student academic records shall be made available upon request to the Kentucky
Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] for
professional academic research.
(9) All student academic records shall be made available upon request to any official of
the university or college in which the student is enrolled who is directly concerned
with the student's academic progress. This authority shall include but is not limited
to the individual student's academic adviser.
(10) This section shall be applicable to all academic records maintained by all public
postsecondary educational institutions in Kentucky.
Section 44. KRS 164.2844 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding KRS 164.020(8), the governing board of a Kentucky public
university may adopt a tuition policy whereby any veteran of the Armed Forces of
the United States or National Guard who is eligible for Post-9/11 GI Bill benefits or
any member of a Reserve component who enrolls as a student in the university as a
non-Kentucky resident is charged no more than the maximum tuition
reimbursement provided under the Post-9/11 GI Bill to public universities for
eligible Kentucky residents.
(2) Notwithstanding KRS 164.020(8), beginning with the 2017-2018 academic year, an
active member of the Kentucky National Guard who enrolls as a student in a
Kentucky public university as a non-Kentucky resident shall be considered a
Kentucky resident for tuition purposes.
(3) A member of the United States Armed Forces, or a spouse or dependent of a
Page 77 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
member, who is determined to be a Kentucky resident at the time of acceptance for
admission by a public postsecondary institution under the guidelines established by
the authority[council] shall not lose Kentucky residency status if the member is
transferred on military orders prior to the member, spouse, or dependent enrolling
in the institution for the academic term for which the member, spouse, or dependent
was accepted or while the student is enrolled. The member, spouse, or dependent
shall not lose Kentucky residency if he or she remains continuously enrolled in the
institution at the same degree level.
Section 45. KRS 164.2847 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Tuition and mandatory student fees for any undergraduate or graduate program of
any Kentucky public postsecondary institution, including all four (4) year
universities and colleges and institutions of the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System, shall be waived for a Kentucky foster or adopted child
who is a full-time or part-time student if the student meets all entrance requirements
and maintains academic eligibility while enrolled at the postsecondary institution,
and if:
(a) The student's family receives state-funded adoption assistance under KRS
199.555;
(b) The student is currently committed to the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services under KRS 610.010(5) and placed in a family foster home or is
placed in accordance with KRS 605.090(3);
(c) The student is in an independent living program and the placement is funded
by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(d) The student who is an adopted child was in the permanent legal custody of
and placed for adoption by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. A
student who meets the eligibility criteria of this paragraph and lives outside of
Kentucky at the time of application to a Kentucky postsecondary institution
Page 78 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
may apply for the waiver up to the amount of tuition for a Kentucky resident;
or
(e) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services was the student's legal custodian
on his or her eighteenth birthday.
(2) Tuition and mandatory student fees for any undergraduate program of any
Kentucky public postsecondary institution, including all four (4) year universities
and colleges and institutions of the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System, shall be waived for a Department of Juvenile Justice foster child who is a
full-time or part-time student if the student meets all entrance requirements and
maintains academic eligibility while enrolled at the postsecondary institution and
obtains a recommendation for participation from an official from the Department of
Juvenile Justice, and if:
(a) The student has not been sentenced to the Department of Juvenile Justice
under KRS Chapter 640;
(b) The student has been committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice for a
period of at least twelve (12) months;
(c) The student is in an independent living program and placement is funded by
the Department of Juvenile Justice;
(d) The parental rights of the student's biological parents have been terminated; or
(e) The student was committed to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services
prior to a commitment to the Department of Juvenile Justice.
(3) Upon request of the postsecondary institution, the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services shall confirm the eligibility status under subsection (1) of this section and
the Department of Juvenile Justice shall confirm the eligibility status and
recommendations under subsection (2) of this section of the student seeking to
participate in the waiver program. Release of this information shall not constitute a
breach of confidentiality required by KRS 199.570, 610.320, or 620.050.
Page 79 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(4) The student shall complete the Free Application for Federal Student Aid to
determine the level of need and eligibility for state and federal financial aid
programs. If the sum of the tuition waiver plus other student financial assistance,
except loans and the work study program under 42 U.S.C. secs. 2751-2756b, from
all sources exceeds the student's total cost of attendance, as defined in 20 U.S.C.
sec. 1087ll, the tuition waiver shall be reduced by the amount exceeding the total
cost of attendance.
(5) Except when extended in accordance with subsection (6) of this section, the student
shall be eligible for the tuition waiver:
(a) For entrance to the institution for a period of no more than four (4) years after
the date of graduation from high school or obtaining a high school
equivalency diploma; and
(b) For one hundred fifty (150) consecutive or nonconsecutive credit hours
earned, after first admittance to any Kentucky institution if satisfactory
progress is achieved or maintained up to age twenty-eight (28).
(6) The expiration of a student's eligibility under subsection (5)(a) of this section shall
be extended by the number of academic terms the institution determines the student
was unable to enroll for or complete due to serving:
(a) On active duty status in the United States Armed Forces;
(b) As an officer in the Commissioned Corps of the United States Public Health
Service; or
(c) On active service in the Peace Corps Act or the Americorps.
The original age limitation under subsection (5)(b) of this section shall be extended
by the total number of years during which the student was on active duty status. The
number of months served on active duty status shall be rounded up to the next
higher year to determine the maximum length of eligibility extension allowed.
(7) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Page 80 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Education] shall report nonidentifying data on graduation rates of students
participating in the tuition waiver program by November 30 each year to the
Legislative Research Commission.
(8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(a) Guarantee acceptance of or entrance into any postsecondary institution for a
foster or adopted child;
(b) Limit the participation of a foster or adopted student in any other program of
financial assistance for postsecondary education;
(c) Require any postsecondary institution to waive costs or fees relating to room
and board; or
(d) Restrict any postsecondary institution, the Department of Juvenile Justice, or
the Cabinet for Health and Family Services from accessing other sources of
financial assistance, except loans, that may be available to a foster or adopted
student.
Section 46. KRS 164.2891 is amended to read as follows:
Any university or postsecondary educational institution under the jurisdiction of the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education]
may have a faculty member as a voting member of its board of trustees or regents.
Section 47. KRS 164.295 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The six (6) state comprehensive universities:
(a) Shall provide, upon approval of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], associate and baccalaureate
programs of instruction;
(b) Shall provide, upon approval of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], graduate programs of
instruction at the master's-degree level in education, business, and the arts and
sciences, specialist degrees, and programs beyond the master's-degree level to
Page 81 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
meet the requirements for teachers, school leaders, and other certified
personnel; and
(c) Shall provide research and service programs directly related to the needs of
their primary geographical areas.
(2) A comprehensive university may provide:
(a) Programs of a community college nature in their own community comparable
to those listed for the Kentucky Community and Technical College System, as
provided in KRS 164.580;
(b) Upon approval of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], an advanced practice
doctoral program in nursing in compliance with KRS 314.111 and 314.131;
and
(c) Upon approval of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], one (1) or more additional
advanced practice doctoral programs.
(3) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education], in consultation with the Advisory Conference of Presidents pursuant to
KRS 164.021, shall develop criteria and conditions upon which an advanced
practice doctoral degree program may be approved. The criteria shall include but
not be limited to a determination of the academic and workforce needs for a
program, consideration of whether the program can be effectively delivered through
a collaborative effort with an existing program at another public university within
the Commonwealth, and the capacity of a university to effectively offer the
program. A university requesting approval of an advanced practice doctoral
program shall be required to provide assurance that funding for the program will
not impair funding of any existing program at any other public university.
(4) The authority[council] shall promulgate administrative regulations setting forth the
Page 82 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
agreed-on criteria and conditions identified under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The authority[council] shall review advanced practice doctorates consistent with its
review schedule for all other academic programs.
(6) A comprehensive university shall not:
(a) Offer the terminal degrees of Doctor of Philosophy or Doctor of Musical Arts;
doctor's degrees required for professional practice and licensure in medicine,
veterinary medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, pharmacy, law, or optometry; or
the primary degree required for professional practice and licensure in
architecture. The existing school of law at Northern Kentucky University is
exempted from the requirements of this paragraph; or
(b) Describe itself in official publications or in marketing materials as a research
university or research institution. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed
as precluding a comprehensive university from conducting basic, applied, or
translational research.
Section 48. KRS 164.2951 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2012-2013 academic year and each academic year thereafter for
first-time students enrolling in a public college or university, postsecondary
education institutions are encouraged to limit the credit-hour requirements to sixty
(60) credit hours for each associate of science or associate of arts degree program
and to one hundred twenty (120) credit hours for each bachelor of arts or bachelor
of science degree program, except in situations in which:
(a) Quality and content of a program would be negatively impacted; or
(b) A program must comply with specific program standards established by
external accreditation bodies.
(2) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education], in collaboration with the public universities and community and
technical colleges, shall:
Page 83 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(a) Facilitate the development and implementation of a statewide agreement for
alignment of Kentucky Community and Technical College System lower-
division associate of arts and associate of science coursework that shall be
accepted and fully credited to related bachelors degree programs by all public
universities. The agreement shall specify the general education learning
outcomes and program-specific prerequisite learning outcomes of the
coursework. Where applicable, curricula shall be reviewed to determine
comparability of core content standards required under KRS 164.302. The
agreement shall direct that the associate of arts and associate of science
coursework meeting the learning outcomes specified shall be accepted for
transfer and degree credit, whether earned as individual courses or within
block programs;
(b) Develop, implement, and maintain a Kentucky Community and Technical
College System statewide course numbering system for lower-division
general education and program-specific prerequisite courses that include the
same learning outcomes;
(c) Establish a statewide course classification system and procedures to monitor
the transfer and crediting of lower-division coursework, including a system of
ongoing assessment that ensures comparability for transfer purposes;
(d) Establish a procedure for approval of changes in learning outcomes at public
universities as described in subsection (3) of this section;
(e) Standardize credit-by-exam equivalencies and common passing scores for
national exams transferable for general education courses and program-
specific prerequisites courses;
(f) Develop policies to align statewide articulation and transfer procedures across
educational institutions, including admissions criteria, student declaration of
major, and student guidance and counseling policies designed to ensure that
Page 84 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
students pursuing an associate of arts or associate of science degree program
provide timely notification of their intention to transfer to a public university;
(g) Develop uniform data collection and reporting methods to facilitate and
ensure statewide and institutional compliance with course transfer and credit
requirements;
(h) Guarantee that, upon admission to a public university, graduates of an
associate of arts or an associate of science degree program approved by the
authority[council] in consultation with public universities shall be deemed to
have met all general education requirements;
(i) Provide that graduates of approved associate of arts and associate of science
degree programs of Kentucky public postsecondary institutions who complete
the prerequisite learning outcomes for a bachelor of arts or bachelor of science
program while fulfilling the requirements for an associate of art or associate
of science degree, shall not be required to repeat or to take any additional
lower-level courses to fulfill bachelor degree requirements in the same major,
and these students shall be granted admission to related upper-division
bachelors degree programs of a state public college or university on the same
criteria as those students earning lower-division credits at the university to
which the student transferred;
(j) Provide that graduates of approved associate of arts and associate of science
degree programs shall receive priority for admission to a state public
university over out-of-state students if they meet the same admission criteria;
(k) Establish a commonality in college transcripts to be used in all public colleges
and universities to facilitate transfer from community and technical colleges;
(l) Encourage private colleges and universities to collaborate with public
educational institutions in developing programs and agreement to expedite the
transfer of students and credits between institutions;
Page 85 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(m) Establish an appeals process to resolve disagreements between transferring
students and receiving educational institutions regarding the transfer and
acceptance of credits earned at another institution;
(n) Ensure that all articulation and transfer policies are consistent with the rules
and regulations established by all appropriate discipline-specific accrediting
bodies and institutional accrediting agencies as recognized by the United
States Department of Education; and
(o) Facilitate the development and implementation of a statewide standardized
articulation agreement to be executed by July 1, 2021, between public
colleges and universities and the Kentucky Department of Education for each
approved high school career pathway that leads to a postsecondary credential,
certification, license, or degree. Upon meeting the requirements of the
standardized articulation agreement, a student shall be awarded postsecondary
credit for prior learning at any public college or university.
(3) When an institution seeks to change learning outcomes for a bachelor of arts or
bachelor of science program that affect lower-division courses, the university shall
notify the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] and the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System of the proposed changes at the same time as the initiation of the university's
approval process. If it is determined that the proposed change will have an adverse
effect on transferability, the university proposing the change shall enter into
discussion with the authority[council] and the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System to verify there remains a clearly defined path to a bachelor's degree
for those students who plan to transfer from the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System to the public university.
Section 49. KRS 164.296 is amended to read as follows:
Vocational and nonvocational programs offered at the state universities shall be operated
Page 86 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
and administered by those universities consistent with the regulations developed by the
board of trustees or regents and approved by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] for the issuance of associate,
baccalaureate, or graduate degrees. Joint programming and articulation of vocational-
technical education nondegree programs with associate degree programs shall be pursued
between the Kentucky Community and Technical College System and other
postsecondary institutions when feasible. No public institution of higher education shall
offer any new program of a vocational-technical-occupational nature below the associate
degree level without the review of the board of regents for the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System and the approval of the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education]. The board of regents for the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System, with approval of the Kentucky
Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], may
contract with public institutions of higher education for the operation of specific
programs and projects.
Section 50. KRS 164.302 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Within thirty (30) days from March 25, 2009, each postsecondary education
institution shall plan and implement a process to develop core academic content
standards for reading and mathematics for introductory courses in the public
postsecondary education institutions.
(2) The process shall ensure that secondary educators are engaged with the
postsecondary education faculty and other content specialists in order that the
standards at each educational level are vertically aligned.
(3) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education], the Department of Education, and the postsecondary education
institutions are urged to merge activities, resources, and dissemination efforts as is
practical to eliminate duplication of effort and conflicting recommendations.
Page 87 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(4) All core academic standards for mathematics and reading in introductory courses
shall be completed by December 15, 2010, with a target completion date of
December 15, 2009, for the mathematics standards.
Section 51. KRS 164.321 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Eastern Kentucky University, Morehead State University, Murray State University,
Western Kentucky University, Kentucky State University, Northern Kentucky
University, and the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall each
be governed by a board of regents appointed for a term set by law pursuant to
Section 23 of the Constitution of Kentucky.
(a) Each board of the comprehensive universities shall consist of eight (8)
members appointed by the Governor, one (1) member of the teaching faculty,
one (1) member of the university nonteaching personnel, and one (1) member
of the student body of the respective university or college. The members
appointed by the Governor shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate. The
members of the board shall select a chairperson annually.
(b) The board of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall
consist of eight (8) members appointed by the Governor, two (2) members of
the teaching faculty, two (2) members of the nonteaching personnel, and two
(2) members of the student body. The members appointed by the Governor
shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate.
1. No more than three (3) appointed members of the board shall reside in
any one (1) judicial district of the Kentucky Supreme Court as of the
date of the appointment.
2. A change in residency of a gubernatorial appointee after the date of
appointment shall not affect the appointee's ability to serve or eligibility
for reappointment, except an appointee who assumes residency outside
the fifty (50) United States shall become immediately ineligible to serve.
Page 88 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] shall notify the appointee of his or her
ineligibility to serve.
3. In making initial appointments, the Governor shall act so as to provide
equal representation of the two (2) sexes. In filling vacancies, the
Governor shall act so as to provide, inasmuch as possible, equal
representation of the two (2) sexes by appointing a member of the sex
that is the lesser represented at the time of the appointment. If the
remaining membership already has an equal number of males and
females, the Governor may appoint a member of either sex.
(2) The terms of appointed members shall be for six (6) years and until their successors
are appointed and qualified, unless a member is removed by the Governor pursuant
to KRS 63.080(2), (3), or (4), except the initial appointments to the board of regents
for the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall be as follows:
(a) One (1) member shall serve a one (1) year term;
(b) One (1) member shall serve a two (2) year term;
(c) Two (2) members shall serve three (3) year terms;
(d) One (1) member shall serve a four (4) year term;
(e) One (1) member shall serve a five (5) year term; and
(f) Two (2) members shall serve six (6) year terms.
New appointees of a board of regents shall not serve for more than two (2)
consecutive terms.
(3) The gubernatorial appointments may include one (1) graduate of the respective
institution who resides outside the Commonwealth. Not more than two (2)
appointed members of any board shall be residents of one (1) county. The
appointments shall reflect the proportional representation of the two (2) leading
political parties of the Commonwealth based on the state's voter registration and the
Page 89 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
political affiliation of each appointee as of December 31 of the year preceding the
date of his or her appointment. A particular political affiliation shall not be a
prerequisite to appointment to any board generally; however, if any person is
appointed to a board that does not represent either of the two (2) leading political
parties of the Commonwealth, the proportional representation by political affiliation
requirement shall be determined and satisfied based on the total number of
members on the board less any members not affiliated with either of the two (2)
leading political parties. Membership on the board shall reflect no less than
proportional representation of the minority racial composition of the
Commonwealth based on the total minority racial population using the most recent
census or estimate data from the United States Census Bureau. If the determination
of proportional minority representation does not result in a whole number of
minority members, it shall be rounded up to the next whole number. Membership
on the board shall not be incompatible with any state office. A change in residency
after the date of appointment shall not affect a member's ability to serve nor shall it
prevent a member's eligibility for reappointment, except a member who assumes
residency outside the fifty (50) United States shall become immediately ineligible
to serve. The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] shall notify the appointee of his or her ineligibility to
serve.
(4) Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made in the same manner and within the
same time after the occurrence of the vacancy as regular appointments. The person
appointed shall hold the position for the unexpired term only.
(5) Each member of the board shall serve for the term for which the member is
appointed and until a successor is appointed and qualified, unless a member is
removed by the Governor pursuant to KRS 63.080(2), (3), or (4).
(6) (a) The faculty member of a comprehensive university shall be a teaching or
Page 90 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
research member of the faculty of his or her respective university of the rank
of assistant professor or above. The faculty member shall be elected by secret
ballot by all faculty members of his or her university of the rank of instructor,
assistant professor, or above. The faculty member shall serve for a term of
three (3) years and until his or her successor is elected and qualified. The
faculty member shall be eligible for reelection, but he or she shall not be
eligible to continue to serve as a member of the board if he or she ceases
being a member of the teaching staff of the university. Elections to fill
vacancies shall be for the unexpired term in the same manner as provided for
the original election.
(b) The faculty members of the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System shall be represented by one (1) faculty member elected from the
community colleges and one (1) faculty member elected from the technical
institutions to serve three (3) year terms and until their successors are named.
The faculty representative of each branch shall be elected by means of a
process established by the board. The faculty members may be reelected but
shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms. A faculty member shall
be ineligible to continue to serve as a member of the board if he or she ceases
to be a member of the faculty at one (1) of the institutions within the system.
Elections to fill vacancies shall be for the unexpired term in the same manner
as provided for the original election. These two (2) members shall collectively
have one (1) vote which may be cast one-half (1/2) vote by each member.
(7) (a) The nonteaching personnel member in a comprehensive university shall be
any full-time staff member excluding the president, vice presidents, academic
deans, and academic department chairpersons. He or she shall represent all
nonteaching university employees including, but not limited to, building
facilities and clerical personnel. The member shall be elected by secret ballot
Page 91 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
by the nonteaching employees. The nonteaching personnel member shall
serve a term of three (3) years and until a successor is elected and qualified.
The nonteaching personnel member shall be eligible for reelection, but he or
she shall not be eligible to continue to serve as a member of the board if he or
she ceases being an employee of the university. Elections to fill vacancies
shall be for the unexpired term in the same manner as provided for the
original election.
(b) The nonteaching personnel members in the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System shall be any full-time staff member excluding a
president, chancellor, vice president, academic dean, academic department
chair, or other administrator. They shall represent all nonteaching employees
in their respective branch institutions including, but not limited to, support
and clerical personnel. One (1) member shall be a representative from the
community colleges and one (1) member shall be a representative from the
technical institutions. They shall serve three (3) year terms and until their
successors are named. These two (2) members shall collectively have one (1)
vote which may be cast one-half (1/2) vote by each member. The nonteaching
personnel members of each branch shall be elected by means of a process
established by the board. A nonteaching personnel member may be reelected
but shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms. A nonteaching
employee shall be ineligible to continue to serve as a member of the board if
that employee ceases to be a nonteaching employee at one (1) of the
institutions within the system. Elections to fill vacancies shall be for the
unexpired term in the same manner as provided for the original election.
(8) (a) The student member on a comprehensive university board shall serve a one
(1) year term beginning on July 1 after being elected and sworn in as student
body president and ending on the following June 30. If the student member
Page 92 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
does not maintain the position as student body president or the status as a full-
time student at any time during that academic year, a special election shall be
held to select a full-time student member. The elected student member shall
serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(b) Two (2) full-time student members shall be elected to the board of regents for
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System. One (1) shall
represent students of the community colleges and one (1) shall represent the
technical institutions. The student members shall be elected by means of a
process established by the board. The student members shall serve one (1)
year terms beginning on July 1 after being elected and sworn in as a student
member of the board and ending on the following June 30. If the student
member does not maintain the status as a full-time student, a special election
shall be held to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term. The
two (2) members shall collectively have one (1) vote which may be cast one-
half (1/2) vote by each member.
(9) All appointed and elected persons shall be required to attend and complete an
orientation and education program prescribed by the authority[council] under KRS
164.020(25), as a condition of their service and eligibility for appointment or
election to a second term.
(10) Board members may be removed by the Governor under the following
circumstances:
(a) For cause, pursuant to KRS 63.080(2); or
(b) Pursuant to KRS 63.080(3) or (4).
(11) The inability of the board or boards of the comprehensive universities or Kentucky
Community and Technical College System to hold quarterly meetings, to elect a
chairperson annually, to establish a quorum, to adopt an annual budget, to set
tuition rates, to conduct an annual evaluation of the president of the university or
Page 93 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
system, to carry out its primary function to periodically evaluate the university's or
system's progress in implementing its mission, goals, and objectives to conform to
the strategic agenda, or to otherwise perform its duties under KRS 164.350 shall be
cause for the Governor to remove all appointed members of the board or boards and
replace the entire appointed membership pursuant to KRS 63.080(4).
Section 52. KRS 164.376 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise, "disability" has the
same meaning as the definition given in KRS 344.010.
(2) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall develop guidelines for the adoption of policies by postsecondary
education institutions with residence facilities that provide students with a disability
a safe environment in which to live and study.
(3) Each institution shall develop a housing and security policy in compliance with the
authority's[council's] guidelines that shall be visibly posted in each residence
facility, made available on campus computer networks to which students have
access, and included in all student housing information. The policies shall include,
but not be limited to, an appeals process that may be used by students, their parents,
or their advocates when they have reason to believe that the institution's policy or
the student's housing assignment does not reasonably accommodate the student's
disability or endangers the student's safety or health. The appeals process shall
mandate that the body assigned to hear the appeal shall not include representatives
of the original department that made the housing assignment that is being appealed.
(4) Each institution shall prepare at the beginning of each semester a list with the name
and residency assignment of each student with a disability, as reported to the
institution by the student or the student's parent or advocate, as appropriate. The list
shall be given to the campus housing and security authorities to be used in an
emergency to identify, locate, and act to help, protect, and if necessary, rescue the
Page 94 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
student with a disability.
Section 53. KRS 164.400 is amended to read as follows:
The respective boards of regents of the state universities and colleges and the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System shall establish such incidental fees and
nonresident tuition fees as will be sufficient for the purpose of paying the incidental
expenses of the university or college and as are consistent with the recommendations of
the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education]. No money derived from nonresident tuition or other fees paid by students
shall be used for any other purpose, except such amount as is over and above that needed
to defray the incidental expenses.
Section 54. KRS 164.476 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The "Lung Cancer Research Fund" is created and shall receive funds each year
from the Kentucky health care improvement fund in the amount specified in KRS
304.17B-003(5)(b). The lung cancer research fund shall be used to finance the Lung
Cancer Research Project described in subsection (5) of this section. No revenues
from the lung cancer research fund shall be allocated until the board has adopted the
strategic plan described in subsections (5) and (6) of this section.
(2) A research consortium between the University of Kentucky and the University of
Louisville is created and shall be known as the Governance Board of the Lung
Cancer Research Project. The consortium shall be attached to the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] for
administrative purposes.
(3) The board shall consist of nine (9) members appointed by the Governor as follows:
(a) Two (2) members shall be from the faculty of the School of Medicine at the
University of Kentucky;
(b) Two (2) members shall be from the faculty of the School of Medicine at the
University of Louisville;
Page 95 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(c) Two (2) members shall be from the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education]; and
(d) Three (3) members shall be from the state at large, one (1) of whom shall be
appointed chair by the Governor.
(4) Except as provided in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection, the terms of the
members shall be for four (4) years and until their successors are appointed and
confirmed. A vacancy on the board shall be filled for the remainder of the
unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment. Members may be
reappointed. The initial appointments shall be for staggered terms, as follows:
(a) Two (2) members shall be appointed for one (1) year;
(b) Two (2) members shall be appointed for two (2) years;
(c) Two (2) members shall be appointed for three (3) years; and
(d) Three (3) members shall be appointed for four (4) years.
(5) The Governance Board of the Lung Cancer Research Project shall develop and
oversee the implementation of a twenty (20) year strategic plan that utilizes the
resources of both the University of Louisville and the University of Kentucky in
establishing the Lung Cancer Research Project. The Lung Cancer Research Project
shall be a joint program to:
(a) Develop an expertise in the area of lung cancer research with an immediate
focus on early detection and epidemiology and with an ultimate goal of
eradication of lung cancer;
(b) Establish a statewide clinical trial network to make university-based clinical
trials available to the community physician in order to bring the most
innovative cancer treatments to all Kentuckians in need of these treatments;
(c) Leverage the resources earmarked for the Lung Cancer Research Project
toward the certification of the cancer program at the University of Kentucky
and the University of Louisville by the National Cancer Institute as a cancer
Page 96 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
center; and
(d) Undertake other initiatives consistent with the strategic plan.
(6) The strategic plan shall identify both short-term and long-term goals and the
appropriate oversights to measure progress toward achievement of those goals; it
shall be updated every two (2) years.
(7) The Governance Board of the Lung Cancer Research Project shall submit an annual
report to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission by September 1
each year for the preceding fiscal year, outlining its activities and expenditures.
(8) The Auditor of Public Accounts, on an annual basis, shall conduct a thorough
review of all expenditures from the lung cancer research fund and, if necessary in
the opinion of the Auditor, the operations of the Lung Cancer Research Project and
the lung cancer research fund.
Section 55. KRS 164.477 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Alternative format" means any medium or format for the presentation of
instructional materials other than standard print needed by a student with a
disability for a reading accommodation, including but not limited to braille,
large print texts, audio recordings, digital texts, and digital talking books;
(b) "Instructional material" means a textbook or other material published
primarily for use by students in a course of study in which a student with a
disability is enrolled that is required or essential to a student's success, as
determined by the course instructor. "Instructional material" includes
nontextual mathematics and science material to the extent that software is
commercially available to permit the conversion of the electronic file of the
material into a format that is compatible with assistive technologies such as
speech synthesis software or braille translation software commonly used by
students with disabilities;
Page 97 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(c) "Nonprinted instructional material" means instructional material in a format
other than print, including instructional material that requires the availability
of electronic equipment in order to be used as a learning resource, including
but not limited to software programs, videodiscs, videotapes, and audio tapes;
(d) "Printed instructional material" means instructional material in book or other
printed form;
(e) "Publisher" means an individual, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
that publishes or manufactures instructional material used by students
attending a public or independent postsecondary education institution in
Kentucky;
(f) "State Repository for Alternative Format Instructional Materials" or
"repository" means a consortium established or otherwise designated by the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] under subsection (8) of this section to serve as a state repository
for electronic files or alternative format instructional materials obtained from
publishers, created by institutions, or received through other means;
(g) "Structural integrity" means the inclusion of all of the information provided in
printed instructional material, including but not limited to the text of the
material sidebars, the table of contents, chapter headings and subheadings,
footnotes, indexes, and glossaries, but need not include nontextual elements
such as pictures, illustrations, graphs, or charts; and
(h) "Working day" means a day that is not Saturday, Sunday, or a national
holiday.
(2) The purpose of this section is to ensure, to the maximum extent possible, that all
postsecondary students with a disability in Kentucky requiring reading
accommodations, in accordance with Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act, 29
U.S.C. sec. 794, or the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. secs. 12101 et
Page 98 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
seq., including but not limited to students who are blind, are visually impaired, or
have a specific learning disability or other disability affecting reading, shall have
access to instructional materials in alternative formats that are appropriate to their
disability and educational needs.
(3) A publisher shall, upon fulfillment of the requirements of subsections (6) and (7) of
this section, provide to a postsecondary education institution or to the State
Repository for Alternative Format Instructional Materials, at no cost:
(a) Printed instructional material in an electronic format; and
(b) Nonprinted instructional material in an electronic format, when the
technology is available to maintain the material's structural integrity.
(4) Instructional material provided by a publisher in electronic format shall:
(a) Maintain the structural integrity of the original instructional material, except
as provided for in paragraph (b) subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Be compatible with commonly used braille translation and speech synthesis
software;
(c) Include corrections and revisions as may be necessary; and
(d) Be in a format that is mutually agreed upon by the publisher and the
requesting institution or the State Repository for Alternative Format
Instructional Materials. If good-faith efforts fail to produce an agreement as to
an electronic format that will preserve the structural integrity of the
instructional material, the publisher shall provide the instructional material in
XML (Extensible Markup Language), utilizing an appropriate document-type
definition suitable for the creation of alternative format materials, and shall
preserve as much of the structural integrity of the original instructional
material as possible.
(5) The publisher shall transmit or otherwise send an electronic format version of
requested instructional material within fifteen (15) working days of receipt of an
Page 99 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
appropriately completed request. Should this timetable present an undue burden for
a publisher, the publisher shall submit within the fifteen (15) working day period a
statement to the requesting entity certifying the expected date for transmission or
delivery of the file.
(6) (a) To receive an electronic format version of instructional material, a written
request shall be submitted to the publisher that certifies:
1. The instructional material has been purchased for use by a student with a
disability by the student or the institution the student attends or is
registered to attend;
2. The student has a disability that prevents the student from using the
standard instructional material; and
3. The instructional material is for use by the student in connection with a
course in which he or she is registered or enrolled.
(b) A publisher may also require a statement signed by the student or, if the
student is a minor, the student's parent or legal guardian, agreeing that the
student will:
1. Use the electronic copy of the instructional material solely for his or her
own educational purposes; and
2. Not copy or distribute the instructional material for use by others.
(7) The request for an electronic format version of instructional material shall be
prepared and signed by:
(a) The coordinator of services for students with a disability at the institution;
(b) A representative of the Division of Blind Services within the Office of
Vocational Rehabilitation in the Education and Labor Cabinet;
(c) A representative of the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation; or
(d) A representative of the State Repository for Alternative Format Instructional
Materials.
Page 100 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(8) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] may, to the extent funds are available, establish or otherwise designate a
consortium to be called the State Repository for Alternative Format Instructional
Materials to serve as a state repository for electronic files and alternative format
materials for the purpose of facilitating the timely access of appropriate alternative
instructional materials by postsecondary students with a disability.
(9) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] may promulgate administrative regulations governing the
implementation and administration of this section.
(10) The authority[council] shall work with representatives of each postsecondary
institution to develop policies and procedures designed to ensure to the maximum
extent possible that students with disabilities have access to instructional materials
in appropriate alternative formats within the first week of class.
(11) The authority[council], in consultation with appropriate entities, including but not
limited to the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation, the Kentucky Assistive
Technology Service Network, Recording for the Blind and Dyslexic, and the
Kentucky Association on Higher Education and Disability, shall include within its
annual status report on postsecondary education in Kentucky a continuing
assessment of the need for statewide technical assistance, training, and other
supports designed to increase the availability and effective use of alternative format
instructional materials.
(12) The State Repository for Alternative Format Instructional Materials or the
authority[council] may receive electronic files and alternative format materials
from:
(a) Publishers;
(b) Postsecondary education institutions that have created alternative materials for
use by a student with a disability;
Page 101 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(c) The Kentucky Department of Education, receiving electronic files from
publishers under the requirements of KRS 156.027; or
(d) Other sources.
(13) The repository or the authority[council] shall, upon receipt of documents as set
forth in subsection (6) of this section, provide at no cost copies of electronic files
and alternative format materials to:
(a) Postsecondary education institutions in Kentucky; and
(b) The Kentucky Department of Education, to assist in the implementation of the
requirements of KRS 156.027.
(14) The repository shall provide to a publisher, upon request:
(a) A summary of all electronic or alternative format versions of instructional
material from that publisher provided to students, postsecondary education
institutions, and the Kentucky Department of Education from its holdings; and
(b) Copies of requests and related certification documents received for
instructional materials from that publisher.
(15) The repository or the authority[council] may submit requests for electronic files to
publishers on behalf of institutions.
(16) (a) A postsecondary education institution or an educational instructor, assistant,
or tutor may assist a student with a disability by using the electronic format
version of instructional material as provided by this section solely to
transcribe or arrange for the conversion of the instructional material into an
alternative format, or to otherwise assist the student.
(b) If an alternative format version of instructional material is created, an
institution may, for the purpose of providing the version to other students with
disabilities, share that version with:
1. The repository;
2. A Kentucky postsecondary education institution serving a student with a
Page 102 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
disability; and
3. An authorized entity as defined under 17 U.S.C. sec. 121 that commonly
provides alternative format materials for use by students in Kentucky
institutions.
(17) The disk or file of an electronic format version of instructional material used
directly by a student shall be copy-protected, or reasonable precautions shall be
taken by the institution to ensure that the student does not copy or distribute the
electronic format version in violation of the Copyright Revisions Act of 1976, as
amended, 17 U.S.C. secs. 101 et seq.
(18) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to authorize any use of instructional
materials that would constitute an infringement of copyright under the Copyright
Revision Act of 1976, as amended, 17 U.S.C. secs. 101 et seq.
(19) Nothing in this section shall absolve covered entities from the obligation to provide
equivalent access to information technology and software as set forth in KRS
61.982.
(20) A publisher shall be considered a place of public accommodation for the purposes
of KRS 344.130. Failure to comply with the requirements of this section shall be an
unlawful practice of discrimination on the basis of disability for the purposes of
KRS 344.120.
Section 56. KRS 164.525 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Center for Mathematics is hereby created to make available professional
development for teachers in reliable, research-based diagnostic assessment and
intervention strategies, coaching and mentoring models, and other programs in
mathematics. The center shall be headed by an executive director and administered
by a public postsecondary education institution. The center shall:
(a) Act as a clearinghouse for information about professional development
programs for teachers that address mathematics diagnostic assessment,
Page 103 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
intervention programs, coaching and mentoring programs, and other
instructional strategies to address students' needs;
(b) Collaborate with Kentucky's other public and private postsecondary
institutions to develop teachers' mathematical knowledge needed for teaching
and help teachers improve students' mathematical concepts, thinking,
problem-solving, and skills, with an emphasis on diagnostic assessment and
intervention programs for students in the primary program;
(c) Provide teacher training to develop teacher leaders and teaching specialists in
primary programs who have skills in diagnostic assessment and intervention
services to assist struggling students or those who are at risk of failure in
mathematics. The center may contract for services in order to carry out this
responsibility;
(d) Maintain a demonstration and training site for mathematics located at each of
the public universities;
(e) Advise the Kentucky Department of Education and Kentucky Board of
Education regarding:
1. Early mathematics content, diagnostic assessment practices, and
intervention programs;
2. Costs and effectiveness of various mathematics intervention programs;
3. Coaching and mentoring models that help improve student
achievements;
4. Trends and issues relating to mathematics programs in schools
throughout the state; and
5. The establishment and implementation of the Middle School
Mathematics and Science Scholars Program established under KRS
158.848; and
(f) Disseminate information to teachers, administrators, and policymakers on an
Page 104 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
ongoing basis.
(2) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall select a location for the center no later than January 1, 2006. The
authority[council] shall use a request for proposal process. In developing the
request for proposal, the authority[council] shall seek advice from the Committee
for Mathematics Achievement created in KRS 158.842 and the commissioner of
education. The center shall be located at the selected university through July 1,
2011, unless funding is not available, the authority[council] deems the performance
of the institute to be inadequate, or the university requests to discontinue its
relationship to the institute. Contingent upon available funding at the end of the
initial cycle, and each five (5) year period thereafter, the authority[council] shall
issue a request for proposal to all public postsecondary education institutions to
administer the center.
Section 57. KRS 164.540 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education in Kentucky as defined in KRS 164.011] is hereby designated as the
agency of the Commonwealth of Kentucky charged with the responsibility and
vested with all necessary authority, subject to the conditions and restrictions set out
in subsection (2) of this section, to carry out the obligations, participate in the
planning and negotiations, and administer the rights, benefits, and privileges,
devolving upon the Commonwealth of Kentucky and its citizens pursuant to the
regional compact referred to in KRS 164.530, and to do all such other acts and
things as may be necessary or desirable to implement the provisions of said regional
compact efficiently and impartially for the benefit of all citizens of the
Commonwealth.
(2) In its participation in the regional compact, or in any other regional plan having a
similar purpose, the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall not erect, acquire, develop,
Page 105 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
or maintain in any manner any educational institution within its borders to which
any student would be refused entrance on the basis of race, national origin, gender,
creed, or religion.
(3) Notwithstanding any other law governing the offering of postsecondary education
in the state, the authority[council] shall be authorized to take the following actions
on behalf of the Commonwealth:
(a) Enter into the State Authorization Reciprocity Agreement, which establishes
uniform national standards for interstate offerings of postsecondary distance
education and authorizes postsecondary educational institutions meeting those
standards located in member states or territories to provide distance education
to residents of the Commonwealth;
(b) Serve as the lead or "portal" agency on behalf of the Commonwealth's public
and private postsecondary institutions seeking to offer distance education in
member states by:
1. Managing functional and administrative state responsibilities under the
State Authorization Reciprocity Agreement; and
2. Serving as the official contact for other states and students from other
states on matters pertaining to the agreement; and
(c) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
to establish procedures for participation by Kentucky postsecondary
institutions in the State Authorization Reciprocity Agreement.
Section 58. KRS 164.580 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Community and Technical College System is established. The
Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall provide:
(a) A general two (2) year academic curriculum with credits transferable to two
(2) year and four (4) year colleges and universities;
(b) Technical and semiprofessional programs of two (2) years or less;
Page 106 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(c) Within a two (2) year college curriculum, courses in general education,
including adult education, not necessarily intended for transfer nor technically
oriented; and
(d) Services to Kentucky's employers and the general public to provide
continuing education and customized training for purposes of improving the
knowledge and skills of Kentucky workers and citizens in all regions of the
state.
(2) The Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall be responsive to the
needs of students and employers in all regions of the Commonwealth with
accessible education and training to support the lifelong learning needs of Kentucky
citizens in order to:
(a) Increase the basic academic and literacy skills of adults through adult basic
education and remedial education services;
(b) Increase the technical skills and professional expertise of Kentucky workers
through associate and technical degrees, diploma, and certificate programs;
(c) Increase the access for students to complete the prebaccalaureate associate
degree in arts or associate degree in science for ease of transfer to four (4)
year institutions;
(d) Enhance the relationship of credentials between secondary and postsecondary
programs which permit secondary students to enter programs through early
admission, advanced placement, or dual enrollment;
(e) Facilitate transfers of credit between certificate, diploma, technical, and
associate degree programs;
(f) Develop a pool of educated citizens to support the expansion of existing
business and industry and the recruitment of new business and industry;
(g) Enhance the flexibility and adaptability of Kentucky workers in an ever-
changing and global economy through continuing education and customized
Page 107 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
training for business and industry;
(h) Promote the cultural and economic well-being of the communities throughout
Kentucky; and
(i) Improve the quality of life for Kentucky's citizens.
(3) Students attending a college under the administration of the board of regents for the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System may pursue three (3) kinds of
degree programs:
(a) Associate degree programs approved by the board of trustees as of the
effective date of the transfer of the management responsibilities of the
University of Kentucky Community College System to the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System;
(b) Associate degree programs developed by the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System, approved by the board of regents and the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education]. The board of regents shall confer degrees and award diplomas for
the approved programs; and
(c) Joint degree programs developed between the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System and other institutions.
(4) University of Kentucky Community College System students who were officially
enrolled on or before June 30, 1999, in associate degree programs approved by the
board of trustees of the University of Kentucky and who complete the associate
degree programs on or before June 30, 2004, shall have their degrees conferred by
the University of Kentucky board of trustees. The degrees for all other students
enrolled shall be awarded by the board of regents for the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System.
(5) The board of regents for the Kentucky Community and Technical College System
shall expedite, whenever possible, action on requests for any new technical or
Page 108 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
associate degree program of a vocational-technical or occupational nature.
(6) The Kentucky Community and Technical College System college faculty senates
shall have the primary responsibility for determining academic policy and curricula
development that shall be recommended to the president of the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System.
(7) Technical colleges, through their faculty and accrediting procedures, may develop
degree programs that shall be considered for approval by the board of regents and
the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education]. A graduate of a program within three (3) years of the program
becoming an accredited degree program shall receive all or partial credit toward the
degree, based on criteria established by the institution and approved by the board of
regents. The board of regents shall confer degrees and award diplomas for these
programs.
Section 59. KRS 164.5807 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Effective upon the affirmative completion of the regional accrediting agency's
substantive change process but not later than July 1, 1998, the board of trustees of
the University of Kentucky shall delegate to the board of regents of the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System the management responsibilities for the
University of Kentucky Community College System, except for the Lexington
Community College. Responsibilities shall include, but not be limited to,
management of facilities and grounds, assets, liabilities, revenues, personnel,
programs, financial and accounting services, and support services. In this capacity,
the board shall receive and disburse funds and handle other financial matters. The
board of regents, in exercising its personnel management responsibilities, shall
establish the operating policies and procedures for the University of Kentucky
employees in the community colleges. The board of regents shall have the right to
appoint and dismiss personnel and to set the compensation for the employees. The
Page 109 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
president and board of regents of the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System shall have jurisdiction over the use and distribution of the resources to
operate the system effectively and efficiently.
(2) All funds that are appropriated to the University of Kentucky Community College
System or funds that are allocated in the University of Kentucky budget for
administering the community college system shall be transferred and allotted to the
board of regents for the benefit of the University of Kentucky Community College
System.
(a) The board may divide the assets and funds among the specific organizations
and institutions within the community college system to meet the mission of
the system.
(b) Funds held in escrow or invested solely for the purpose of a community
college and bequests, and private funds specifically earmarked for a
community college may, at the discretion of that local community college, be
managed by the University of Kentucky or that local community college.
(c) Private funds, foundation funds, and funds raised by a not-for-profit or
nonprofit organization for the use and benefit of a specific program or
community college shall be used exclusively for that program or that
community college.
(3) Employees in the University of Kentucky Community College System as of the
effective date of the transfer of the management responsibilities of the University of
Kentucky Community College System to the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System shall be governed by the University of Kentucky administrative
regulations as of the effective date of the transfer and any subsequent changes made
by the university, except that appeals shall be to the board of regents or to the
board's designee. The following provisions shall apply:
(a) Accumulated sick leave, compensatory time, and annual leave as of the
Page 110 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
effective date of the transfer shall be retained by each employee;
(b) Employees with tenure shall retain their tenure. Employees without tenure
shall earn tenure based on personnel policies in effect at the time of their
employment. New employees without tenure shall earn tenure based on the
new policies established by the board;
(c) Employees shall maintain a salary not less than their previous salary as of the
effective date of the transfer; and
(d) All employees hired as of the effective date of the transfer shall be provided
the same benefit package available for other University of Kentucky
employees as it may be modified by the University of Kentucky for all
employees.
(4) A person employed as of the effective date of the transfer described in subsections
(1) and (3) of this section in a University of Kentucky Community College may
elect to participate in the new Kentucky Community and Technical College
personnel system. An employee who elects to accept this option may not return to
the previous personnel policy. The employee shall have the right to exercise this
option at any time.
(5) New employees hired after July 1, 1997, in the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System and on and after July 1, 2004, at the Lexington
Community College shall be governed by the rules established by the board.
(6) A regular full-time employee may, with prior administrative approval, take one (1)
course per semester or combination of summer sessions on the University of
Kentucky's campus or at a community college during the employee's normal
working hours. The University of Kentucky shall defray the registration fee up to a
maximum of six (6) credit hours per semester or combination of summer sessions.
(7) Students enrolled in the University of Kentucky Community College System shall
have all of the responsibilities, privileges, and rights accorded to University of
Page 111 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Kentucky Community College System students as of the effective date of the
transfer described in subsections (1) and (3) of this section. The privileges shall
include, but not be limited to, tickets to athletic events, homecoming queen
contests, the Great Teacher Award Contest, and the University of Kentucky
scholarship programs.
(8) If any conflict arises between the University of Kentucky board of trustees and the
Kentucky Community and Technical College board of regents relating to the
delegation of authority from the university to the board of regents in the transfer of
the Lexington Community College to the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] shall resolve the conflict.
(9) Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, the governance and management
responsibilities for the Lexington Community College are delegated to the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System. The agreement entitled
"Memorandum of Agreement Among the University of Kentucky, the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System and Lexington Community College
Pursuant to House Joint Resolution 214" signed by the respective institutions on
July 1, 2004, shall remain in force and effect after June 20, 2005.
Section 60. KRS 164.5833 is amended to read as follows:
The universities and the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall
recognize and accept for transfer credit all courses that were accepted for transfer prior to
the establishment of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System, unless a
substantial change in the content for teaching the course can be demonstrated to have
occurred. Disputes on these matters shall be settled by the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education].
Section 61. KRS 164.588 is amended to read as follows:
The Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall reimburse the University
Page 112 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
of Kentucky at a reasonable cost for any services provided to the system. The services
shall include, but not be limited to, library services, processing scholarships and student
loans, and all other financial aid services. The board may also contract for services from
other providers. The Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall not be
assessed by the University of Kentucky for rental charges or other similar fees for the use
of real or personal property. The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] shall resolve any disputes about services
to be provided and costs to be charged for the services.
Section 62. KRS 164.591 is amended to read as follows:
A community college or extension of a community college shall be maintained in each of
the following locations: Ashland, Carrollton, Cumberland, Elizabethtown, Glasgow,
Henderson, Hopkinsville, Fayette County, Madisonville, Owensboro, Paducah,
Prestonsburg, Somerset, Blackey-Hazard, Jefferson County and Mason County. The
headquarters of the administration of the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System shall be maintained in Woodford County. Western Kentucky University may
continue to operate a community college in Bowling Green. Additional extension centers
may be established by the board of regents for the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System with approval of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education]. New community colleges shall require
approval of the General Assembly.
Section 63. KRS 164.602 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a nominating commission for each college board of directors
required under KRS 164.600 to provide names of nominees to the Governor for
appointment to the board of directors.
(2) (a) Each nominating commission shall be composed of five (5) members
appointed by the Governor who shall reside in the service area of the college
at the time of their appointment. Commission members shall have no conflict
Page 113 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
of interest in accordance with KRS 45A.340 or have a relative employed by a
public postsecondary institution[, the Council on Postsecondary Education],
the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority, the Kentucky Higher
Education Student Loan Corporation, or the Kentucky Authority for
Educational Television.
(b) Members of the nominating commission shall serve four (4) year terms, or
until a successor shall be appointed, except the initial appointments shall be as
follows:
1. One (1) member shall serve a one (1) year term;
2. Two (2) members shall serve a two (2) year term;
3. One (1) member shall serve a three (3) year term; and
4. One (1) member shall serve a four (4) year term.
(3) The Governor shall appoint commission members who reflect, inasmuch as
possible, equal representation of the two (2) sexes and in the context of the total
membership of all of the commissions, shall approximate the proportional
representation of the two (2) leading political parties and the minority racial
composition of the state.
(4) (a) The nominating commission shall submit to the Governor the names of three
(3) nominees for each position on the board of directors who meet the
eligibility criteria for membership under KRS 164.600.
(b) In the selection of the nominees, the nominating commission shall consider
the needs of the respective college, locate potential appointees, review
candidates' qualifications and references, conduct interviews, and carry out
other search and screening activities as necessary. The commission shall
consider the goals for diversity of membership as set out in subsection (3) of
this section.
(c) Each appointment to the board of directors shall be made thirty (30) days
Page 114 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
prior to the expiration of a term or as soon as practicable following an
unforeseen vacancy. The Governor may reject all names of nominees and
request the submission of three (3) additional names for consideration.
(5) The members of the commissions shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary
expenditures incurred in the performance of their duties.
(6) The nominating commissions shall be attached to the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System and the Governor's office staff shall provide staffing and
administrative assistance.
Section 64. KRS 164.6029 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is created and established in the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] a Kentucky Rural Innovation
Program to provide awards to rural Kentucky-based, small companies to undertake
research, development, and entrepreneurial innovation work in partnership with
Kentucky postsecondary institutions, the Small Business Development Center
Network in Kentucky, and other entities engaged in research and development
work.
(2) The purpose of the Kentucky Rural Innovation Program is to:
(a) Accelerate knowledge transfer and technological innovation that improve
economic competitiveness and spur economic growth in rural, Kentucky-
based, small companies;
(b) Support entrepreneurial activities that have clear potential to lead to
commercially successful products, processes, or services within a reasonable
period of time;
(c) Stimulate growth-oriented enterprises within the Commonwealth;
(d) Encourage partnerships and collaborative projects between private enterprises,
Kentucky's postsecondary institutions, research organizations, and the Small
Business Development Center Network in Kentucky; and
Page 115 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(e) Promote research, development, and entrepreneurial activities that are driven
by private sector requirements.
Section 65. KRS 164.753 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In the instance of loans, the rules and regulations adopted by the board may include,
but not be limited to, those which:
(a) Are necessary to qualify the authority as an insured lender under the Higher
Education Act of 1965, as amended;
(b) Require that loans be made only to those eligible students who are unable to
secure comparable loans from private lenders; and
(c) Are necessary to qualify the authority as a lender under the Public Health
Service Act, as amended.
(2) In the instance of insured student loans and loan guarantees, the rules and
regulations adopted by the board shall include, but not be limited to, those which
are necessary to qualify the authority to insure loans under the federal act, as
amended, and following such qualification to issue loan guarantees to participating
lenders on any loans advanced by such lenders to eligible students attending or
planning to attend any participating institution.
(3) In the instance of scholarships, except scholarships provided pursuant to KRS
164.518, the rules and regulations adopted by the board shall include, but not be
limited to, those which:
(a) Specify ways in which superior academic achievement or ability or special
talents will be identified and measured;
(b) Ensure that the amount of scholarship to a student attending or planning to
attend a participating institution will not exceed the student's total cost of
attendance, or the maximum scholarship as established by the board,
whichever is less;
(c) Restrict scholarships to persons who are classified as resident students under
Page 116 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
the rules and regulations of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education];
(d) Ensure that scholarships are awarded only to eligible students who have
applied for such federal, state, or institutional student financial assistance
programs as the authority may require;
(e) Ensure that scholarships are awarded only to eligible students who are
planning to enroll, accepted for enrollment, or are enrolled in a participating
institution; and
(f) If eligibility for the scholarship is based on financial need, ensure, by such
needs analysis as the authority may require, that the person is in need of the
assistance in order to enroll in or complete an eligible program of study as
defined by the board.
(4) In the instance of grants, the rules and regulations adopted by the board shall
include, but not be limited to, those which:
(a) Ensure that the amount of a grant to a student will not exceed the financial
need of the student as determined in accordance with paragraph (e) of this
subsection or the maximum grant as established by the board, whichever is
less;
(b) Restrict grants to persons who are classified as resident students under the
rules and regulations of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education];
(c) Ensure that grants are awarded only to eligible students who have applied for
such federal, state, or institutional student financial assistance programs as the
authority may require;
(d) Ensure that grants are awarded only to eligible students who are planning to
enroll, accepted for enrollment, or are enrolled in a participating institution;
and
Page 117 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(e) Ensure, by such needs analysis as the authority may require, that grants be
made only to students who have insufficient financial resources to enroll in or
complete an eligible program of study as defined by the board.
(5) Funds appropriated to the financial assistance program established by KRS 164.780
and 164.785 shall be administered by the board in accordance with the provisions of
KRS 164.780 and 164.785.
(6) In the instance of work-study payments, rules and regulations adopted by the board
shall include, but not be limited to, those which require that:
(a) The employment opportunity available for the student will not interfere with
the student's normal progress toward a degree, diploma, or certificate;
(b) Contracts to promote increased employment opportunities for eligible students
will not result in the displacement of employed workers or impair existing
contracts for services; and
(c) The work-study payment will not exceed the financial need of the student or
the maximum payment as established by the board, whichever is less.
Section 66. KRS 164.7535 is amended to read as follows:
Notwithstanding KRS 164.753(4)(d), the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority may award college access program grants pursuant to KRS 164.753(4), to the
extent funds are available for the purpose, to financially needy part-time and full-time
undergraduate students, including students enrolled in a program of study designated as
an equivalent undergraduate program of study by the authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] in an administrative regulation. Grants shall be awarded only to students
enrolled or accepted for enrollment at participating institutions located within the
Commonwealth. Grants under this section shall be awarded only for attendance in a
program of study of at least two (2) academic years' duration. Grants under this section
shall be awarded only to students enrolled or accepted for enrollment for attendance in a
program of study that leads to a degree, except that grants shall be awarded to students
Page 118 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
enrolled or accepted for enrollment at publicly operated vocational-technical institutions
for attendance in a program of study that leads to a certificate, diploma, or degree or in a
comprehensive transition and postsecondary program. For purposes of this section, a
student enrolled in a comprehensive transition and postsecondary program shall be
considered a part-time student. Awards to recipients attending participating institutions
accredited by a regional accrediting association shall not exceed the prevailing amount
charged for tuition at publicly-supported community and technical colleges in Kentucky,
and awards to recipients attending other participating institutions shall not exceed the
prevailing amount charged for tuition at publicly operated vocational-technical
institutions in Kentucky. The provisions of this section shall not limit the authority's
capability to use funds appropriated for this purpose to match federal funds, make grant
awards, adopt administrative regulations that conform to the requirements of federal laws
and regulations for full participation in federally-funded student financial assistance
programs.
Section 67. KRS 164.785 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The State of Kentucky shall grant an amount as provided in KRS 164.780 and this
section to any applicant who meets the following qualifications:
(a) Is a Kentucky resident as defined by the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education]; and
(b) 1. Has been accepted by or is enrolled as a full-time student in a program
of study leading to a postsecondary degree at a Kentucky independent
college or university which is accredited by a regional accrediting
association recognized by the United States Department of Education
and whose institutional programs are not composed solely of sectarian
instruction;
2. Has been accepted by or is enrolled as a full-time student in a program
of study leading to a postsecondary degree at an out-of-state
Page 119 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
postsecondary education institution licensed by the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education]
to operate in Kentucky which is accredited by a regional accrediting
association recognized by the United States Department of Education
and whose institutional programs are not composed solely of sectarian
instruction; or
3. Has been accepted or is enrolled as a student in a comprehensive
transition and postsecondary program at an institution described in
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph. For purposes of this section, a student
enrolled in a comprehensive transition and postsecondary program shall
be considered a part-time student, and the grant amount shall be adjusted
accordingly by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority.
An otherwise eligible student having a disability defined by Title II of the
Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. secs. 12131 et seq.), certified by a
licensed physician to be unable to attend the eligible program of study full-
time because of the disability may also qualify under this paragraph; and
(c) Has not previously attended college or university more than the maximum
number of academic terms established by the authority in administrative
regulations.
(2) The amount of the tuition grant to be paid to a student each semester, or appropriate
academic term, shall be determined by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority.
(3) The maximum amount shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the average state
appropriation per full-time equivalent student enrolled in all public institutions of
higher education. Such tuition grants are to be calculated annually by the Kentucky
Higher Education Assistance Authority.
(4) The need of each applicant shall be determined by acceptable need analysis such as
Page 120 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
use of the free application for federal student aid in conjunction with Part E of the
federal act, 20 U.S.C. secs. 1087kk through 1087vv, and such other analyses as the
authority may determine, subject to the approval by the United States Secretary of
Education.
(5) An adjustment shall be made in the tuition grant of any student awarded a
scholarship from any other source provided the combination of grants and awards
exceeds the calculated need of the student.
(6) Accepted or enrolled students qualifying under the provisions of subsection (1)(b)
of this section prior to the 2011-2012 academic year shall be under those provisions
and continue under those provisions until June 30, 2014.
(7) Beginning with the 2011-2012 academic year, and each year thereafter:
(a) A student may enroll and receive a Kentucky tuition grant at any Kentucky
independent college or university whose institutional programs are not
composed solely of sectarian instruction and is accredited by:
1. The Southern Association of Colleges and Schools; or
2. a. A national accreditation agency that is recognized by the United
States Department of Education; and
b. Is a college or university eligible to receive federal funding under
20 U.S.C. secs. 1061 to 1063;
(b) Programs or campuses of any out-of-state postsecondary education institution
that is licensed by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] to operate in Kentucky and
whose institutional programs are not composed solely of sectarian instruction
shall be accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools in
order to qualify as an eligible institution in which a student may enroll and
receive a Kentucky tuition grant, except as provided in paragraph (c) of this
subsection; and
Page 121 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(c) Programs or campuses of any out-of-state postsecondary education institution
that is licensed by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] to operate in Kentucky and
whose institutional programs are not composed solely of sectarian instruction,
but in which accreditation by the Southern Association of Colleges and
Schools is not an option, shall be reviewed and approved by the Kentucky
Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] based on accreditation criteria that mirrors Southern Association
of Colleges and Schools accreditation criteria in order to qualify as an eligible
institution in which a student may enroll and receive a Kentucky tuition grant.
All costs associated with the institutional reviews shall be the responsibility of
the institution seeking approval by the authority[council]. The
authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] shall promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to carry out
the provisions of this paragraph.
Section 68. KRS 164.786 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Academic term" means the fall or spring academic semester;
(b) "Academic year" means July 1 through June 30 of each year;
(c) "Approved dual credit course" means a dual credit course developed in
accordance with KRS 164.098 and shall include general education courses
and career and technical education courses within a career pathway approved
by the Kentucky Department of Education that leads to an industry-
recognized credential;
(d) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(e) "Dual credit" has the same meaning as in KRS 158.007;
(f) "Dual credit tuition rate ceiling" means one-third (1/3) of the per credit hour
Page 122 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
tuition amount charged by the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System for in-state students;
(g) "Eligible high school student" means a student who:
1. Is a Kentucky resident;
2. Is enrolled in a Kentucky high school as a senior or junior;
3. Has completed a thirty (30) minute college success counseling session;
and
4. Is enrolled, or accepted for enrollment, in an approved dual credit course
at a participating institution;
(h) "Participating institution" means a postsecondary institution that:
1. Has an agreement with the authority for the administration of the Dual
Credit Scholarship Program;
2. Charges no more than the dual credit tuition rate ceiling per credit hour,
including any additional fees, for any dual credit course it offers to any
Kentucky public or nonpublic high school student;
3. Does not charge any tuition or fees to an eligible high school student for
an approved dual credit course beyond what is paid by the Dual Credit
Scholarship Program when the course is not successfully completed; and
4. Is a:
a. Kentucky Community and Technical College System institution;
b. Four (4) year Kentucky public college or university; or
c. Four (4) year private college or university that is accredited by the
Southern Association of Colleges and Schools and whose main
campus is located in Kentucky; and
(i) "Successfully completed" means a student receiving both secondary and
postsecondary credit upon completion of an approved dual credit course.
(2) To promote dual credit coursework opportunities at no cost to eligible Kentucky
Page 123 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
high school students, the General Assembly hereby establishes the Dual Credit
Scholarship Program.
(3) In consultation with the Education and Labor Cabinet, the authority shall administer
the Dual Credit Scholarship Program and shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as may be needed for the
administration of the program.
(4) (a) Each high school shall apply to the authority for dual credit scholarship funds
for each eligible high school student.
(b) The authority may award a dual credit scholarship to an eligible high school
student for an academic term to the extent funds are available for that purpose,
except that a scholarship shall be awarded to an eligible high school senior
prior to awarding an eligible high school junior.
(c) An eligible high school student may receive a dual credit scholarship for a
maximum of two (2) successfully completed dual credit courses.
(d) The dual credit scholarship award amount shall be equal to the amount
charged by a participating institution, not to exceed the dual credit tuition rate
ceiling for each dual credit hour, except the scholarship amount shall be
reduced by fifty percent (50%) if the dual credit course is not successfully
completed by the student.
(e) Dual credit scholarship funds shall not be used for remedial or developmental
coursework.
(5) Each participating institution shall submit information each academic term to the
authority required for the administration of the scholarship as determined by the
authority.
(6) Beginning August 1, 2017, and each year thereafter, the authority shall provide a
report to the secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet[, the president of the
Council on Postsecondary Education], and the commissioner of the Kentucky
Page 124 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Department of Education to include:
(a) The number of students, by local school district and in total, served by the
Dual Credit Scholarship Program; and
(b) The number of dual credits earned by students by high school and in total.
(7) By May 31, 2019, and each year thereafter, the Kentucky Center for Education and
Workforce Statistics, in collaboration with the authority, shall publish data on the
Dual Credit Scholarship Program's academic and workforce outcomes. The center
shall annually provide a report on the data to the Interim Joint Committee on
Education.
(8) (a) The Dual Credit Scholarship Program trust fund is hereby created as a trust
fund in the State Treasury to be administered by the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority for the purpose of providing scholarships
described in this section.
(b) The trust fund shall consist of state general fund appropriations, gifts and
grants from public and private sources, and federal funds. All moneys
included in the fund shall be appropriated for the purposes set forth in this
section.
(c) Any unalloted or unencumbered balances in the trust fund shall be invested as
provided in KRS 42.500(9). Income earned from the investments shall be
credited to the trust fund.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year
shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year and
continuously appropriated only for the purposes specified in this section.
Section 69. KRS 164.787 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly hereby establishes the Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship
Program to ensure that all Kentuckians who have not yet earned a postsecondary
degree have affordable access to an industry-recognized certificate, diploma, or
Page 125 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
associate of applied science degree and, for students with intellectual disabilities
enrolled in comprehensive transition and postsecondary programs, affordable
access to meaningful credentials to prepare for competitive integrated employment.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Academic term" means a fall, spring, or summer academic term or other time
period specified in an administrative regulation promulgated by the authority;
(b) "Academic year" means July 1 through June 30 of each year;
(c) "Approved dual credit course" means a dual credit course developed in
accordance with KRS 164.098 that is a career and technical education course
within a career pathway approved by the Kentucky Department of Education
that leads to an industry-recognized credential;
(d) "Dual credit tuition rate ceiling" means the same as defined in 164.786;
(e) "Eligible institution" means an institution defined in KRS 164.001 that:
1. Actively participates in the federal Pell Grant program;
2. Executes a contract with the authority on terms the authority deems
necessary or appropriate for the administration of its programs;
3. Charges no more than the dual credit tuition rate ceiling per credit hour,
including any additional fees, for any dual credit course it offers to any
Kentucky public or nonpublic high school student; and
4. Is a:
a. Kentucky Community and Technical College System institution;
b. Kentucky public university; or
c. College, university, or vocational-technical school that is
accredited by a recognized regional or national accrediting body
and licensed to operate at a site in Kentucky;
(f) "Eligible program of study" means a program approved by the authority that
leads to an industry-recognized certificate, diploma, or associate of applied
Page 126 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
science degree in one (1) of Kentucky's top five (5) high-demand workforce
sectors identified by the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board and the
Education and Labor Cabinet or a program of study in a comprehensive
transition and postsecondary program that leads to a credential, certificate,
diploma, or degree;
(g) "Fees" means mandatory fees charged by an eligible institution for enrollment
in a course, including but not limited to online course fees, lab fees, and
administrative fees. "Fees" does not include tools, books, or other
instructional materials that may be required for a course; and
(h) "Tuition" means the in-state tuition charged to all students as a condition of
enrollment in an eligible institution.
(3) In consultation with the Education and Labor Cabinet[,] and the Kentucky
Department of Education,[ and the Council on Postsecondary Education,] the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority shall administer the Work Ready
Kentucky Scholarship Program and promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as may be needed for the administration of the
scholarship.
(4) An eligible high school student shall:
(a) Be a Kentucky resident;
(b) Be enrolled in a Kentucky high school;
(c) Be enrolled, or accepted for enrollment, in an approved dual credit course at
an eligible institution; and
(d) Complete and submit a Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship dual credit
application to the authority.
(5) An eligible workforce student shall:
(a) Be a citizen or permanent resident of the United States;
(b) Be a Kentucky resident as determined by the eligible institution in accordance
Page 127 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
with criteria established by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] for the purposes of admission
and tuition assessment;
(c) 1. Have earned a high school diploma or a High School Equivalency
Diploma or be enrolled in a High School Equivalency Diploma
program; or
2. For a student enrolled in a comprehensive transition and postsecondary
program, have received an alternative high school diploma described in
KRS 158.140(2)(b) or have attended a Kentucky public high school and
is a student with an intellectual disability as defined in 34 C.F.R. sec.
668.231;
(d) Not have earned an associate's degree or higher level postsecondary degree;
(e) Complete the Free Application for Federal Student Aid for the academic year
in which the scholarship is awarded;
(f) Complete and submit a Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship application to the
authority;
(g) Enroll in an eligible program of study at an eligible institution;
(h) Not be enrolled in an ineligible degree program, such as a bachelor or
unapproved associate program, at any postsecondary institution;
(i) Following the first academic term scholarship funds are received, achieve and
maintain satisfactory academic progress as determined by the eligible
institution; and
(j) Not be in default on any program under Title IV of the federal act or any
obligation to the authority under any program administered by the authority
under KRS 164.740 to 164.7891 or 164.7894, except that ineligibility for this
reason may be waived by the authority for cause.
(6) (a) Beginning with the 2019-2020 academic year, the authority shall award a
Page 128 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship each academic term to any person who
meets the requirements of this section to the extent funds are available for that
purpose.
(b) The scholarship amount awarded to an eligible workforce student for an
academic term shall be the amount remaining after subtracting the student's
federal and state grants and scholarships from the maximum scholarship
amount. The maximum scholarship amount shall be the per credit hour in-
state tuition rate at the Kentucky Community and Technical College System
multiplied by the number of credit hours in which the student is enrolled and
the fees charged to the student. The authority shall promulgate an
administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to specify the
maximum amount to be awarded for fees, except that for the 2019-2020
academic year the amount awarded for fees shall not exceed four hundred
dollars ($400).
(c) The scholarship award for an eligible high school student shall be limited to
two (2) approved dual credit courses per academic year. The scholarship
amount awarded shall be equal to the amount charged by an eligible
institution for an approved dual credit course, in accordance with subsection
(2)(e)3. of this section.
(7) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, an eligible workforce
student's eligibility for the scholarship shall terminate upon the earlier of:
1. Receiving the scholarship for a total of sixty (60) credit hours; or
2. Obtaining an associate's degree.
(b) For an eligible workforce student enrolled in a comprehensive transition and
postsecondary program, eligibility for the scholarship shall terminate upon the
earlier of completing the program or receiving the scholarship for up to nine
(9) academic terms within three (3) academic years.
Page 129 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(8) The authority shall annually provide a report on the Work Ready Kentucky
Scholarship Program, prepared in collaboration with the Office for Education and
Workforce Statistics, to the secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet that
includes, by academic term, academic year, institution, and workforce sector, the
number of:
(a) Students served by the scholarship and the total amount disbursed;
(b) Credits, certificates, diplomas, and associate of applied science degrees earned
by students receiving the scholarship; and
(c) Students receiving the scholarship who are enrolled in a comprehensive
transition and postsecondary program and credentials earned by those
students.
(9) The authority shall report Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship program data to the
Office for Education and Workforce Statistics for analysis of the program's success
in meeting the goal of increasing skilled workforce participation rates.
(10) (a) The Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship fund is hereby created as a trust fund
in the State Treasury to be administered by the authority for the purpose of
providing scholarships as described in this section.
(b) The trust fund shall consist of state general fund appropriations, gifts and
grants from public and private sources, and federal funds. All moneys
included in the fund shall be appropriated for the purposes set forth in this
section.
(c) Any unallotted or unencumbered balances in the trust fund shall be invested
as provided in KRS 42.500(9). Income earned from the investments shall be
credited to the trust fund.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year
shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year and
continuously appropriated only for the purposes specified in this section.
Page 130 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Section 70. KRS 164.7870 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly hereby establishes the Optometry Scholarship Program to
provide eligible Kentucky students the opportunity to attend an accredited school of
optometry to become certified practitioners rendering medical service in the
Commonwealth.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(b) "Eligible institution" means an accredited school of optometry that:
1. Is the Kentucky College of Optometry; or
2. a. Has a main campus outside the Commonwealth; and
b. Executes an agreement with the authority on terms the authority
deems necessary or appropriate for administration of the program;
(c) "Eligible program of study" means a program accredited by the Accreditation
Council on Optometric Education that leads to a Doctor of Optometry degree;
(d) "Eligible student" means any person who:
1. Is a United States citizen;
2. Is a Kentucky resident as determined by the institution in accordance
with criteria established by the authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] for the purposes of admission and tuition assessment;
3. Is enrolled or accepted for enrollment at an eligible institution in an
eligible program of study on a full-time basis;
4. Completes and submits an optometry scholarship application to the
authority; and
5. Is not in default on any program under Title IV of the federal act or any
obligation to the authority under any program administered by the
authority under KRS 164.740 to 164.785 or 164.7894, except that
ineligibility for this reason may be waived by the authority for cause;
Page 131 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
and
(e) "Optometry Scholarship Committee" means a group of individuals selected in
accordance with regulations promulgated by the authority whose membership
shall be composed of:
1. A representative from the Kentucky Optometric Association;
2. A representative from the Kentucky College of Optometry;
3. Two (2) at-large members with optometric education experience; and
4. One (1) representative from an eligible institution located outside the
Commonwealth.
(3) The authority shall administer the Optometry Scholarship Program and shall
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as may
be needed for the administration of the program.
(4) Beginning with the 2021-2022 academic year, the authority may award an
optometry scholarship under this section, to the extent funds are available for that
purpose, to any eligible student who is selected by the Optometry Scholarship
Committee to be a recipient.
(5) A minimum of one-third (1/3) of the amount appropriated for scholarships under
this section shall be awarded to eligible students attending an eligible institution
located in the Commonwealth.
(6) Should funds be insufficient to award all eligible students, those previously
receiving tuition assistance through the optometry contract spaces program
administered by the authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] shall receive
priority until such time they complete or withdraw from an eligible program of
study or have received assistance for four (4) years of study.
(7) The authority shall provide an annual report on the Optometry Scholarship Program
to the General Assembly that includes the:
(a) Number of students served by the scholarship, the total amount disbursed, and
Page 132 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
distribution by institution;
(b) Number of recipients completing an eligible program and the number
practicing in Kentucky following program completion; and
(c) Geographic distribution and occupational demand of optometrists in the state.
(8) (a) The Optometry Scholarship Program fund is hereby created as a trust fund in
the State Treasury to be administered by the authority for the purpose of
providing scholarships described in this section.
(b) The trust fund shall consist of state general fund appropriations, gifts and
grants from public and private sources, and federal funds. All moneys
included in the fund shall be appropriated for the purposes set forth in this
section.
(c) Any unalloted or unencumbered balances in the trust fund shall be invested as
provided in KRS 42.500(9). Income earned from the investments shall be
credited to the trust fund.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year
shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year and
continuously appropriated only for the purposes specified in this section.
Section 71. KRS 164.7874 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 164.7871 to 164.7885:
(1) "Academic term" means a semester or other time period specified in an
administrative regulation promulgated by the authority;
(2) "Academic year" means a period consisting of at least the minimum school term, as
defined in KRS 158.070;
(3) "ACT score" means the composite score achieved on the American College Test at
a national test site on a national test date or the college admissions examination
administered statewide under KRS 158.6453(5)(b)5. if the exam is the ACT, or an
equivalent score, as determined by the authority, on the SAT administered by the
Page 133 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
College Board, Inc.;
(4) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(5) "Award period" means the fall and spring consecutive academic terms within one
(1) academic year;
(6) ["Council" means the Council on Postsecondary Education created under KRS
164.011;
(7) ]"Eligible high school student" means any person who:
(a) Is a citizen, national, or permanent resident of the United States and Kentucky
resident;
(b) Was enrolled after July 1, 1998:
1. In a Kentucky high school for at least one hundred forty (140) days of
the minimum school term unless exempted by the authority's executive
director upon documentation of extreme hardship, while meeting the
KEES curriculum requirements, and was enrolled in a Kentucky high
school at the end of the academic year;
2. In a Kentucky high school for the fall academic term of the senior year
and who:
a. Was enrolled during the entire academic term;
b. Completed the high school's graduation requirements during the
fall academic term; and
c. Was not enrolled in a secondary school during any other academic
term of that academic year; or
3. In the Gatton Academy of Mathematics and Science in Kentucky, the
Craft Academy for Excellence in Science and Mathematics, or in high
school at a model and practice school under KRS 164.380 while meeting
the Kentucky educational excellence scholarship curriculum
requirements;
Page 134 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(c) Has a grade point average of 2.5 or above at the end of any academic year
beginning after July 1, 1998, or at the end of the fall academic term for a
student eligible under paragraph (b) 2. of this subsection; and
(d) Is not a convicted felon;
(7)[(8)] "Eligible postsecondary student" means a citizen, national, or permanent
resident of the United States and Kentucky resident, as determined by the
participating institution in accordance with criteria established by the
authority[council] for the purposes of admission and tuition assessment, who:
(a) Earned a KEES award;
(b) Has the required postsecondary GPA and credit hours required under KRS
164.7881;
(c) Has remaining semesters of eligibility under KRS 164.7881;
(d) Is enrolled in a participating institution as a part-time or full-time student; and
(e) Is not a convicted felon;
(8)[(9)] "Full-time student" means a student enrolled in a postsecondary program of
study that meets the full-time student requirements of the participating institution in
which the student is enrolled;
(9)[(10)] "Grade point average" or "GPA" means the grade point average earned by an
eligible student and reported by the high school or participating institution in which
the student was enrolled based on a scale of 4.0 or its equivalent if the high school
or participating institution that the student attends does not use the 4.0 grade scale;
(10)[(11)] "High school" means any Kentucky public high school, the Gatton Academy
of Mathematics and Science in Kentucky, the Craft Academy for Excellence in
Science and Mathematics, a high school of a model and practice school under KRS
164.380, and any private, parochial, or church school located in Kentucky that has
been certified by the Kentucky Board of Education as voluntarily complying with
curriculum, certification, and textbook standards established by the Kentucky Board
Page 135 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
of Education under KRS 156.160;
(11)[(12)] "KEES" or "Kentucky educational excellence scholarship" means a
scholarship provided under KRS 164.7871 to 164.7885;
(12)[(13)] "KEES award" means:
(a) For an eligible high school student, the sum of the KEES base amount for
each academic year of high school plus any KEES supplemental amount, as
adjusted pursuant to KRS 164.7881; and
(b) For a student eligible under KRS 164.7879(3)(e), the KEES supplemental
amount as adjusted pursuant to KRS 164.7881;
(13)[(14)] "KEES award maximum" means the sum of the KEES base amount earned in
each academic year of high school plus any KEES supplemental amount earned;
(14)[(15)] "KEES base amount" or "base amount" means the amount earned by an
eligible high school student based on the student's GPA pursuant to KRS 164.7879;
(15)[(16)] "KEES curriculum" means five (5) courses of study, except for students who
meet the criteria of subsection (6)[(7)](b)2. of this section, in an academic year as
determined in accordance with an administrative regulation promulgated by the
authority;
(16)[(17)] "KEES supplemental amount" means the amount earned by an eligible student
based on the student's ACT score pursuant to KRS 164.7879;
(17)[(18)] "KEES trust fund" means the Wallace G. Wilkinson Kentucky educational
excellence scholarship trust fund;
(18)[(19)] "On track to graduate" means the number of cumulative credit hours earned as
compared to the number of hours determined by the postsecondary education
institution as necessary to complete a bachelor's degree by the end of eight (8)
academic terms or ten (10) academic terms if a student is enrolled in an
undergraduate program that requires five (5) years of study;
(19)[(20)] "Participating institution" means an "institution" as defined in KRS 164.001
Page 136 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
that is eligible to participate in the federal Pell Grant program, executes a contract
with the authority on terms the authority deems necessary or appropriate for the
administration of its programs, and:
(a) 1. Is publicly operated;
2. Is licensed by the Commonwealth of Kentucky and has operated for at
least ten (10) years, offers an associate or baccalaureate degree program
of study not comprised solely of sectarian instruction, and admits as
regular students only high school graduates, recipients of a High School
Equivalency Diploma, or students transferring from another accredited
degree granting institution; or
3. Is designated by the authority as an approved out-of-state institution that
offers a degree program in a field of study that is not offered at any
institution in the Commonwealth; and
(b) Continues to commit financial resources to student financial assistance
programs; and
(20)[(21)] "Part-time student" means a student enrolled in a postsecondary program of
study who does not meet the full-time student requirements of the participating
institution in which the student is enrolled and who is enrolled for at least six (6)
credit hours, or the equivalent for an institution that does not use credit hours.
Section 72. KRS 164.7884 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Academic year" means July 1 through June 30 of each year;
(b) "Apprentice" has the same meaning as in KRS 343.010;
(c) "Approved workforce solutions training program" means a local high-demand
work sector training program that is approved by the authority and is offered
by the Kentucky Community and Technical College System through
consultation with representatives of the local workforce development area and
Page 137 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
the local Kentucky Community and Technical College System campus where
the program will be offered;
(d) "Eligible college of art and design" means a college that:
1. Qualifies as a tax exempt organization pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code:
2. Is conditionally or unconditionally licensed by the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education];
3. Is a candidate for accreditation by a regional accrediting association
recognized by the United States Department of Education;
4. Has its main campus physically located in Kentucky;
5. Limits its degree program offerings to the area of fine arts; and
6. Does not qualify as a participating institution as defined in KRS
164.7874;
(e) "Eligible student" means an eligible high school student who has graduated
from high school or a student eligible under KRS 164.7879(3)(e);
(f) "Proprietary school" means a school that:
1. Is licensed by the Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education;
2. Has operated for at least five (5) years;
3. Has its headquarters or main campus physically located in Kentucky;
and
4. Does not qualify as a participating institution under KRS 164.7874
(19)[(20)];
(g) "Qualified proprietary school program" means a program offered by a
proprietary school that is in the field of agriculture as defined in KRS 246.010
or is in one (1) of Kentucky's top five (5) high-demand work sectors as
determined by the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board;
(h) "Qualified workforce training program" means a program that is in one (1) of
Page 138 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Kentucky's top five (5) high-demand work sectors as determined by the
Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board;
(i) "Registered apprenticeship program" means an apprenticeship program that:
1. Is established in accordance with the requirements of KRS Chapter 343;
2. Requires a minimum of two thousand (2,000) hours of on-the-job work
experience;
3. Requires a minimum of one hundred forty-four (144) hours of related
instruction for each year of the apprenticeship; and
4. Is approved by the Education and Labor Cabinet;
(j) "Related instruction" has the same meaning as in KRS 343.010; and
(k) "Sponsor" has the same meaning as in KRS 343.010.
(2) Notwithstanding KRS 164.7881, an eligible student who earned a KEES award
shall be eligible for a Kentucky educational excellence scholarship if the student
meets the requirements of this section and is:
(a) An apprentice in a registered apprenticeship program;
(b) Enrolled in a qualified workforce training program that has a current
articulation agreement for postsecondary credit hours with a participating
institution;
(c) Enrolled in a qualified proprietary school program;
(d) Enrolled in an approved workforce solutions training program; or
(e) Enrolled in an eligible college of art and design.
(3) (a) Beginning with the 2018-2019 academic year, an eligible student enrolled in a
registered apprenticeship program or, for the academic year beginning July 1,
2020, an eligible student enrolled in a qualified workforce training program
or, for the academic year beginning July 1, 2023, an eligible student enrolled
in a qualified proprietary school program, an approved workforce solutions
training program, or an eligible college of art and design, may receive
Page 139 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
reimbursement of tuition, books, required tools, and other approved expenses
required for participation in the program, upon certification by the sponsor,
school, or college and approval by the authority.
(b) The reimbursement amount an eligible student may receive in an academic
year shall not exceed the student's KEES award maximum.
(c) The total reimbursement amount an eligible student may receive under this
section shall not exceed the student's KEES award maximum multiplied by
four (4).
(4) Eligibility for a KEES scholarship under this section shall terminate upon the earlier
of:
(a) The expiration of five (5) years following the eligible student's graduation
from high school or receiving a High School Equivalency Diploma, except as
provided in KRS 164.7881(5); or
(b) The eligible student's successful completion of the registered apprenticeship
program, qualified workforce training program, qualified proprietary school
program, or approved workforce solutions training program.
(5) The authority shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing the
procedures for making awards under this section in consultation with the Kentucky
Education and Labor Cabinet and the Kentucky Economic Development Cabinet.
Section 73. KRS 164.7890 is amended to read as follows:
(1) To ensure the public health purpose of access to pharmaceutical services in the
coal-producing counties of the Commonwealth, which have been traditionally
underserved for pharmaceutical services due to a shortage of pharmacists in the
Commonwealth, the General Assembly hereby establishes a coal county scholarship
program to provide eligible Kentucky students the opportunity to attend an
accredited school of pharmacy or a provisionally accredited school of pharmacy in
the Commonwealth, and to become certified pharmacists in the Commonwealth,
Page 140 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
provided that the scholarship recipient agrees to practice pharmacy in a coal-
producing county for each year a scholarship is provided.
(2) "Coal-producing county" as used in this section has the same meaning as in KRS
42.4592(1)(c).
(3) The authority may award scholarships, to the extent funds are available for that
purpose, to any person who:
(a) Is a Kentucky resident;
(b) Is considered a permanent resident of a coal-producing county for at least one
(1) year immediately preceding July 1 of the academic year in which the
scholarship is made for students who first receive a scholarship under this
section on or after July 1, 2014;
(c) Is a United States citizen as determined by the institution in accordance with
criteria established by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] for the purposes of admission
and tuition assessment;
(d) Is enrolled or accepted for enrollment in a Pharm.D. program at an accredited
institution or a provisionally accredited institution in the Commonwealth on a
full-time basis, or is a student who has a disability defined by Title II of the
Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. secs. 12131 et seq., certified by a
licensed physician to be unable to attend the eligible program of study full-
time because of the disability;
(e) Agrees to render one (1) year of qualified service in a coal-producing county
of the Commonwealth for each year the scholarship was awarded. "Qualified
service" means a full-time practice in a coal-producing county of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky as a licensed pharmacist for a majority of the
calendar year, except that an individual having a disability defined by Title II
of the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. secs. 12131 et seq., whose
Page 141 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
disability, certified by another licensed physician, prevents him or her from
practicing full-time, shall be deemed to perform qualified service by
practicing the maximum time permitted by the attending physician, in the
coal-producing county; and
(f) Agrees to sign a promissory note as evidence of the scholarship awarded and
the obligation to repay the scholarship amount or render pharmacy service as
agreed in lieu of payment.
(4) (a) Notwithstanding KRS 164.753(3), the amount of the scholarship shall not
exceed forty percent (40%) of the approximate average of first professional
year in-state tuition for all pharmacy schools in the United States. The
authority shall establish, by administrative regulation a procedure for
awarding scholarships which shall give preference to students residing in
coal-producing counties and which shall establish procedures to award
scholarships should funding be insufficient to award scholarships to all
eligible students. The authority may also, by administrative regulation,
establish scholarship amounts based on demonstration of initial financial need
by eligible students.
(b) The actual amount of the scholarship awarded to each eligible student by the
authority for each semester shall be based on the amount of funds available
and the criteria established under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(5) (a) The authority shall require each student receiving a scholarship to execute a
promissory note as evidence of the obligation.
(b) The recipient shall render one (1) year of qualified service in a coal-producing
county for each year the scholarship was awarded. Upon completion of each
year of qualified service in a coal-producing county, the authority shall cancel
the appropriate number of promissory notes. Promissory notes shall be
canceled by qualified service in the order in which the promissory notes were
Page 142 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
executed. Service credit shall not include residency service.
(c) If a recipient fails to complete an eligible program of study, or fails to render
service as a pharmacist as agreed in this subsection, the recipient shall be
liable for the total repayment of the sum of all outstanding promissory notes
and accrued interest.
(6) Any person who is in default on any obligation to the authority under any program
administered by the authority under KRS 164.740 to 164.785 shall not be awarded a
scholarship or have a promissory note canceled until all financial obligations to the
authority are satisfied, except that ineligibility for this reason may be waived by the
authority for cause.
(7) A repayment obligation imposed by this section shall not be voidable by reason of
the age of the recipient at the time of executing the promissory note.
(8) Failure to meet repayment obligations imposed by this section shall be cause for the
revocation of the scholarship recipient's license to practice pharmacy, subject to the
procedures set forth in KRS Chapter 311.
(9) Notwithstanding KRS 164.753(3), the authority shall establish by administrative
regulation procedures for the administration of this program, including but not
limited to the execution of appropriate contracts and promissory notes, cancellation
of obligations, the rate of repayment, and deferment of repayment of outstanding
debt.
(10) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, the maximum interest rate
applicable to repayment of a promissory note under this section shall be twelve
percent (12%) per annum, except that if a judgment is rendered to recover payment,
the judgment shall bear interest at the rate of five percent (5%) greater than the rate
actually charged on the promissory note.
(11) (a) The coal county pharmacy scholarship fund is hereby created as a revolving
fund in the State Treasury to be administered by the Kentucky Higher
Page 143 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Education Assistance Authority for the purpose of providing scholarships to
qualifying students studying pharmacy in schools in the Commonwealth.
(b) The fund shall consist of amounts transferred from coal severance tax receipts
as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection and any other proceeds from
grants, contributions, appropriations, or other moneys made available for the
fund.
(c) 1. Receipts from the coal severance tax levied under KRS 143.020 shall be
transferred to the fund on an annual basis in an amount not to exceed the
lesser of:
a. Four percent (4%) of the total annual coal severance tax revenues
collected under KRS 143.020; or
b. The amount necessary to provide full funding for all students who
qualify for a scholarship under this section, considering all other
resources available.
2. Transfers required by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be made as
follows:
a. On or before August 1 of each year, sixty-five percent (65%) of
the amount of funding provided for in this paragraph shall be
transferred to the fund; and
b. The remaining thirty-five percent (35%) shall be transferred on or
before December 1 of each year.
3. The amount transferred shall be based upon the prevailing revenue
estimate for coal severance tax receipts at the time each transfer is made.
(d) Any unallotted or unencumbered balances in the trust fund shall be invested
as provided in KRS 42.500(9).
(e) Income earned from the investments shall be credited to the trust fund.
(f) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year
Page 144 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
shall not lapse but shall be transferred to the Osteopathic Medicine
Scholarship Program described in KRS 164.7891 within ninety (90) days of
the end of the fiscal year.
(g) All amounts included in the fund shall be continuously appropriated only for
the purposes specified in this section.
(h) A general statement that all continuing appropriations are repealed,
discontinued, or suspended shall not operate to repeal, discontinue, or suspend
this fund or to repeal this action.
(i) All moneys repaid to the authority under this section shall be added to the
fund.
Section 74. KRS 164.7891 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to establish a scholarship program to
provide eligible Kentucky students the opportunity to attend an accredited
osteopathic school of medicine located in the Commonwealth and become certified
practitioners rendering medical service in the Commonwealth.
(2) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority may award scholarships, to
the extent funds are available for that purpose, to persons who declare an intent to
become osteopaths and practice in the Commonwealth and who are eligible under
subsection (4) of this section.
(3) The authority may award scholarships to students who meet the following criteria:
(a) Kentucky residents who are United States citizens as determined by the
institution in accordance with criteria established by the authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] for the purposes of admission and tuition
assessment;
(b) Students who are enrolled or accepted for enrollment in an eligible program of
study accredited by the Bureau of Professional Education of the American
Osteopathy Association or its successor, on a full-time basis, or eligible
Page 145 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
students who have a disability defined by Title II of the Americans with
Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. secs. 12131 et seq., certified by a licensed
physician to be unable to attend the eligible program of study full-time
because of the disability;
(c) Students who agree to render one (1) year of qualified service in the
Commonwealth for each year the scholarship was awarded. "Qualified
service" means a full-time practice in the Commonwealth of Kentucky as a
licensed doctor of osteopathy for a majority of the calendar year in the fields
of family practice, general practice, general internal medicine, general
pediatrics, general obstetrics, or gynecology, except that an individual having
a disability defined by Title II of the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42
U.S.C. secs. 12131 et seq., whose disability, certified by another licensed
physician, prevents him or her from practicing full-time, shall be deemed to
perform qualified service by practicing the maximum time permitted by the
attending physician; and
(d) Students who sign a promissory note as evidence of the scholarship awarded
and the obligation to repay the scholarship amount or render medical service
as agreed in lieu of payment.
(4) The amount of the scholarship awarded to an eligible student by the authority shall
be equal to the difference between:
(a) The average of the prevailing amount charged for in-state tuition at the
University of Kentucky School of Medicine and the University of Louisville
School of Medicine; and
(b) The prevailing amount charged for tuition at the osteopathic school of
medicine in which the student is enrolled.
(5) The authority shall require a promissory note to be executed by the student as
evidence of the obligation. The recipient shall render one (1) year of qualified
Page 146 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
service for each year the scholarship was awarded. Upon completion of each year of
qualified service, the authority shall cancel the appropriate number of promissory
notes. Promissory notes shall be canceled by qualified service in the order in which
the promissory notes were executed. Service credit shall not include residency
service. In the event a recipient fails to complete an eligible program of study, or
fails to render qualified medical service as a primary care physician as agreed in
subsection (3) of this section, the recipient shall be liable for the total repayment of
the sum of all outstanding promissory notes and accrued interest.
(6) A scholarship shall not be awarded or a promissory note cancellation shall not be
granted to any person who is in default on any obligation to the authority under any
program administered by the authority under KRS 164.740 to 164.785 until
financial obligations to the authority are satisfied, except that ineligibility for this
reason may be waived by the authority for cause.
(7) A repayment obligation imposed by this section shall not be voidable by reason of
the age of the recipient at the time of executing the promissory note.
(8) Failure to meet repayment obligations imposed by this section shall be cause for the
revocation of the scholarship recipient's license to practice medicine, subject to the
procedures set forth in KRS Chapter 311.
(9) Notwithstanding KRS 164.753(3), the authority shall establish by administrative
regulation procedures or the terms of promissory notes for the administration of this
program, including the execution of appropriate contracts and promissory notes,
cancellation of the obligation, the rate of repayment and deferment of repayment of
outstanding debt, and the priority of awarding scholarships if funds are insufficient
to honor all requests.
(10) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, the maximum interest rate
applicable to repayment of a promissory note under this section shall be twelve
percent (12%) per annum, except that if a judgment is rendered to recover payment,
Page 147 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
the judgment shall bear interest at the rate of five percent (5%) greater than the rate
actually charged on the promissory note.
(11) (a) The "Osteopathic Medicine Scholarship Program" is hereby created as a
special trust fund in the State Treasury administered by the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority for the purpose of providing funds for
scholarships to eligible students studying osteopathic medicine in schools in
the Commonwealth.
(b) Funding shall be transferred to the special trust fund from the coal severance
tax revenues levied under KRS 143.020 in an amount that permits each
Kentucky resident eligible under subsection (3) of this section to be awarded a
scholarship in the amount established under subsection (4) of this section. No
more than four percent (4%) of the coal severance tax revenues levied under
KRS 143.020 and collected annually shall be transferred to the trust fund. To
the extent this appropriation and other funds are available, the authority shall
award scholarships to all renewal applicants and eligible students in
accordance with the formula for determining the amount of the scholarship
award established in this section.
(c) The trust fund may also receive state appropriations, gifts, and grants from
public and private sources, and federal funds. Any unallotted or
unencumbered balances in the trust fund shall be invested as provided in KRS
42.500(9). Income earned from the investments shall be credited to the trust
fund. Any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall
be carried forward to the next fiscal year and continuously appropriated only
for the purposes specified in this section. A general statement that all
continuing appropriations are repealed, discontinued, or suspended shall not
operate to repeal, discontinue, or suspend this fund or to repeal this section.
(d) All moneys repaid to the authority under this section shall be added to the
Page 148 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
appropriations made for purposes of this section, and the funds and
unobligated appropriations shall not lapse.
(12) On or before August 1 of each year, sixty-five percent (65%) of the amount of
funding provided in subsection (11)(b) of this section shall be transferred to the
special trust fund and the remaining thirty-five percent (35%) shall be transferred
on or before December 1 of each year. The revenue transfers shall be based upon
the revenue estimates prevailing at the time each transfer is due.
Section 75. KRS 164.7894 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly recognizes that the bachelor degree attainment rate in the
coal-producing counties of Kentucky is lower than the state average. It is the intent
of the General Assembly to establish the Kentucky Coal County College
Completion Program to assist residents of coal-producing counties who are
attending postsecondary education institutions located in coal-producing counties
by providing:
(a) Scholarships to:
1. Decrease the financial barriers to bachelor's degree completion; and
2. Encourage students to remain in the area; and
(b) Grants to community colleges located in coal-producing counties to enhance
the extent and quality of student support services and program offerings
necessary to increase student success and degree production in the area.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "District" means the Kentucky Coal County District consisting of coal-
producing counties as defined in KRS 42.4592(1)(c);
(b) "High school" means a Kentucky public high school or a private, parochial, or
church school located in Kentucky that has been certified by the Kentucky
Board of Education as voluntarily complying with curriculum, certification,
and textbook standards established by the Kentucky Board of Education under
Page 149 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
KRS 156.160;
(c) "Kentucky Coal County College Completion scholarship" or "KCCCC
scholarship" means a scholarship described in subsection (1)(a) of this
section;
(d) "Kentucky Coal County College Completion student services grant" or
"KCCCC student services grant" means a grant described in subsection (1)(b)
of this section; and
(e) "Tuition" means the in-state tuition and mandatory fees charged to all students
as a condition of enrollment in an undergraduate program.
(3) A participating institution shall:
(a) Be physically located in the district;
(b) Offer bachelor's degree programs; and be:
(c) 1. A regionally accredited, independent nonprofit Kentucky college or
university licensed by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] whose main campus is
based in the district, including a work-college as determined by the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
2. A four (4) year public university extension campus; or
3. A regional postsecondary education center, including the University
Center of the Mountains.
(4) A participating institution may establish extension campuses within the district to
offer bachelor degree programs for purposes of this section.
(5) A nonparticipating institution shall:
(a) Have its main campus located in Kentucky but not in the district;
(b) Offer a bachelor's degree program not offered at any participating institution;
(c) Be accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools; and
(d) Be a public or independent, nonprofit college or university that is licensed by
Page 150 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education].
(6) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority shall administer the
Kentucky Coal County College Completion Program and shall promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as may be needed
for the administration of the program.
(7) The authority may award a KCCCC scholarship under this section, to the extent
funds are available for that purpose, to any person who:
(a) Is considered a permanent resident of the district for at least one (1) year
immediately preceding July 1 of the academic year in which the scholarship is
made;
(b) Is a United States citizen;
(c) Is a Kentucky resident as determined by the institution in accordance with
criteria established by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] for the purposes of admission
and tuition assessment;
(d) Completes and submits the Free Application for Federal Student Aid for the
academic year in which the grant is made;
(e) Has earned at least sixty (60) credits or the equivalent of completed
coursework toward a bachelor's degree;
(f) Is enrolled at least half-time at a participating institution, or a nonparticipating
institution in accordance with subsection (8) of this section, in upper division
courses in a program of study that leads to a bachelor's degree;
(g) Is in good academic standing in accordance with the institution's policy; and
(h) Is not in default on any obligation to the authority under any program
administered by the authority under KRS 164.740 to 164.785, except that
ineligibility for this reason may be waived by the authority for cause.
Page 151 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(8) A student otherwise eligible for the KCCCC scholarship who is enrolled in a
nonparticipating institution shall be eligible to receive the KCCCC scholarship if he
or she is enrolled in a bachelor's degree program in a field of study that is not
offered at any participating institution. A program shall be clearly unlike any degree
program offered by a participating institution to be eligible. The authority shall
promulgate administrative regulations to establish procedures to designate the
approved programs of study at nonparticipating institutions for which an eligible
student can receive the KCCCC scholarship, which shall include a program review
process that requires fifty percent (50%) or more of the courses offered in a
program to be different from courses available in a program offered by a
participating institution. The maximum annual total of KCCCC scholarships
expended for this purpose, to the extent funds are available, shall not exceed five
percent (5%) of the amount appropriated for KCCCC scholarships.
(9) (a) The KCCCC scholarship amount provided to a student may be applied to the
student's cost of attendance and shall be forty percent (40%), up to the
maximum amount defined in subsections (10) and (11) of this section, of the
amount remaining after subtracting the student's federal and state grants and
scholarships from the institution's published tuition and mandatory fees
amount that is used for purposes of packaging federal student aid. Work study
and student loan funds shall not be included in the calculation.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the tuition amount for a work-college, as
described in subsection (3)(c)1. of this section, shall be the average tuition and
mandatory fees amount of the participating institutions that are described in
subsection (3)(c)1. of this section and are not work-colleges.
(c) Students attending less than full-time shall receive a pro rata amount as
determined by the authority.
(10) The maximum KCCCC scholarship award amount for the 2014-2015 academic year
Page 152 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
shall not exceed:
(a) Six thousand eight hundred dollars ($6,800) per academic year for a student
attending a participating institution that is a nonprofit, independent college or
university;
(b) Two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300) per academic year for a student
attending a participating institution that is a public university extension
campus or a regional postsecondary education center; or
(c) Three thousand four hundred dollars ($3,400) per academic year for a student
attending a nonparticipating institution as prescribed in subsection (8) of this
section.
(11) The authority shall calculate the average annual percentage increase in tuition for
the six (6) comprehensive universities as defined in KRS 164.001. The maximum
KCCCC scholarship amounts in subsection (10) of this section shall be increased
for each subsequent academic year by the total average percentage increase since
the 2014-2015 academic year.
(12) The authority shall award KCCCC scholarships chronologically based on when
applicants submit the Free Application for Federal Student Aid until funds are
exhausted, except prior recipients shall be awarded before any new KCCCC
scholarship recipients. Applicants who received a KCCCC scholarship in the
immediately preceding academic semester and apply by the deadline established by
the authority shall be awarded first.
(13) A student may receive a KCCCC scholarship for a maximum of five (5) full-time
fall or spring academic semesters, or their equivalent under a trimester or quarter
system, or until the completion of a first bachelor's degree, whichever occurs first.
The authority shall determine the equivalent usage of academic semester eligibility
for students enrolled less than full-time.
(14) The authority may award KCCCC student services grants under this section, to the
Page 153 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
extent funds are available for that purpose, to a Kentucky Community and
Technical College System institution that is physically located in the district.
(15) The maximum annual KCCCC student services grant shall be one hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($150,000) per institution.
(16) KCCCC student services grants shall be used for the following purposes:
(a) To expand outreach services in high schools, in coordination with outreach
services provided by the authority, to advise students of the advantages and
importance of seeking a bachelor's degree and the opportunities to attain a
bachelor's degree within the district;
(b) To expand advising resources to encourage completion of associate degree
programs and transfer into bachelor's degree programs;
(c) To expand career advising resources to better link baccalaureate academic
pursuits to career opportunities, especially within the district; and
(d) To provide multifaceted retention and student transfer initiatives to encourage
associate degree completion leading to bachelor's degree programs.
(17) Beginning November 1, 2015, and each year thereafter, the authority shall make an
annual report to the Interim Joint Committee on Education on the status of the
Kentucky Coal County College Completion Program.
(18) Every four (4) years after implementation of the Kentucky Coal County College
Completion Program, the authority shall evaluate the program to ensure the policy
objectives are being realized and to suggest adjustments to maximize the increase in
bachelor's degree completion rates.
(19) Each participating institution, nonparticipating institution, and recipient of a
KCCCC student services grant shall make data available to the authority for the
report and evaluation described in subsections (17) and (18) of this section.
(20) If any participating institution, nonparticipating institution, or recipient of a
KCCCC student services grant does not demonstrate improved performance in
Page 154 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
student performance metrics, including but not limited to graduation and transfer
rates, the authority may revoke the institution's eligibility for participation in the
KCCCC scholarship or KCCCC student services grant.
(21) (a) The coal county college completion scholarship fund is hereby created as a
trust fund in the State Treasury to be administered by the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority for the purpose of providing scholarships
described in subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(b) The trust fund shall consist of amounts appropriated annually from coal
severance tax receipts to the extent that the enacted biennial budget of the
Commonwealth includes such appropriations. The trust fund may also receive
gifts and grants from public and private sources and federal funds. No general
fund moneys shall be appropriated for this purpose.
(c) Any unallotted or unencumbered balances in the trust fund shall be invested
as provided in KRS 42.500(9). Income earned from the investments shall be
credited to the trust fund.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year
shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year and
continuously appropriated only for the purposes specified in this section.
(22) (a) The coal county college completion student services grant fund is hereby
created as a trust fund in the State Treasury to be administered by the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority for the purpose of providing
grants described in subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(b) The trust fund shall consist of amounts appropriated annually from coal
severance tax receipts to the extent that the enacted biennial budget of the
Commonwealth includes such appropriations. The trust fund may also receive
gifts and grants from public and private sources and federal funds. No general
fund moneys shall be appropriated for this purpose.
Page 155 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(c) Any unallotted or unencumbered balances in the trust fund shall be invested
as provided in KRS 42.500(9). Income earned from the investments shall be
credited to the trust fund.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year
shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year and
continuously appropriated only for the purposes specified in this section.
Section 76. KRS 164.790 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(b) "Full enrollment space amount" means the difference between the out-of-state
and in-state tuition amount at a public participating veterinary school or an
equivalent amount determined by the authority for a nonpublic participating
veterinary school;
(c) "Kentucky student" means a Kentucky resident as determined by the authority
using the criteria established by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] for the purposes of
postsecondary admission and tuition assessment;
(d) "Participating veterinary school" means a college of veterinary medicine
approved by the authority for participation in the program; and
(e) "Program" means the Veterinary Contract Spaces Program.
(2) The General Assembly establishes the Veterinary Contract Spaces Program to
provide financial assistance and access to Kentucky students seeking a veterinary
education and to help ensure the availability of a sufficient veterinary workforce in
the Commonwealth.
(3) The authority shall administer the program and shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as may be needed for the
administration of the program.
Page 156 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(4) Subject to the availability of funds, the authority shall contract to purchase at least
one hundred sixty-four (164) enrollment spaces annually for Kentucky students at
one (1) or more participating veterinary schools. To the extent possible, the contract
shall be for the full enrollment space amount.
(5) Kentucky students enrolled in a participating veterinary school and selected by the
school for participation in the program shall receive a tuition credit from the school
in the amount required to purchase his or her enrollment space each semester, not to
exceed eight (8) semesters.
(6) To the extent possible, the authority shall secure enrollment spaces so that
Kentucky students participating in the program may continue applying tuition
credits at the same participating veterinary school for up to eight (8) semesters.
(7) (a) The Veterinary Contract Spaces Program trust fund is hereby created as a trust
fund in the State Treasury to be administered by the authority for the purpose
of purchasing enrollment spaces for Kentucky students in participating
veterinary schools as described in this section.
(b) The trust fund shall consist of state general fund appropriations, gifts and
grants from public and private sources, and federal funds. All moneys
included in the fund shall be appropriated for the purposes set forth in this
section.
(c) Any unalloted or unencumbered balances in the trust fund shall be invested as
provided in KRS 42.500(9). Income earned from the investments shall be
credited to the trust fund.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year
shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year and
continuously appropriated only for the purposes specified in this section.
Section 77. KRS 164.7911 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is established and created in the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Page 157 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] a Strategic Investment and
Incentive Funding Program for postsecondary education to consist of a system of
strategic financial assistance awards to institutions, systems, agencies, and
programs of postsecondary education to advance the goals of postsecondary
education as stated in KRS 164.003(2). There are established in the State Treasury
the following individual strategic investment and incentive trust funds:
(a) A research challenge trust fund;
(b) A comprehensive university excellence trust fund;
(c) A technology initiative trust fund;
(d) A physical facilities trust fund;
(e) A postsecondary workforce development trust fund; and
(f) A student financial aid and advancement trust fund.
(2) The funding program and the individual trust funds are created to provide financial
assistance to the institutions, systems, agencies, and programs of postsecondary
education each fiscal biennium. It is the intent of the General Assembly to make
appropriations, including general fund appropriations, each fiscal biennium to each
of the individual trust funds in the funding program in a form and manner consistent
with the strategic agenda adopted by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education]. Appropriations made to individual
trust funds in the Strategic Investment and Incentive Funding Program shall not
lapse at the end of a fiscal year but shall be carried forward in the respective trust
fund accounts and shall be available for allotment for their respective purposes in
the next fiscal year.
Section 78. KRS 164.7915 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall make a biennial budget request to the General Assembly and to the
Governor with regard to:
Page 158 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(a) Specific funding amounts to be appropriated to each individual trust fund in
the Strategic Investment and Incentive Funding Program;
(b) Specific funding amounts of all capital projects to be appropriated and funded
from each individual trust fund in the Strategic Investment and Incentive
Funding Program; and
(c) Funding to be appropriated to the base budgets of the institutions, systems,
agencies, and programs.
(2) Funds appropriated for the Strategic Investment and Incentive Funding Program
shall be for the purpose of encouraging the activities of institutions, systems,
agencies, and programs of postsecondary education in accordance with the strategic
agenda adopted by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council
on Postsecondary Education].
Section 79. KRS 164.7917 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The research challenge trust fund created by KRS 164.7911 may include
separate, subsidiary programs and related accounts, such as an Endowed
Professorship Matching Program, an Endowed Chairs Matching Program, an
External Research Grant Matching Program, a Graduate Assistant Program, a
Junior Faculty Research Encouragement Program, or other programs and
related accounts as determined through the biennial budget process for the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education].
(b) Appropriations to the research challenge trust fund are to encourage research
activities at the University of Kentucky and at the University of Louisville so
that these institutions may achieve the goals established in KRS 164.003(2).
(c) Funds appropriated to the research challenge trust fund shall be apportioned
two-thirds (2/3) to the University of Kentucky and one-third (1/3) to the
University of Louisville.
Page 159 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(2) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall develop the criteria and process for submission of an application
under this section. The evaluation of all applications for support of specific faculty
research projects, if such projects are included in the university's plan for use of
research trust funds, shall be subject to review and ranking by an external panel of
experts appointed according to guidelines and procedures approved by the
authority[council] in consultation with the University of Kentucky and the
University of Louisville. The University of Kentucky and the University of
Louisville may apply to the authority[council] for financial assistance from the
research challenge trust fund. The authority[council] shall determine the matching
funds or internal reallocation requirements from the applicants to qualify for
funding. Financial assistance that may be awarded by the authority[council] shall
be consistent with the adopted strategic agenda, the biennial budget process, and the
availability of any resources to the research challenge trust fund.
Section 80. KRS 164.7919 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The comprehensive university excellence trust fund created by KRS 164.7911
shall consist of six (6) separate accounts: one (1) for Eastern Kentucky
University; one (1) for Kentucky State University; one (1) for Morehead State
University; one (1) for Murray State University; one (1) for Northern
Kentucky University; and one (1) for Western Kentucky University.
(b) Funds appropriated to the comprehensive university excellence trust fund or
any subsidiary fund created by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] shall be apportioned to each
of the comprehensive universities proportional to their respective share of
total general fund appropriations in each fiscal year, excluding debt service
appropriations and specialized, noninstructional appropriations.
(c) The purpose of the comprehensive university excellence trust fund is to
Page 160 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
provide financial assistance to encourage comprehensive universities to
develop at least one (1) nationally recognized program of distinction or at
least one (1) nationally recognized applied research program consistent with
the goals established in KRS 164.003(2).
(2) The authority[council] shall develop the criteria and process for submission of an
application under this section. Each university may apply to the authority[council]
for financial assistance from the comprehensive university excellence trust fund.
The authority[council] shall determine the matching funds or internal reallocation
requirements from the applicants to qualify for funding. Financial assistance that
may be awarded by the authority[council] shall be consistent with the adopted
strategic agenda, the biennial budget process, and the availability of any resources
to the comprehensive university excellence trust fund.
Section 81. KRS 164.7921 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The technology initiative trust fund created by KRS 164.7911 is intended to
support investments in electronic technology for postsecondary education
throughout the Commonwealth to improve student learning.
(b) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] may establish separate subsidiary programs and
related accounts to provide financial assistance to the postsecondary education
system in acquiring the infrastructure necessary to acquire and develop
electronic technology capacity; to encourage shared program delivery among
libraries, institutions, systems, agencies, and programs; to provide funding for
the Commonwealth Virtual University under KRS 164.800; and other
programs consistent with the purposes of postsecondary education, the
adopted strategic agenda, and the biennial budget process.
(2) The authority[council] shall develop the criteria and process for submission of an
application under this section. Any university and the Kentucky Community and
Page 161 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Technical College System may apply to the authority[council] for financial
assistance from the technology initiative trust fund. The authority[council] shall
determine the matching funds or internal reallocation requirements for the
applicants to qualify for funding. Financial assistance that may be awarded by the
authority[council] shall be consistent with the adopted strategic agenda, the
biennial budget process, and the availability of any resources to the technology
initiative trust fund.
Section 82. KRS 164.7923 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The physical facilities trust fund created by KRS 164.7911 is intended to provide
sufficient financial assistance for unexpected contingencies for the construction,
improvement, renovation, or expansion of the physical facilities of the
postsecondary education system.
(2) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall develop the criteria and process for submission of an application
under this section. The physical facilities trust fund shall not replace the existing
capital construction provisions and appropriation provisions of state law. Each
university or the Kentucky Community and Technical College System may apply to
the authority[council] for financial assistance from the physical facilities trust fund.
Financial assistance that may be awarded by the authority[council] shall be
consistent with the adopted strategic agenda, the biennial budget process, and the
availability of any resources to the physical facilities trust fund.
Section 83. KRS 164.7925 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The postsecondary workforce development trust fund created by KRS 164.7911 is
intended to provide financial assistance to further cooperative efforts among
community colleges and technical institutions and for the acquisition of equipment
and technology necessary to provide quality education programs.
(2) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Page 162 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Education] shall develop the criteria and process for submission of an application
under this section. The Kentucky Community and Technical College System may
apply to the authority[council] for financial assistance from the postsecondary
workforce development trust fund. Financial assistance shall be awarded for
instructional programs ensuring that the community colleges and the technical
institutions are able to continually acquire state-of-the-art equipment and
technology needed to accomplish their missions.
Section 84. KRS 164.7927 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The student financial aid and advancement trust fund created by KRS
164.7911 is intended to provide financial assistance that encourages student
access to postsecondary education including regionally accredited or
nationally accredited technical institutions and colleges, community colleges,
public universities, and regionally accredited private colleges and universities.
(b) Appropriations shall be made to the trust fund and allotted to universities and
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System[ or to the Kentucky
Higher Education Assistance Authority] as the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] deems
appropriate. Appropriations made to this trust fund may be used for the
College Access Program, the Kentucky Tuition Grant Program, or other
student financial aid programs as authorized by the General Assembly.
(c) The authority[council] shall establish separate subsidiary programs and
related accounts that are consistent with this section, the adopted strategic
agenda, the biennial budget process, and the availability of any resources to
the student financial aid and advancement trust fund.
(2) (a) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education, in consultation with the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority,] shall determine the nature and purposes of
Page 163 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
budget requests for funding support to the student financial aid and
advancement trust fund. The determination shall be based upon the financial
assistance needs and requirements of students of postsecondary regionally
accredited or nationally accredited private or public institutions.
(b) A minimum of twenty-five percent (25%) of the student financial aid and
advancement trust fund appropriation shall be allotted for the purpose of
assisting individuals whose available income, determined in accordance with
part F of Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965 as amended, is at or
below one hundred percent (100%) of the federal income poverty guidelines.
From the foregoing allotment, administrators of programs funded under this
section may exercise discretion in accordance with 20 U.S.C. sec. 1087tt in
awarding student financial assistance benefits on a case-by-case basis to
individuals with disabilities, as defined by Title II of the Americans with
Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. secs. 12131 et seq., whose available income is
above the federal income poverty guidelines, whether or not the student
qualifies for vocational rehabilitation services. Any funds remaining after all
eligible students have been served under this paragraph may be used for other
purposes as provided in this section.
(3) The authority[council] shall develop the criteria and process for submission of an
application under this section. Financial assistance that may be awarded by the
authority[council] shall be consistent with the adopted strategic agenda, the
biennial budget process, and the availability of any resources to the student
financial aid and advancement trust fund.
Section 85. KRS 164.800 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Commonwealth Virtual University shall be the academic programs made
available to the citizens of the Commonwealth through the use of modern methods
of communications and information dissemination as determined by the Kentucky
Page 164 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education]
after consideration of the recommendations of the Distance Learning Advisory
Committee and the needs expressed by the regional advisory groups.
(2) The authority[council] shall establish a Distance Learning Advisory Committee to
advise the authority[council] on matters relating to the Commonwealth Virtual
University. The members of the advisory committee shall include the presidents of
each of the nine (9) state postsecondary education institutions, the executive
director of the Kentucky Educational Television Network, a representative of the
Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities, and other
representatives as the authority[council] deems appropriate. The committee shall
elect its chair and other officers as it deems necessary.
(3) The authority[council], after receiving the recommendations of the Distance
Learning Advisory Committee, shall establish policies to control and promote the
use of distance learning systems to be used by the Commonwealth Virtual
University to increase the availability of all postsecondary education programs
throughout the state in the most efficient manner. The comprehensive universities
shall be the primary developers and deliverers of baccalaureate and master's degree
programs to be delivered by the Commonwealth Virtual University; however, this
does not preclude the University of Kentucky, the University of Louisville, or
independent colleges from offering baccalaureate and master's degree programs or
other course offerings, and community colleges and technical institutions from
offering associate and technical degree programs or other courses through the
Commonwealth Virtual University.
(4) The authority[council] shall determine the allocation of tuition, course offerings,
source of courses, technology to be used, and other matters relating to the use of
distance learning to promote education through the Commonwealth Virtual
University.
Page 165 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Section 86. KRS 164.810 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in KRS 164.810 to 164.870, the following terms shall have, unless the
context shall otherwise indicate, the following meanings:
(a) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
and
(b) "University of Louisville" means the university which is situated in a city of
the first class, and which has heretofore constituted a municipal university
within the meaning and application of KRS 165.010 et seq[.;
(b) "Council" means the [Council on Postsecondary Education in Kentucky]].
(2) Consistent with the provisions of KRS 164.026 and Chapter 239 of the 1968
Kentucky Acts, the University of Louisville shall be maintained as a state
institution effective July 1, 1970, subject to its qualification to receive the benefits
of such status in the manner set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The University of Louisville, having been chartered by Chapter 137, Acts of 1845-
6, approved February 7, 1846, effective in accordance with its terms on March 15,
1846; having become subject to the laws of the Commonwealth generally
applicable to corporations of the same category according to the import of
subsection seventeen of Section 59 of the present Constitution of the
Commonwealth; and having duly filed in the office of the Secretary of State its
acceptance of the present Constitution of the Commonwealth in accordance with
Section 190 thereof; may qualify to receive the benefits of its status as a state
institution, as provided in KRS 164.810 to 164.870, by action of its board of
trustees in adopting and causing to be filed for public record such proceedings as
are required by law, amending its charter or articles of incorporation in such manner
as to conform to the provisions of KRS 164.810 to 164.870.
Section 87. KRS 164.815 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The University of Louisville shall provide:
Page 166 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(a) Upon approval of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], associate and baccalaureate
degree programs of instruction;
(b) Upon approval of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], master's-degree programs,
specialist degrees above the master's-degree level, doctoral degree programs,
and joint doctoral programs in cooperation with other public institutions of
higher education;
(c) Upon approval of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], professional degree
programs including medicine, dentistry, law, engineering, and social
professions.
(2) The University of Louisville is authorized to provide programs of a community
college nature in its own community comparable to those listed for the community
college system as provided in this chapter.
(3) The University of Louisville shall continue to be a principal university for the
conduct of research and service programs without geographical limitation but
subject to the implied limitation of KRS 164.125(2).
Section 88. KRS 164.821 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The government of the University of Louisville is vested in a board of trustees
appointed for a term set by law pursuant to Section 23 of the Constitution of
Kentucky. The board shall consist of ten (10) members appointed by the Governor,
at least one (1) of whom shall be a graduate of the university; one (1) member of
the teaching faculty of the University of Louisville who shall be the chief executive
of the ranking unit of faculty government; one (1) member of the permanent staff of
the University of Louisville who shall be the chief executive of the staff senate; and
one (1) student member who shall be the president of the student body during the
Page 167 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
appropriate academic year. The members appointed by the Governor shall be
subject to confirmation by the Senate.
(a) All appointed and elected persons shall be required to attend and complete an
orientation and education program prescribed by the authority[council] under
KRS 164.020(25), as a condition of their service and eligibility for
appointment or election to a second term.
(b) Board members may be removed by the Governor under the following
circumstances:
1. For cause, pursuant to KRS 63.080(2); or
2. Pursuant to KRS 63.080(3) or(4).
(c) New appointees to the board shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive
terms.
(2) The student member shall serve a one (1) year term beginning on July 1 after being
elected and sworn in as student body president and ending on the following June
30. If the student member does not maintain the position of student body president
or the status of a full-time student at any time during that academic year, a special
election shall be held to select a full-time student member. The elected student
member shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(3) The faculty member and staff member shall serve one (1) year terms and cease to
be eligible for membership on the board of trustees upon termination of their
respective relationships with, or leadership positions within, the university, and
vacancies occurring for this reason shall be filled for the remainder of the respective
terms in the same manner.
(4) The gubernatorial appointments shall serve a term of six (6) years and until their
successors are appointed and qualified, unless a member is removed by the
Governor pursuant to KRS 63.080(2), (3), or (4), except the initial terms shall be as
follows:
Page 168 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(a) Two (2) members shall serve one (1) year terms;
(b) Two (2) members shall serve two (2) year terms;
(c) Two (2) members shall serve three (3) year terms;
(d) Two (2) members shall serve four (4) year terms;
(e) One (1) member shall serve a five (5) year term; and
(f) One (1) member shall serve a six (6) year term.
(5) The Governor shall make his or her at-large appointments so as to divide the
appointed representation upon the board to reflect:
(a) The proportional representation of the two (2) leading political parties in the
Commonwealth based on the state's voter registration and the political
affiliation of each appointee as of December 31 of the year preceding the date
of his or her appointment. A particular political affiliation shall not be a
prerequisite to appointment to the board generally; however, if any person is
appointed to the board that does not represent either of the two (2) leading
political parties of the Commonwealth, the proportional representation by
political affiliation requirement shall be determined and satisfied based on the
total number of members on the board less any members not affiliated with
either of the two (2) leading political parties; and
(b) No less than the proportional representation of the minority racial composition
of the Commonwealth based on the total minority racial population using the
most recent census or estimate data from the United States Census Bureau. If
the determination of proportional minority representation does not result in a
whole number of minority members, it shall be rounded up to the next whole
number.
(6) Vacancies among the appointed members of the board occurring by death,
resignation, or any other cause, other than expiration of a term, shall be filled by
appointments made by the Governor for the remainder of the unexpired term,
Page 169 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
subject to the qualifications set forth in this section.
(7) Unless specifically approved by the board of trustees under the provisions of KRS
164.367, no member of the teaching or administrative staff of the university shall be
directly or indirectly interested in any contract with the university for the sale of
property, materials, supplies, equipment, or services, with the exception of
compensation to the faculty, staff, and student members.
(8) The inability of the board to hold regular meetings, to elect a chairperson annually,
to establish a quorum, to adopt an annual budget, to set tuition rates, to conduct an
annual evaluation of the president of the university, to carry out its primary function
to periodically evaluate the institution's progress in implementing its mission, goals,
and objectives to conform to the strategic agenda, or to otherwise perform its duties
under KRS 164.830 shall be cause for the Governor to remove all appointed
members of the board and replace the entire appointed membership pursuant to
KRS 63.080(4).
Section 89. KRS 164.915 is amended to read as follows:
The Colleges of Medicine at the University of Kentucky and the University of Louisville
shall submit to the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] a joint plan which defines an optional course of medical
education for family practice and general practice physicians in a period of six (6) years
following completion of secondary school. Family practice residency programs shall be
completed in the two (2) years subsequent to the completion of medical education.
Section 90. KRS 164.927 is amended to read as follows:
The University of Kentucky and the University of Louisville, and their affiliated
programs are hereby authorized to increase the number of residency positions for medical
school graduates in primary care disciplines from the fiscal 1976 level by a total of
seventy-six (76) additional positions during the 1977-78 biennium. These new positions
shall be established in the following manner:
Page 170 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(1) For the fiscal year 1977 there shall be established twenty-eight (28) new positions;
for fiscal year 1978 there shall be forty-eight (48) new positions.
(2) To provide adequate faculty supervision for these new residency positions, one (1)
faculty position (1 FTE) is hereby authorized for each additional four (4) new
residency positions established under the provisions of KRS 164.925 to 164.933.
(3) The number of the residency positions to be established at the University of
Kentucky and at the University of Louisville shall be determined by the Kentucky
Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education],
using the policies and procedures for determining the allocation of these new
residency positions as provided in KRS 164.929.
Section 91. KRS 164.929 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All new residency positions shall be sponsored by the University of Kentucky or
the University of Louisville. The residency positions created by KRS 164.927 shall
be served in sites approved by the appropriate specialty board for certification and
by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education].
(2) Funding priority shall be given to programs in which all or a portion of the
residency occurs in sites away from both the University of Kentucky and the
University of Louisville.
(3) Each individual serving a residency under KRS 164.927 shall, within the total
period of residency, undertake a minimum of three (3) months education in a
community facility in Kentucky outside the counties of Fayette and Jefferson, or in
any institution serving a medically underserved community as designated by the
United States Department of Health and Human Services[, Education and
Welfare], subject to the approval of the certifying board in each specialty, provided
however that not more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the individuals from each
university funded under this section shall be permitted to satisfy the three (3) month
Page 171 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
requirement in a medically underserved area in the counties of Fayette and
Jefferson.
(4) The University of Kentucky and the University of Louisville shall recommend
policies and procedures for determining the allocation of new residency positions
for approval by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] using the following criteria:
(a) The available or expected number and types of qualified faculty necessary for
the proper degree of supervision and teaching;
(b) The scope and volume of patient care;
(c) The amount of available physical facilities;
(d) The current number and types of residency positions offered at each
university;
(e) Regional needs for the manpower trained under the provisions of KRS
164.927 to 164.933;
(f) The extent of involvement in education in primary care in ambulatory care
settings; and
(g) Any other criteria which may be developed by the University of Kentucky and
the University of Louisville and accepted by the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education].
Section 92. KRS 164.933 is amended to read as follows:
The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall coordinate the activities of the participating institutions, as described in
KRS 164.925 to 164.931, to insure a comprehensive program for training individuals for
the delivery of primary care in the Commonwealth.
Section 93. KRS 164.937 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The University of Kentucky shall maintain a Center of Excellence in Rural Health.
(2) The mission of the Center of Excellence in Rural Health shall be the improvement
Page 172 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
of the health of all rural Kentuckians and the improvement of rural health care
systems through education, research, and service.
(3) The Center of Excellence in Rural Health shall:
(a) Support a site-based director, core faculty, and staff;
(b) Collect and maintain statistical and other information relating to rural health
status, rural health care systems, rural health policy, and other issues affecting
the health and well-being of rural populations;
(c) Collect, analyze, interpret, disseminate, and make recommendations regarding
the availability, distribution, and sufficiency of the health professions
workforce;
(d) Provide educational opportunities for students committed to rural health care:
1. To obtain education in needed health professions as determined by the
workforce analyses, rotating these programs as necessary;
2. By testing and developing innovative models for learning; and
3. By reserving funds budgeted for specific educational programs that in
the future are deemed no longer necessary for use for educational
programs for other health professions;
(e) Maintain site-based family practice residencies;
(f) Serve as the federally designated Office of Rural Health and perform the
duties prescribed by the United States Health Resources and Services
Administration;
(g) Administer the Healthcare Worker Loan Relief Program established under
KRS 164.936;
(h) Demonstrate or provide innovative programs that improve the health of rural
Kentuckians and strengthen rural health care systems; and
(i) Advocate for rural health care.
(4) To the extent additional funds are appropriated, the Center of Excellence in Rural
Page 173 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Health shall establish additional sites throughout the Commonwealth as necessary
to achieve the mission of the center.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the study of rural health
policies, workforce analyses, or the training of health professionals in or for rural or
medically underserved areas by other state universities.
(6) The University of Kentucky shall report to the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] and the Legislative
Research Commission a detailed, audited statement of expenditures for each
program function in the Center of Excellence for Rural Health Care by September 1
of each year which enumerates expenditures for the preceding fiscal year.
Section 94. KRS 164.947 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] by regulation shall adopt standards and procedures for the licensing of
colleges to ensure that the programs of preparation are comparable to the generally
accepted standards of collegiate instruction with respect to faculty, curriculum,
facilities, and student cost and that there is full disclosure with respect to the
philosophy and purposes of the institutions and their capacity to fulfill these
objectives.
(2) Nothing contained in KRS 164.945 to 164.947 is intended in any way nor shall be
construed to regulate the stated purpose of an independent institution or to restrict
religious instruction or training in an independent institution.
(3) All colleges as defined in KRS 164.945 shall be required to hold a license issued by
the executive director of the Council on Higher Education or his or her successor,
under the provisions of KRS 164.945 to 164.947 and under the regulations of the
Council on Higher Education, or its successor. Within ninety (90) days of July 13,
1990, all colleges shall be required to hold licenses.
(4) The designated use of the title "college" or "university" in combination with any
Page 174 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
series of letters, numbers, or words shall be restricted to the institutions licensed
under KRS 164.945 to 164.947 except that new branches, divisions, or additions to
existing institutions shall be licensed.
Section 95. KRS 164.948 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 164.9481, 164.9483, and 164.9485, unless the context requires
otherwise:
(1) "Campus" has the same meaning as in 20 U.S.C. sec. 1092(f)(6)(A)(ii) as amended;
(2) "Campus security authority" means campus police, security officers, and any
official at a postsecondary education institution who has significant responsibility
for student and campus activities, including student discipline, student housing,
student judicial affairs, and student life administration. Professional mental health,
pastoral, and other licensed counselors when functioning in that capacity are not
considered campus security authorities;
(3) "Crime" means any crime listed in 20 U.S.C. sec. 1092(f)(1)(F) as amended;
(4) "Immediately" means before the last fire unit has left the scene in order for the state
fire marshal to have the opportunity to speak with fire unit personnel before they
leave the scene, but no later than two (2) hours following the time the fire or threat
of fire is discovered. In the event of a minor fire to which the local fire officials are
not called or do not respond, "immediately" means no later than one (1) hour
following the discovery of the fire;
(5) "Noncampus building or property" has the same meaning as in 20 U.S.C. sec.
1092(f)(6)(A)(iii) as amended;
(6) "Postsecondary education institution" means any Kentucky public four (4) year
institution or two (2) year community college or technical college that grants a
postsecondary education credential, and any private college or university that is
licensed by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] under KRS 164.945 to 164.947; and
Page 175 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(7) "Public property" has the same meaning as in 20 U.S.C. sec. 1092(f)(6)(A)(iv) as
amended.
Section 96. KRS 164.9481 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Crime log:
(a) Each postsecondary education institution shall make, keep, and maintain a
daily log, written in a form approved by the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] that can be easily
understood, recording all crimes occurring on campus and reported to campus
security authorities or local law enforcement agencies, including:
1. The category of crime, and a description of the incident, date, time, and
general location of each crime; and
2. The disposition of the complaint if known, including referral for
prosecution, institutional disciplinary proceedings, or investigation by
another state agency. The disposition shall include a reference to an
investigation or incident report number.
(b) All entries in the campus crime log shall be made available for public
inspection within twenty-four (24) hours after the first report of an incident
was made to any campus security authority or local law enforcement officials.
1. If there is clear and convincing evidence that the release of the
information would cause a suspect to flee or evade detection, would
result in the destruction of evidence, or is prohibited from release by
law, the information may be withheld until that damage is no longer
likely to occur from the release of the information. Only the information
that is absolutely necessary to withhold for the reasons stated in this
paragraph may be withheld; all other information shall be released.
2. In the event information is withheld under the provisions of paragraph
(a) of this subsection, the crime shall still be reported and made
Page 176 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
available for public inspection.
(c) The campus crime log required by this section shall be readily accessible and
open for public inspection at all times and shall be made available on campus
computer networks to which students, employees, and other campus
community members have access. Each semester the institution shall notify
currently enrolled students, students applying to the institution, and
employees of the availability of the campus crime log, where it can be
accessed, and the exact electronic address on the computer network.
(2) Special reports: In addition to the campus crime log, each postsecondary education
institution shall make timely reports to the campus community on crimes reported
to campus security authorities or local law enforcement authorities determined by
those authorities to present a safety or security threat to students or employees.
(a) The reports shall be made available to students and employees within twenty-
four (24) hours after an incident is first reported.
(b) The information shall be reported in a manner that will aid in the prevention
of similar occurrences.
(c) Institutions shall use computer networks and post the reports in each
residential facility. The institution may also use flyers and other campus
publications including newspapers, and other media.
(d) Each institution shall adopt a policy to comply with this requirement and the
policy shall be included in the postsecondary education institution's annual
campus safety and security report published in compliance with KRS
164.9485.
Section 97. KRS 164.9483 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Under the provisions of KRS Chapter 227, the state fire marshal shall have
jurisdiction over all property in the state including property of public postsecondary
education institutions and property of any private college or university that is
Page 177 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
licensed by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] as provided for by KRS 164.945 to 164.947, insofar as it
is necessary for the administration and enforcement of any duty imposed on the
office by law or administrative regulation and all laws, ordinances, regulations, and
orders designed to protect the public from fire loss.
(2) The state fire marshal or the state fire marshal's employee or appointee may,
without delay or advance notice and at all reasonable hours of the day or night,
enter in or upon any property defined under KRS 227.200 located on the campus to
make an inspection, investigation, or any other action necessary for the purpose of
preventing fire loss or determining the origin of any fire.
(3) No person shall obstruct, hinder, or delay such an officer in the performance of his
or her duty.
(4) Upon learning of a fire or threat of fire, a campus security authority designated by
the college or university president to be responsible and liable for reporting shall
immediately report each fire or threat of fire to the state fire marshal in Frankfort
and the local deputies, assistants, and employees appointed under KRS 227.230. No
fire scene located on a campus shall be cleared or cleaned without the express
consent of the state fire marshal to do so after a representative of the state fire
marshal has had an opportunity to investigate the scene.
Section 98. KRS 164.9485 is amended to read as follows:
Effective September 1, 2000, and each year thereafter, each postsecondary education
institution shall submit to the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council
on Postsecondary Education] a statement of current policies concerning campus safety
and security including, but not limited to:
(1) The enforcement authority of security personnel, including their working
relationship with state and local police agencies;
(2) A description of programs designed to inform students and employees about the
Page 178 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
campus safety and security procedures and practices, how to report crimes, and how
to prevent crimes; and
(3) Statistics concerning the occurrence of crimes on campus during the most recent
calendar year. The statistical data shall be reported by the number of occurrences
based on:
(a) Location, broken down in the following classifications:
1. Total number on campus;
2. On public property; and
3. Noncampus buildings and property.
(b) Category of crime committed:
1. As defined in KRS 164.948; and
2. By category of prejudice, as described in the Jeanne Clery Disclosure of
Campus Security Policy and Campus Crime Statistics Act, 20 U.S.C
sec. 1092(f)(1)(F)(ii) as amended.
Section 99. KRS 164.9487 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In complying with the statistical and reporting requirements mandated in KRS
164.948 to 164.9489 and KRS 164.993, an institution shall make a reasonable,
good-faith effort to obtain statistics and crime reports from outside agencies. An
institution that makes such an effort is not responsible for an outside agency's
failure to provide statistics or crime reports or for verifying the accuracy of the
statistics or reports that are provided.
(2) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall specify formats for reporting to ensure uniformity.
Section 100. KRS 164.981 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 164.981 to 164.9819:
(1) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(2) "Autism" means a developmental disability significantly affecting verbal and
Page 179 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
nonverbal communication and social interaction, generally evident before age three
(3), that adversely affects educational performance. Characteristics of autism
include:
(a) Irregularity and impairment in communication;
(b) Engagement in repetitive activity and stereotyped movement;
(c) Resistance to environmental change or change in daily routine; and
(d) Unusual responses to sensory experience.
The term does not include children with characteristics of an emotional-behavioral
disability as defined in KRS 157.200;
[(2) "Council" means the Council on Postsecondary Education in Kentucky;]
(3) "Center" means the autism training center;
(4) "Client" means a person with the primary diagnosis of autism or autistic-like
behavior; and
(5) "Expenses" means those reasonable and customary expenditures related to training
and treatment of eligible clients as defined in administrative regulations
promulgated by the authority[council] pursuant to KRS 13A.
Section 101. KRS 164.9811 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education in Kentucky] is authorized to operate a state autism training center,
including:
(a) The acquisition by purchase, lease, gift, or otherwise of necessary lands;
(b) The construction of necessary buildings;
(c) The expansion, remodeling, altering, or equipping of necessary buildings; and
(d) The making of contracts by the authority[council] or its designee with any
nonprofit institution, or any state, county, or local agency for the equipment,
expenses, compensation of personnel, operation, and maintenance of any
facility of an agency or institution used for the purposes of KRS 164.981 to
Page 180 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
164.9819.
(2) The authority[council] shall select and contract with a public institution of higher
education to carry out the provisions of KRS 164.981 to 164.9819.
Section 102. KRS 164.9815 is amended to read as follows:
The authority[council], after consultation with the center, shall promulgate
administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A providing for:
(1) The establishment, operation, eligibility for services, cost reimbursement, fees for
services, maintenance, and government control of the center established pursuant to
KRS 164.981 to 164.9819;
(2) Standards necessary for cooperation under and compliance with any federal law
with respect to grants-in-aid for client training or facilities; and
(3) Any other administrative regulations as may be necessary to implement KRS
164.981 to 164.9819.
Section 103. KRS 164.9819 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The primary method of providing services through the center shall be by the use of
trainee teams. A trainee team shall consist of an eligible client, a professional from
a local service agency, and the client's guardian or one or both of the client's
parents.
(2) The authority[council], after consultation with the center, shall promulgate
administrative regulations relating to:
(a) Fees charged to sending agencies;
(b) Reimbursement of trainee team or client expenses; and
(c) Provision of, or reimbursement for, reasonable and customary expenses
incurred by trainee teams, clients, or otherwise eligible persons which are not
covered by the fees charged to sending agencies. These expenses may include
child care for other children of attending parents, guardians, or other persons
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
Page 181 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Section 104. KRS 164A.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created and established an independent de jure municipal
corporation and political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Kentucky which
shall be a body corporate and politic to be known and identified as the Kentucky
Higher Education Student Loan Corporation.
(2) The Kentucky Higher Education Student Loan Corporation is created and
established as an independent de jure municipal corporation and political
subdivision of the Commonwealth of Kentucky to perform essential governmental
and public functions and purposes in improving and otherwise promoting the
educational opportunities of the citizens and inhabitants of the Commonwealth of
Kentucky and other qualified students by a program of financing, making, and
purchasing of student loans.
(3) (a) The corporation shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of:
1. Ten (10) voting members of the board of directors of the Kentucky
Higher Education Assistance Authority appointed by the Governor
pursuant to KRS 164.746(1)(a), who shall serve terms of office on the
corporation board coextensive with their respective terms of office on
the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority board; and
2. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or a designee
who shall be another official of the same cabinet, who shall serve as an
ex officio voting member.
(b) The [president of the Council on Postsecondary Education, the ]president of
the Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities, the State
Treasurer, and the commissioner of education, or their designees who shall be
another official of the same cabinet or agency, shall serve as ex officio
nonvoting advisors to the board.
(4) The Governor shall appoint directors according to subsection (3)(a)1. of this section
Page 182 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
from nominees submitted by the Governor's Postsecondary Education Nominating
Committee under KRS 164.005 to take office and to exercise all powers thereof
immediately. The terms shall be staggered and shall be for a period of four (4) years
each. Each director shall serve for the appointed term and shall serve until a
successor has been appointed and has duly qualified.
(5) In the event of a vacancy, the Governor may appoint a replacement director from
nominees submitted by the Governor's Postsecondary Education Nominating
Committee under KRS 164.005 who shall hold office during the remainder of the
term so vacated.
(6) The Governor may remove any director from the general public in case of
incompetency, neglect of duties, gross immorality, or malfeasance in office; and
may thereupon declare such office vacant and may appoint a person to fill such
vacancy as provided in other cases of vacancy.
(7) The board shall elect from its voting membership a chair, chair-elect, and secretary-
treasurer. The executive director of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority shall serve as executive director of the corporation.
(8) The executive director shall administer, manage, and direct the affairs and business
of the corporation, subject to the policies, control, and direction of the board of the
corporation. The secretary-treasurer of the corporation shall keep a record of the
proceedings of the corporation and shall be custodian of all books, documents, and
papers filed with the corporation, the minute book or journal of the corporation, and
its official seal. The secretary-treasurer may copy all minutes and other records and
documents of the corporation and give certificates under the official seal of the
corporation to the effect that such copies are true copies and all persons dealing
with the corporation may rely upon such certificates.
(9) A majority of the board of the corporation shall constitute a quorum for the purpose
of conducting its business and exercising its powers and for all other purposes
Page 183 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
notwithstanding the existence of any vacancies on the board.
(10) Official actions may be taken by the corporation at meetings duly called by the
chair upon three (3) days' written notice to each director or upon the concurrence of
at least a majority of the directors. In lieu of personal attendance by members of the
board at the same location, the board may conduct meetings by teleconference or
other available technological means suitable for conducting its business. Meetings
of the board shall be open and accessible to the public in accordance with KRS
61.805 to 61.850, and any alternate method of conducting a meeting in lieu of
personal attendance shall ensure public access.
(11) Directors, except officers or employees of the state, shall receive one hundred
dollars ($100) compensation per day for their services and shall be entitled to
payment of any reasonable and necessary expense actually incurred in discharging
their duties under this chapter.
(12) Recognizing that the corporation and the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority are governed by the same board members appointed by the Governor and
managed by a common executive director and otherwise share staff functions, the
two (2) organizations shall provide technical, clerical, and administrative assistance
to each other and for the Asset Resolution Corporation, the Kentucky Educational
Savings Plan Trust, and the Commonwealth postsecondary education prepaid
tuition trust fund, together with necessary office space and personnel, and shall
assist each other in all ways by the performance of any and all actions which may
be useful or beneficial in the performance of their public functions.
(13) The corporation shall enter into contracts with the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority, the Asset Resolution Corporation, the Kentucky Educational
Savings Plan Trust, and the Commonwealth postsecondary education prepaid
tuition trust fund as may be proper and appropriate in respect to services which may
include but not be limited to the servicing and collection of student loans or to
Page 184 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
facilitate the common administration, operation, and management of the contracting
entities.
Section 105. KRS 164A.250 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to establish a student loan forgiveness
program for individuals who receive a bachelor's degree or graduate degree from a
Kentucky college or university after August 30, 2007, and who are employed in an
energy-related field as engineers, engineering technologists, chemists, geologists, or
hydrologists in Kentucky. The loan forgiveness program shall be funded by the
Commonwealth of Kentucky using state appropriations and shall be administered
by the Kentucky Higher Education Student Loan Corporation. All costs associated
with the program shall be paid for by the Commonwealth of Kentucky, including
the reimbursement of any expenses incurred by the corporation in its administration
of the program.
(2) To the extent funds are available, the corporation shall provide eligible individuals
forgiveness of loans within the Federal Family Education Loan Program held by the
corporation up to a maximum of:
(a) Twenty percent (20%) of the loan balance principal; and
(b) Accrued interest;
for each year of qualified employment in Kentucky after August 30, 2007, in an
eligible occupation as set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) An individual shall be eligible for the loan forgiveness if he or she:
(a) Is a Kentucky resident, as determined by the corporation using the criteria
established by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council
on Postsecondary Education] for the purposes of postsecondary admission and
tuition assessment;
(b) Is a citizen of the United States;
(c) Received a bachelor's degree or graduate degree after August 30, 2007, from a
Page 185 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
postsecondary education institution in Kentucky that is accredited by a
regional or national accrediting association; and
(d) Is employed full-time in Kentucky in an eligible occupation as set forth in
subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Qualified employment in an eligible occupation shall be employment in an energy-
related field as an engineer, including environmental engineer; engineering
technologist, including environmental engineering technologist; chemist; geologist;
or hydrologist. The corporation shall establish the specific eligible occupational
titles within the eligible occupations set forth in this subsection through the
promulgation of administrative regulations using the Standard Occupational
Classification System of the Bureau of Labor Statistics within the U.S. Department
of Labor. The corporation shall consult with the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] in determining eligible
occupational titles.
(5) The corporation shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A as may be needed for the administration of the loan forgiveness
program.
Section 106. KRS 164A.565 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The governing board of each postsecondary educational institution making the
election authorized in KRS 164A.560 shall as a condition of such election install an
accrual basis accounting system conforming with generally accepted accounting
principles and procedures established for colleges and universities by the National
Association of College and University Business Officers and the American Institute
of Certified Public Accountants. The accounting system shall include but not be
limited to the following fund structure:
(a) An operating fund group (unrestricted current funds), consisting of all moneys
not otherwise restricted, available for general operations, including state
Page 186 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
appropriations, federal funds, and unrestricted institutional receipts. Separate
accounting fund groups may be established for auxiliary enterprises, athletics,
hospitals, and other similar operations;
(b) A restricted fund group consisting of appropriations and other receipts
restricted as to purpose which shall not be included in the operating fund;
(c) A loan fund group consisting of gifts, grants, and other funds provided and
available for loans to students;
(d) An endowment fund group consisting of funds, the principal of which is not
currently expendable;
(e) An agency fund group consisting of resources held by the institutions as
custodian or fiscal agent for individual students, faculty, staff members, and
organizations;
(f) A plant fund group consisting of:
1. Unexpended plant funds to be used for the acquisition of long-lived
assets for institutional purposes (capital construction funds);
2. Funds for renewal, maintenance, and replacement of institutional
buildings, equipment, and other properties; and
3. Funds set aside for debt service charges and retirement of indebtedness
on institutional plant.
(2) A record of each general fund appropriation shall be maintained so as to identify the
institutional budgets to which such funds are allotted. Any uncommitted state
general funds remaining after the close of business on the last day of the fiscal year
shall lapse and be returned to the Treasury of the Commonwealth. Each
appropriation shall be used for the intended purpose and where questions of intent
arise subject to the provisions of KRS 45.750 and 45.800 in the case of capital
construction projects and major items of equipment as defined by these sections, the
decision of the secretary of finance and administration, based upon budget work
Page 187 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
papers, shall be final.
(3) A separate account showing sources of revenue and all expenditures shall be
maintained for each capital construction project. At the end of each fiscal year, a
report containing a listing of all capital construction projects, with sources of funds,
expenditures, and current status for each, shall be submitted to the Capital Projects
and Bond Oversight Committee.
(4) Within thirty (30) days after July 15, 1982, the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall submit to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight
Committee a complete record of all funds and project records transferred to
institutions under the provisions of KRS 164A.555 to 164A.630.
(5) Within thirty (30) days after July 15, 1982, the governing boards shall submit to the
Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee a report containing a complete list
of capital construction projects and unexpended plant funds in existence on July 15,
1982. The source of funds, expenditures, and current status of each project shall be
shown.
(6) State general funds appropriated by the General Assembly for capital construction
projects and equipment purchases as defined in KRS 45.750 through 45.800 shall
not lapse at the end of a fiscal year. They shall be carried forward until the project is
completed. Any such unexpended funds remaining after acceptance of the project as
complete shall be returned to a surplus account of the capital construction fund for
investment until appropriated and allotted as provided in KRS 45.750 through
45.800.
(7) Long lived assets of the institution, including land, buildings, and capital equipment
shall be accounted for in the plant fund group.
(8) The governing boards of each institution shall make an annual report of the
financial activity to the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council
on Postsecondary Education]. The report shall meet the requirements of the
Page 188 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
authority's[council's] system of uniform financial reporting for institutions of
higher education.
(9) By January 1, 2012, the governing boards of each institution shall make available
on the institution's website[Web site]:
(a) The board-approved operating and capital budgets for the current and prior
two (2) fiscal years;
(b) The institution's audited financial statements for the previous three (3) fiscal
years; and
(c) The agendas and actions of all meetings of the governing board for the
previous three (3) years.
Section 107. KRS 164A.570 is amended to read as follows:
The governing board of any postsecondary educational institution making the election
prescribed in KRS 164A.560 shall engage a qualified firm of certified public accountants
experienced in the auditing of institutions to conduct an annual examination of the
institution's financial statements in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards
for the purpose of submitting an independent opinion, and preparing a report of findings
and recommendations concerning internal accounting controls and procedures, and
compliance with KRS 164A.555 to 164A.630. The secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet may prescribe the minimum scope of any such audit. The
opinion, with the findings and recommendations, shall be forwarded to the Governor, the
secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Auditor of Public Accounts, the
director of the Legislative Research Commission, the executive director[president] of the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education], and members of the governing board.
Section 108. KRS 165.015 is amended to read as follows:
It shall be a public purpose for a city of any class to support postsecondary education
through the appropriation of funds for postsecondary educational facilities located or to
Page 189 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
be located within the city and for postsecondary educational programs offered within the
city. Nothing in this section and KRS 165.160, 165.165, 165.180, 165.190, and 165.195
shall create an obligation or liability for the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education].
Section 109. KRS 165A.310 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Agent" means any person employed by a proprietary school to act as agent,
solicitor, broker, or independent contractor to procure students for the school by
solicitation of enrollment in any form made at any place other than the main office
or principal place of business of the school;
(2) "CDL" means a commercial driver's license as defined in KRS 281A.010;
(3) "CDL driver training" means a course of study that complies with the provisions of
KRS 332.095 governing the instruction of persons in the operation of commercial
motor vehicles;
(4) "CDL driver training school" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
educational institution, establishment, agency, organization, or corporation, with the
exception of an entry level driver training provider, that offers CDL driver training
to persons desiring to obtain a Kentucky CDL in order to operate a commercial
motor vehicle and for which a fee or tuition is charged;
(5) "Commercial motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in KRS 281A.010;
(6) "Commission" means the Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education;
(7) "Entry level driver training" means a federally mandated course of instruction for
new CDL applicants as outlined in 49 C.F.R. secs. 380.600 to 380.609;
(8) "Entry level driver training provider" means an entity that is certified by the Federal
Motor Carrier Safety Administration as a training provider under 49 C.F.R. secs.
380.700 to 380.725 that is limited solely to providing entry level driver training;
(9) "Formal complaint" means a written statement filed on a form specified by the
Page 190 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
commission in which the complainant alleges that a school has violated a Kentucky
statute or administrative regulation and has negatively impacted the complainant,
and resolution is requested by the commission;
(10) "License" means authorization issued by the commission to operate or to contract to
operate a proprietary school in Kentucky as described in this chapter and does not
reflect accreditation, supervision, endorsement, or recommendation by the
commission;
(11) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, partnership,
unincorporated association, two (2) or more of any of the foregoing having a joint
or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity;
(12) "Proprietary school" or "school" means a privately owned educational institution,
establishment, agency, organization, or person maintained on either a for-profit or
not-for-profit basis, offering or administering a plan, course, or program of
instruction in business, trade, technical, industrial, or related areas for which a fee
or tuition is charged whether conducted in person, by mail, or by any other method,
and does not include:
(a) A school or educational institution supported entirely or partly by taxation
from either a local or state source;
(b) A parochial, denominational, or eleemosynary school or institution;
(c) A training program which offers instruction for payment by participants
primarily in pursuit of a hobby, recreation, or entertainment, and does not
result in the granting of postsecondary credits nor lead to an industry-
recognized credential, academic certificate, or degree;
(d) A course or courses of instruction or study sponsored by an employer for the
training and preparation of its own employees for the benefit of the employer
and without charge to the employee; or
(e) A school or educational institution licensed or approved by or a course or
Page 191 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
courses of study or instruction sponsored by the Kentucky Board of Barbering
established by KRS 317.430, the Kentucky Board of Cosmetology established
by KRS 317A.030, the Kentucky Board of Nursing established by KRS
314.121, the Kentucky Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors established
by KRS 316.170, or the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Kentucky Council on Postsecondary Education established by KRS
164.011];
(13) "Resident" means any person who has established Kentucky as his or her state of
domicile. Proof of residency shall include but not be limited to a deed or property
tax bill, utility agreement or utility bill, or rental housing agreement;
(14) "School year" is beginning the first day of July and ending the thirtieth day of June
next following, except when approval shall be suspended or canceled pursuant to
KRS 165A.350; and
(15) "Statement of quality assurance" means a statement required by the commission
from a non-degree granting institution, in a form and manner determined by the
commission, that attests to the institution meeting the minimum standards required
for receiving and maintaining a license.
Section 110. KRS 165A.320 is amended to read as follows:
KRS 165A.310 to 165A.410 shall not apply to any institution offering a four (4) year
bachelor's degree recognized by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], nor shall it apply to any religious
institution exempt from taxation under the laws of this state or which is subject to the
provisions of KRS 164.945. KRS 165A.310 to 165A.410 is intended to apply to and
regulate for-profit and not-for-profit proprietary schools, including but not limited to
traditional, web-based, distance learning, or correspondence schools, which are operated
as or are organized for a profit, or on a not-for-profit basis.
Section 111. KRS 165A.340 is amended to read as follows:
Page 192 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(1) The Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education is hereby created as an
independent agency of the Commonwealth and shall be attached to the Education
and Labor Cabinet for administrative purposes. The commission shall be composed
of the following members:
(a) Two (2) members who are representative of privately owned postsecondary
educational institutions licensed by the commission and appointed by the
Governor from a list of seven (7) names submitted by the Kentucky
Association of Career Colleges and Schools;
(b) Two (2) members who are representative of privately owned postsecondary
technical schools licensed by the commission and appointed by the Governor
from a list of seven (7) names submitted by the Kentucky Association of
Career Colleges and Schools;
(c) Four (4) members who are representative of the public at large with a
background in education, business, or industry in Kentucky and appointed by
the Governor;
(d) The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet, or the secretary's designee;
(e) The executive director[president] of the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], or [the
president's ]designee; and
(f) The commissioner of education, or the commissioner's designee.
(2) Terms of appointed members shall be four (4) years or until successors are duly
appointed and qualified. A vacancy on the commission shall be filled for the
remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment.
An appointed member shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive full terms,
except that a member may be reappointed after a break in service of one (1) full
term.
(3) The commission shall employ and fix the compensation of an executive director,
Page 193 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
who shall be its secretary and principal executive officer. The executive director
shall have a background in the regulation of commerce, business, or education, and
shall be responsible for:
(a) Organizing and staffing meetings of the commission;
(b) Establishing policies to ensure retention of original licensing documentation;
(c) Ensuring that minutes and other financial, procedural, complaint, and
operational records are securely maintained and archived;
(d) Internal and external correspondence and communication;
(e) Submitting reports and strategic agenda items for review and approval;
(f) Assisting the commission in the promulgation of administrative regulations;
(g) Carrying out policy and program directives of the commission;
(h) Preparing budget submissions;
(i) Ensuring that formal complaints are provided to the complaint committee and
arranging for independent investigations as needed;
(j) Ensuring that an independent audit of the commission's finances is conducted
biennially;
(k) Ensuring that formal written agreements are executed for the procurement of
administrative and legal services;
(l) Formalizing office policies and procedures relating to licensing and financial
operations;
(m) Developing and implementing a process for monitoring expenditures and
reconciling on a monthly basis commission and student protection fund
receipts reported in the Enhanced Management Administrative Reporting
System (EMARS); and
(n) Other activities necessary to ensure that the commission meets its designated
duties and responsibilities.
(4) The commission shall have full authority to employ and fix the compensation for
Page 194 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
any personnel, including counsel, as it may deem necessary to effectively
administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter. The commission shall obtain
office space, furniture, stationery, and any other proper supplies and conveniences
reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
(5) The commission shall annually elect a chairperson. The chairperson shall not be a
school representative appointed pursuant to subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section.
(6) (a) The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to establish:
1. Commission operating and accountability procedures;
2. Requirements for each licensed institution to publicly disclose according
to standardized protocols, both in print and web-based materials,
information about:
a. Any information that the schools are required to report by the
federal Higher Education Opportunity Act, Pub. L. No. 110-315,
using the Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System
(IPEDS) of the National Center for Educational Statistics as a
condition of participating in Title IV federal financial aid
programs;
b. The job placement rate of program graduates in the field of study
and the types of jobs for which graduates are eligible;
c. Articulation agreements with other postsecondary educational
institutions and the rights and responsibilities of students regarding
transfer of credits;
d. The complaint procedures available to students; and
e. The existence of the student protection fund created in KRS
165A.450, and procedures for students to file a claim, including
but not limited to the documentation required for submission of a
Page 195 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
claim;
3. Quality standards and compliance monitoring schedules of traditional
programs, correspondence courses, and web-based, distance learning
courses offered over the internet;
4. Advertising requirements for schools issued a license, including no
distribution of materials containing untrue, deceptive, or misleading
statements and no representation that the commission is an accrediting
agency for the school or its programs;
5. A schedule for reviewing advertisements and recruitment materials and
practices of member institutions to ensure compliance with this chapter;
6. An equitable structure of licensure and renewal fees, to be paid by
licensed schools, necessary to carry out the provisions and purposes of
this chapter and to support adequate staffing of commission
responsibilities. The fee structure shall be based on the gross revenue of
licensed schools, number of students enrolled, and whether the school is
located within the state or outside the state; and
7. The method for calculating placement rates that are to be disclosed
pursuant to this subsection.
(b) The commission shall have the authority to promulgate other administrative
regulations, in cooperation with the Kentucky Department of Education and
the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education], as it deems necessary for the proper administration
of this chapter.
(7) The commission shall hold meetings at least four (4) times a year and as frequently
as it deems necessary at the times and places within this state as the commission
may designate. The majority of the members shall constitute a quorum, and all
meetings shall be conducted in accordance with the Open Meetings Act, KRS
Page 196 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
61.805 to 61.850.
(8) The commission may sue and be sued in its own name.
(9) Commission members shall receive a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) for
attendance at each commission meeting and may be reimbursed for ordinary travel
and other expenses while engaged in the business of the commission.
(10) The commission shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter
pertaining to the conduct, operation, maintenance, and establishment of proprietary
education institutions, and the activities of agents thereof when acting as such.
(11) The commission shall have the power to subpoena witnesses and school records as
it deems necessary.
(12) The commission chairperson shall appoint a complaint committee and designate its
chairperson. The chairperson of the complaint committee shall not be employed by,
have ownership interest in, or be otherwise affiliated with a licensed institution.
School representatives appointed pursuant to subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section
shall not constitute a majority of the committee's membership. A committee
member shall not vote on a matter in which a conflict of interest exists. The
committee shall review each formal complaint and, if evidence supports an alleged
violation of this chapter or any administrative regulation promulgated thereunder,
the committee shall:
(a) Authorize an investigative report;
(b) Participate in informal procedures to resolve complaints;
(c) Ensure timely correspondence to parties involved in complaints; and
(d) After review of all evidence and investigative reports, make recommendations
for the disposition of complaints to the full commission.
(13) No later than November 30, 2013, and annually thereafter, the commission shall
provide a status report on the requirements of this section to the Interim Joint
Committee on Licensing and Occupations and the Interim Joint Committee on
Page 197 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Education. The report shall include a summary of the data, including school
performance information, relating to the requirements of subsection (6)(a) of this
section.
Section 112. KRS 168.020 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 168.010 to 168.100, the following words and terms have the following
meanings, unless in any instance, the context shall clearly indicate another meaning, in
which event the context shall be controlling:
(1) "Authority" means the Kentucky Authority for Educational Television;
(2) "Board" means the Kentucky Board of Education;
(3) "Department" means the Kentucky Department of Education;
(4) "Public schools" means the state-supported schools of the elementary and
secondary levels, as defined in KRS 157.320;
(5) "Commission" means the State Property and Buildings Commission of Kentucky;
(6) ["Council" means the Council on Postsecondary Education in Kentucky;
(7) ]"University of Kentucky" means the University of Kentucky as one (1) entity,
including its present and future extensions;
(7)[(8)] "State colleges and universities" means and includes Eastern Kentucky
University, Kentucky State University, Morehead State University, Murray State
University, Northern Kentucky University, Western Kentucky University, and the
University of Louisville, and institutions in the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System;
(8)[(9)] "Educational television" means and includes the production of television
programs, the filming or taping thereof, the purchase or lease of filmed or taped
programs produced by others, and the transmission or relaying of them for
utilization:
(a) Which may be used in aid of education in the public schools and public
institutions of higher education; and
Page 198 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(b) For limited and incidental use in furtherance of other proper public functions;
(9)[(10)] "Television facilities" means and includes sites, buildings, structures,
machinery, equipment, and installations, each with necessary or appropriate
appurtenances, used or useful in the furtherance of educational television;
(10)[(11)] "Related functions" or "related services" means and includes the use of
facilities operated or leased by the authority, or which may be added or connected
to such facilities as permitted by applicable statutes, and to prepare, transmit, or
enable the exchange of nontelevision programs, services, or functions for and
among the public schools, public institutions of higher education, and other state
agencies:
(a) In aid of education; and
(b) For use in other proper public functions; provided, however, that such related
functions or related services may include, but are not limited to, the following
examples: computer-assisted instruction, data for teaching or administrative
purposes, and educational noncommercial radio; and
(11)[(12)] "Related facilities" means and includes sites, buildings, structures, machinery,
equipment, and installations, each with necessary or appropriate appurtenances,
used or useful in the furtherance of related functions or services.
Section 113. KRS 168.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The authority shall consist of nine (9) members, as follows:
The chief state school officer, ex officio, who shall initially serve as temporary
chairman and shall call and preside over the organizational meeting or meetings
until the members of the authority shall elect a chairman from among their number;
a member of the staff or personnel of the department elected by the board upon
recommendation of the chief state school officer as being qualified to serve as
liaison and coordinator between the authority and the department on matters of
curriculum, and his or her term shall be the same as that of the chief state school
Page 199 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
officer by whom he or she is recommended, but terminable by the board in the
event he or she is transferred to other duties in the department, and automatically
terminated in the event of his or her severance from the department for any reason;
a representative of the University of Kentucky and a representative of the state
universities to be elected by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education]; and five (5) additional members
appointed by the Governor who need possess no special or prescribed qualifications
except that they shall be citizens of Kentucky.
(2) Effective at 11:59 p.m. on June 30, 1994, all terms of gubernatorial appointees to
the authority shall expire. Effective July 1, 1994, five (5) appointees nominated
pursuant to KRS 164.005 and appointed by the Governor shall become members of
the authority.
Section 114. KRS 171.420 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The State Libraries, Archives, and Records Commission is hereby created and shall
be a seventeen (17) member body constituted as follows:
(a) The state librarian or his or her designee, who shall be the chairperson of the
commission;
(b) The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet or his or her designee, who
shall serve as vice chairperson;
(c) The Auditor of Public Accounts or his or her designee;
(d) The state law librarian or his or her designee;
(e) The director of the Legislative Research Commission or his or her designee;
(f) The Attorney General or his or her designee;
(g) The executive director of the Kentucky Military Heritage Commission or a
designee of the commission;
(h) The executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology or his or
her designee;
Page 200 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(i) The president of the Kentucky Association of School Librarians or his or her
designee;
(j) The executive director of the Kentucky Historical Society or his or her
designee;
(k) The executive director of the Kentucky Library Association or his or her
designee;
(l) The executive director[president] of the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] or his or her
designee;
(m) Four (4) citizens at large appointed by the Governor, including one (1)
member representing library users with disabilities, one (1) member
representing disadvantaged persons, and two (2) members representing library
users; and
(n) One (1) member, who shall not be an elected official, appointed by the
Governor from a list of three (3) persons, with one (1) name submitted by
each of the presidents of the Kentucky League of Cities, the Kentucky
Association of Counties, and the Kentucky Association of School
Administrators.
(2) Vacancies for appointed members shall be filled by the Governor in the same
manner as initial appointments are made. All appointed members shall serve for a
term of three (3) years, except when making the appointments under subsection (3)
of this section, two (2) shall be for a term of three (3) years, two (2) for two (2)
years, and one (1) for one (1) year.
(3) On July 14, 2018, all terms of gubernatorial appointees made prior to July 14, 2018,
shall expire, and the Governor shall appoint five (5) members to the commission in
accordance with paragraphs (m) and (n) of subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The commission shall be the state advisory council on libraries and shall advise the
Page 201 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Department for Libraries and Archives on matters relating to federal and state
library development issues, archives and records management, federal and state
funding, public library standards, and other federal and state library service issues.
The commission shall have the authority to review and approve schedules for
retention and destruction of records submitted by state and local agencies. In all
cases, the commission shall determine questions which relate to destruction of
public records, and their decision shall be binding on the parties concerned and
final, except that the commission may reconsider or modify its actions upon the
agreement of a simple majority of the membership present and voting.
Section 115. KRS 183.132 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any urban-county government, city, or county, or city and county acting jointly, or
any combination of two (2) or more cities, counties, or both, may establish a
nonpartisan air board composed of six (6) members or, under subsection (7) of this
section, of eleven (11), twelve (12), or thirteen (13) members. Any city other than
the first class and county jointly or an urban-county government established
pursuant to KRS Chapter 67A may establish a nonpartisan board composed of ten
(10) members. Any existing six (6) member board, including a board established in
an urban-county government, may be expanded to ten (10) members by action of
the government entity or entities that established the six (6) member board.
(2) Any city of the first class, jointly with the county containing the city or a
consolidated local government, may establish or maintain a nonpartisan air board.
Membership of the board shall be appointed in accordance with subsection (9) or
(14) of this section. Any air board established or maintained in a county containing
a city of the first class or consolidated local government shall be composed of
eleven (11) members.
(3) In the case where a nonpartisan air board composed of six (6) members is created
by cities, counties, or both, those cities, counties, or both may pass ordinances and
Page 202 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
adjust any existing memorandum of agreement to allow a state university which
operates an aviation degree program approved by the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] under KRS 164.020 to
be a constituent party to the air board. In that case, the board shall be eight (8)
members in total, and the university shall nominate for appointment two (2)
members to the air board as set out in subsection (6) of this section.
(4) The board shall be a body politic and corporate with the usual corporate attributes,
and in its corporate name may sue and be sued, contract and be contracted with, and
do all things reasonable or necessary to effectively carry out the duties prescribed
by statute. The board shall constitute a legislative body for the purposes of KRS
183.630 to 183.740.
(5) The members of an air board composed of six (6) members shall be appointed as
follows:
(a) If the air board is established by a city, the members shall be appointed by the
mayor of the city;
(b) If the air board is established as a joint city-county air board, the members
shall be appointed jointly by the mayor of the city and the county
judge/executive;
(c) If a combination of cities, counties, or both, establishes a joint air board, the
mayors and county judges/executive involved shall jointly choose six (6)
members and shall jointly choose successors;
(d) If the air board is established by an urban-county government, the mayor of
the urban-county government or an officer of the urban-county government
designated by the mayor shall serve as one (1) member of the board. The
remaining five (5) members shall be appointed by the mayor. One (1) of the
members appointed by the mayor shall live within a three (3) mile radius of
the airport.
Page 203 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(6) If an air board is composed of eight (8) members that are a combination of cities,
counties, or both, and an eligible state university as set out in subsection (3) of this
section, then the mayors, county judges/executive, and university board of regents
involved shall jointly choose eight (8) members and shall jointly choose successors.
In making the appointment for the university, the president of the university shall
submit for confirmation the name of the individual and the university's board of
regents shall confirm his or her nomination before the individual's name is
submitted for joint appointment.
(7) If the air board is established by a county, the members shall be appointed by the
county judge/executive, except that in the event that an airport is located outside the
boundary of the county establishing the airport board, the voting members of the air
board are appointed as follows:
(a) One (1) member appointed by the Governor of the Commonwealth;
(b) Ten (10), eleven (11), or twelve (12) members appointed from the following
jurisdictions located within a twenty (20) mile radius of the airport operations:
1. Eight (8) members appointed by the judge/executive of the county
establishing the air board, with the approval of the county fiscal court. If
the air board is located within a metropolitan statistical area, as defined
by the United States Bureau of the Census, the county judge/executive,
with the approval of the county fiscal court, may choose to appoint two
(2) of these members as follows:
a. One (1) member may be appointed following nomination by the
chief executive officer of the largest city within the metropolitan
statistical area;
b. One (1) member may be appointed following nomination by the
chief executive officer of the county containing the largest city
within the metropolitan statistical area, if that county does not
Page 204 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
already have representation on the board; and
c. The county judge/executive of the county establishing the air
board may choose whether to invite the chief executive officers
identified in subdivisions a. and b. of this subparagraph to
nominate members. If the county judge/executive does invite a
chief executive officer to make a nomination and the chief
executive officer makes a nomination, the county judge/executive
may choose whether to appoint that nominee or to appoint another
person instead;
2. Two (2) members appointed by the county judge/executive of the county
containing the majority of territory encompassing the airport. This
appointment shall be made with the approval of both the fiscal court of
the county containing the majority of territory encompassing the airport
and the fiscal court of the county establishing the air board; and
3. One (1) or two (2) additional members, if there are any counties within
the prescribed geographic limits that do not otherwise have an
appointment to the air board. If there is one (1) such county, this
appointment shall be made by the county judge/executive of that county,
with the approval of that county's fiscal court. If there are two (2) or
more such counties, these appointments shall be made by the county
judges/executive of the two (2) counties among them having the largest
population, and the appointments shall receive the approval of those
respective counties' fiscal courts and the fiscal court of the county
establishing the air board; and
(c) Board members of any air board established prior to June 24, 2015, that is
operating an airport that is located outside the boundary of the county
establishing the airport board shall serve out the remainder of their terms.
Page 205 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Additional voting members shall assume their offices on the July 1 following
June 24, 2015, and be appointed as follows:
1. The member appointed by the Governor shall be appointed for an initial
term of one (1) year;
2. One (1) member from the county containing the majority of territory
encompassing the airport shall be appointed for an initial term of two (2)
years;
3. One (1) member from the county containing the majority of territory
encompassing the airport shall be appointed for an initial term of three
(3) years;
4. One (1) member from the county establishing the airport board shall be
appointed for an initial term of four (4) years; and
5. If there are any, the members from the counties that are not otherwise
represented on the air board within the prescribed geographic limit shall
be appointed for an initial term of four (4) years.
Thereafter, their replacements shall serve a full four (4) year term. All
members may be reappointed for subsequent terms. The majority of all air
board appointees shall be residents of the county establishing the air board.
(8) The members of an air board composed of ten (10) members in a city other than a
city of the first class and county jointly other than an urban-county government
established pursuant to KRS Chapter 67A shall be appointed as follows:
(a) Five (5) members shall be appointed by the mayor of the city, without
approval of the legislative body;
(b) Five (5) members shall be appointed by the county judge/executive without
approval of the other members of the fiscal court.
(9) An air board consisting of eleven (11) members and established jointly by a city of
the first class and the county containing the first class city shall be composed of
Page 206 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
members as follows:
(a) The mayor of the city of the first class;
(b) The county judge/executive of the county containing the city of the first class;
(c) Three (3) members appointed by the mayor of the city of the first class;
(d) Three (3) members appointed by the county judge/executive of the county,
with the approval of the fiscal court;
(e) Two (2) members, who shall be residents of the county containing a city of
the first class or of counties contiguous thereto, appointed by the Governor;
and
(f) One (1) member, who shall be a member of the executive board of an
incorporated alliance of incorporated neighborhood associations and cities
with a population of less than three thousand (3,000) based upon the most
recent federal decennial census which represents citizens living within a five
(5) mile radius of airport operations, appointed by the Governor. If more than
one (1) incorporated alliance exists, the Governor shall select the appointee
from the executive boards of any of the incorporated alliances. If no alliances
exist, the Governor shall appoint a citizen of the county who resides within a
five (5) mile radius of airport operations.
(10) An air board consisting of eleven (11) members and established or maintained by a
consolidated local government upon its establishment shall be composed of
members as follows:
(a) The mayor of the consolidated local government;
(b) Seven (7) members appointed by the mayor of the consolidated local
government;
(c) Two (2) members who shall be residents of the county containing the
consolidated local government or residents of counties contiguous to the
county containing the consolidated local government, appointed by the
Page 207 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Governor; and
(d) One (1) member who shall be a member of the executive board of an
incorporated alliance of incorporated neighborhood associations and cities
with a population of less than three thousand (3,000) based upon the most
recent federal decennial census which represents citizens living within a five
(5) mile radius of airport operations, appointed by the Governor. If more than
one (1) incorporated alliance exists, the Governor shall select the appointee
from the executive boards of any of the incorporated alliances. If no alliances
exist, the Governor shall appoint a citizen of the county who resides within a
five (5) mile radius of airport operations.
(11) The members of an air board composed of ten (10) members established by an
urban-county government shall be composed of the mayor of the urban-county
government or an officer of the urban-county government designated by the mayor.
The remaining nine (9) members shall be appointed by the mayor. Two (2) of the
members appointed by the mayor shall live within a three (3) mile radius of the
airport.
(12) Members of the board composed of six (6) members, or eight (8) members as set
out in subsection (3) of this section, shall serve for a term of four (4) years each and
until their successors are appointed and qualified. The initial appointments shall be
made so that two (2) members are appointed for two (2) years, two (2) members for
three (3) years, and two (2) members for four (4) years. The initial terms of the
members nominated by a state university and jointly appointed by the cities and
county comprising the air board under subsection (3) of this section shall be one (1)
appointee serving a two (2) year term and one (1) appointee serving a four (4) year
term. Upon expiration of the staggered terms, successors shall be appointed for a
term of four (4) years.
(13) Members of the board composed of ten (10) members in a city other than a city of
Page 208 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
the first class and county jointly shall serve for a term of four (4) years each and
until their successors are appointed and qualified. The initial appointments made by
the mayor and the county judge/executive shall be made so that one (1) member is
appointed for two (2) years, two (2) members are appointed for three (3) years, and
two (2) members are appointed for four (4) years. If an existing six (6) member
board is being increased to a ten (10) member board, initial appointments of the
four (4) new members shall be made so that the mayor and the county
judge/executive, or the mayor if the board is established by an urban-county
government, each appoint one (1) member for two (2) years and one (1) member for
four (4) years. Upon expiration of the initial terms, successors shall be appointed
for a term of four (4) years. In the case of a board established by an urban-county
government, the term of the mayor for the urban-county government, or the officer
of the urban-county government designated by the mayor, shall be coextensive with
the term of the mayor.
(14) Members of an air board composed of eleven (11) members and established or
maintained jointly by a city of the first class and the county containing a city of the
first class shall serve for a term of three (3) years each and until their successors are
appointed and qualified. The terms of the mayor and the county judge/executive
shall be coextensive with their terms of office. The mayor and the county
judge/executive shall each make their initial appointments to a board established
jointly by a city of the first class and the county containing a city of the first class so
that one (1) member is appointed for one (1) year, one (1) member is appointed for
two (2) years, and one (1) member is appointed for three (3) years. The Governor
shall make the initial appointments so that one (1) member is appointed for two (2)
years and one (1) member is appointed for three (3) years. Upon the expiration of
the initial terms, successors shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years.
(15) Members of an air board composed of eleven (11) members in a county that has
Page 209 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
established a consolidated local government in a county containing a former city of
the first class shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. The
terms of office on the air board of the mayor of the previously existing city of the
first class and the county judge/executive of this county shall expire upon the
establishment of a consolidated local government. Upon the establishment of a
consolidated local government, if the consolidated local government maintains the
previously existing air board, the incumbent members, except the mayor of the
previously existing city of the first class and the county judge/executive of that
county, shall continue to serve as members of the board for the time remaining of
their current terms of appointment. The Governor shall appoint members pursuant
to subsection (10)(c) and (d) of this section. The mayor of the consolidated local
government shall serve on the board for a term which shall be coextensive with his
or her term of office. Incumbent members shall be eligible for reappointment upon
the expiration of their terms. The terms of all other board members shall be for four
(4) years. Upon the establishment of a consolidated local government and
maintenance of a previously existing air board, any incumbent member whose term
had expired but who had continued to serve because the member's successor had
not been appointed, shall continue to serve until a successor is appointed.
Successors shall be appointed by the mayor or the Governor as provided by law
within sixty (60) days after the establishment of the consolidated local government.
As the terms of the previously serving members of an air board being maintained by
a consolidated local government expire, the mayor of the consolidated local
government and the Governor shall respectively make their new appointments.
(16) Members of the board shall serve without compensation but shall be allowed any
reasonable expenses incurred by them in the conduct of the affairs of the board. The
board shall, upon the appointment of its members, organize and elect officers. The
board, except for a board composed of eleven (11) members, shall choose a
Page 210 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
chairman and vice chairman who shall serve for terms of one (1) year. Where the
board is composed of eleven (11) members and established jointly by a city of the
first class and the county containing a city of the first class, the mayor of the city of
the first class and the county judge/executive shall jointly appoint the chairman
from among the membership of the board. Where the board is composed of eleven
(11) members and is in a county containing a consolidated local government, the
mayor shall appoint the chairman from among the membership of the board. The
board shall also choose a secretary-treasurer who may or may not be a member of
the board. The board may fix a salary for the secretary-treasurer and the secretary-
treasurer shall execute an official bond to be set and approved by the board, and the
cost of the bond shall be paid by the board.
(17) The board may employ necessary counsel, agents, and employees to carry out its
work and functions and prescribe rules and regulations as it deems necessary.
(18) The secretary-treasurer shall keep the minutes of all meetings of the board and shall
also keep a set of books showing the receipts and expenditures of the board. The
secretary-treasurer shall preserve on file duplicate vouchers for all expenditures and
shall present to the board, upon request, complete reports of all financial
transactions and the financial condition of the board. The books and vouchers shall
at all times be subject to examination by the legislative body or bodies by whom the
board was created. The secretary-treasurer shall transmit at least once annually a
detailed report of all acts and doings of the board to the legislative body or bodies
by whom the board was created.
(19) In the event that a joint air board is created by cities, counties, or both, and has
authorized an eligible state university to become party to the air board under
subsection (3) of this section, and thereafter a city, county, or state university
desires to withdraw from participation, then the remaining participants may jointly
choose a successor member or members of the board. A local government or state
Page 211 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
university wanting to withdraw from participation in the board shall not be entitled
to return of any moneys or property advanced to the board.
(20) A quorum for the transacting of the business of a six (6) member board shall consist
of four (4) members, an eight (8) member board shall consist of five (5) members, a
ten (10) member board shall consist of six (6) members, and an eleven (11) member
board shall consist of six (6) members. Meetings of the board may be called by the
chairman or by four (4) members. In case of tie voting by the board, the issue shall
be deemed to have failed passage.
(21) A board member may be replaced by the appointing authority upon a showing to
the authority of misconduct as a board member or upon conviction of a felony. A
board member shall not hold any official office with the appointing authority,
except for the mayor of a city of the first class and the county judge/executive on a
board made up of eleven (11) members and established jointly by a city of the first
class and the county containing a city of the first class, or the mayor of an urban-
county government or a consolidated local government, or an officer of the urban-
county government designated by the mayor on a board established by an urban-
county government.
Section 116. KRS 200.505 is amended to read as follows:
There is hereby created a State Interagency Council for Services and Supports to
Children and Transition-Age Youth. The chairperson of the council shall be designated
by the Governor and shall establish procedures for the council's internal procedures.
(1) This council shall be composed of the following:
(a) Members who shall serve by virtue of their positions: the commissioner of the
Department of Education, the commissioner of the Department for Behavioral
Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities, the commissioner of the
Department for Community Based Services, the commissioner of the
Department for Public Health, the commissioner of the Department for
Page 212 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Medicaid Services, the commissioner of the Department of Juvenile Justice,
the director of the Division of Family Resource and Youth Services Centers,
the executive director of the Office for Children with Special Health Care
Needs, the executive officer of the Department of Family and Juvenile
Services of the Administrative Office of the Courts, the chair of the
Subcommittee for Equity and Justice for all Youth of the Juvenile Justice
Advisory Board, the executive director of the Kentucky Housing Corporation,
the executive director of the Kentucky Office of Vocational Rehabilitation,
and the executive director[president] of the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], or their
designees;
(b) The chairperson of the council shall appoint one (1) parent of a child or
transition-age youth with a behavioral health need, who is a consumer of
services and supports within the system of care to serve as a member of the
council, and one (1) parent who meets the same criteria to serve as the parent
member's alternate to serve in the absence of the parent member. For each
appointment to be made, the State Interagency Council for Services and
Supports to Children and Transition-Age Youth shall vote on nominations
submitted by members. The nominee receiving the most votes shall be
appointed. Appointees shall serve a term of two (2) years and may be
reappointed to additional two (2) year terms. If the child of the parent member
or alternate parent member ceases to be a consumer of services and supports
within the system of care during the term of appointment, the member shall be
eligible to serve out the remainder of the term of appointment. The alternate
parent member may attend and participate in all council meetings but shall
vote only in the absence of the parent member. The parent member and
alternate parent member shall receive no compensation in addition to that
Page 213 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
which they may already receive as service providers or state employees who
are required to attend as part of their duties, but the parent member and
alternate parent member shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred through
the performance of their duties as council members if it is outside the scope of
their job duties;
(c) The chairperson of the council shall appoint one (1) youth between the ages of
sixteen (16) and twenty-five (25), who has a behavioral health disorder and
who is receiving or has received services to address mental health, substance
use, or co-occurring mental health and substance use disorder, to serve as a
member of the council, and one (1) youth who meets the same criteria to serve
as the youth member's alternate in the absence of the youth member. For each
appointment to be made, the State Interagency Council for Services and
Supports to Children and Transition-Age Youth shall vote on nominations
submitted by members. The nominee receiving the most votes shall be
appointed. Appointees shall serve a term of two (2) years and may be
reappointed to additional two (2) year terms, and the youth member and the
youth member's alternate shall be eligible to serve out the remainder of their
term of appointment regardless of age. The alternate youth member may
attend and participate in all council meetings but shall vote only in the
absence of the youth member. The youth member and alternate youth member
shall receive no compensation in addition to that which they may already
receive as service providers or state employees who are required to attend as
part of their duties, but the youth member and alternate youth member shall be
reimbursed for expenses incurred through the performance of their duties as
council members if it is outside the scope of their job duties;
(d) The chairperson of the council shall appoint one (1) member of a nonprofit
family organization representing consumers of services and supports within
Page 214 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
the system of care whose membership, leadership, and governance include
parents, primary caregivers, or children or transition-age youth with serious
emotional, behavioral, or mental health needs, to serve as a member of the
council. For each appointment to be made, the chair shall publicly post on the
State Interagency Council for Services and Supports to Children and
Transition-Age Youth website[web site] a solicitation for letters of interest
from qualified organizations and submit all qualified responses to a vote of
the full membership. The organization which receives the most votes shall
designate a representative to serve a term of two (2) years, and may be
reappointed to additional two (2) year terms. The family organization member
shall receive no compensation in addition to that which the member may
already receive as an employee who is required to attend as part of his or her
duties, but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred through the performance
of duties as a council member if it is outside the scope of his or her job duties;
and
(e) At the end of a term, a member shall continue to serve until a successor is
appointed.
(2) The State Interagency Council for Services and Supports to Children and
Transition-Age Youth shall:
(a) Make recommendations annually to the Governor and the Legislative
Research Commission regarding the system of care for children and
transition-age youth with or at risk of behavioral health needs;
(b) Direct each regional interagency council to:
1. Operate as the regional locus of accountability for the system of care;
and
2. Participate in family accountability, intervention, and response teams
established pursuant to KRS 605.035;
Page 215 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(c) Assess the effectiveness of regional councils in serving as the locus of
accountability for the system of care for children and transition-age youth
with or at risk of behavioral health needs;
(d) Meet at least monthly and maintain records of meetings; and
(e) Develop a comprehensive array of services and supports to meet the needs of
children and transition-age youth with or at risk of developing behavioral
health needs.
(3) Agencies represented on the state council shall adopt interagency agreements as
necessary to advance the system of care.
(4) The State Interagency Council for Services and Supports to Children and
Transition-Age Youth may promulgate administrative regulations necessary to
comply with the requirements of KRS 200.501 to 200.509.
Section 117. KRS 210.051 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Eating Disorder Council is hereby established in the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services and shall be attached to the cabinet for administrative
purposes.
(2) The following members shall be appointed to the council:
(a) The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or his or her
designee;
(b) The commissioner of the Department for Medicaid Services or his or her
designee;
(c) The commissioner of the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental
and Intellectual Disabilities or his or her designee;
(d) The commissioner of the Department for Public Health or his or her designee;
(e) The commissioner of the Department of Insurance or his or her designee;
(f) The commissioner of the Department of Education or his or her designee;
(g) The executive director[president] of the Kentucky Higher Education
Page 216 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] or his or her
designee;
(h) One (1) representative to be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3)
individuals submitted by the Kentucky Hospital Association;
(i) One (1) psychologist who works with individuals who have eating disorders
to be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) individuals provided
by the Kentucky Psychological Association;
(j) One (1) pediatrician who works with individuals who have eating disorders to
be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) individuals provided by
the Kentucky Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics;
(k) One (1) psychiatrist who works with individuals who have eating disorders to
be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) individuals provided by
the Kentucky Psychiatric Medical Association;
(l) One (1) licensed clinical social worker who works with individuals who have
eating disorders to be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3)
individuals provided by the Kentucky Chapter of the National Association of
Social Workers;
(m) One (1) psychiatric nurse practitioner who works with individuals who have
eating disorders to be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3)
individuals provided by the Kentucky Association of Nurse Practitioners and
Nurse-Midwives;
(n) One (1) registered and licensed dietician who works with individuals who
have eating disorders to be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3)
individuals provided by the Kentucky Dietetics Association;
(o) One (1) eating disorder researcher to be appointed by the Governor from a list
of three (3) individuals provided by the Kentucky Psychological Association;
(p) One (1) public health policy researcher to be appointed by the Governor from
Page 217 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
a list of three (3) individuals provided by the Kentucky Public Health
Association; and
(q) Three (3) individuals who have an eating disorder or who have experience
with individuals who have eating disorders to be appointed by the Governor
from a list of five (5) individuals provided by the Louisville Center for Eating
Disorders until a statewide consumer and family advocacy organization is
established.
(3) The members of the council shall elect a chair and vice chair to serve one (1) year.
(4) The council shall meet at least quarterly or upon the call of the chair.
(5) After the initial appointments, members of the council shall serve terms of two (2)
years, beginning the day of appointment. Members of the council shall be eligible
to succeed themselves and shall serve until their successors are appointed.
(6) Members of the council shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed
for reasonable and necessary expenses in accordance with state travel expenses and
reimbursement administrative regulations.
(7) The council shall:
(a) Oversee the development and implementation of eating disorder awareness,
education, and prevention programs;
(b) Identify strategies for improving access to adequate diagnosis and treatment
services;
(c) Assist the cabinet in identifying eating disorder research projects;
(d) Work with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and other appropriate
entities to routinely examine existing surveillance systems, data collection
systems, and administrative databases to determine the best strategies for
implementing evidence-based eating disorder measures that provide data for
program and policy planning purposes;
(e) As reasonably as possible, collaborate and coordinate on data research
Page 218 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
projects with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and other
appropriate entities; and
(f) Make recommendations regarding legislative and regulatory changes as
appropriate.
(8) The council shall apply for grants from the federal government, private foundations,
or other sources that may be available for programs related to eating disorders.
(9) The council shall report annually beginning December 1, 2020, on its activities,
findings, and recommendations to the Governor and the Legislative Research
Commission.
(10) The Kentucky Eating Disorder Council shall cease to exist on December 1, 2030,
unless otherwise reestablished by the General Assembly.
Section 118. KRS 214.544 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A Colon Cancer Screening and Prevention Advisory Committee shall be
established. The advisory committee shall include:
(a) One (1) member of the House of Representatives who shall be appointed by
the Speaker of the House;
(b) One (1) member of the Senate who shall be appointed by the President of the
Senate;
(c) The deputy commissioner of the Department for Public Health;
(d) The commissioner of the Department of Insurance, or his or her designee;
(e) The commissioner of the Department for Medicaid Services, or his or her
designee;
(f) Two (2) at-large members who shall be appointed by the Governor;
(g) One (1) member who shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of three
(3) names provided by the American Cancer Society;
(h) The director of the Kentucky Cancer Program at the University of Kentucky;
(i) The director of the Kentucky Cancer Program at the University of Louisville;
Page 219 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(j) The director of the Kentucky Cancer Registry;
(k) The director of the Colon Cancer Prevention Project;
(l) The chair of Kentucky African Americans Against Cancer; and
(m) The director of the Kentucky Cancer Consortium.
Members of the advisory committee shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years.
(2) (a) Members appointed under subsection (1)(a) to (g) of this section shall be
appointed as follows:
1. Members shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years, except as
provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph;
2. The initial appointments shall be for a period of two (2) years;
thereafter, the appointments shall be for a term of four (4) years; and
3. Members shall not serve more than two (2) terms of four (4) years.
(b) Members serving under subsection (1)(h) to (m) of this section shall serve by
virtue of their positions and shall not be subject to term limits.
(3) The chair of the advisory committee shall be elected from the membership of the
advisory committee to serve for a two (2) year term. A member of the advisory
committee may designate an alternate to attend meetings in his or her place.
(4) The advisory committee may add members from other organizations as deemed
appropriate.
(5) The advisory committee shall provide recommendations for the overall
implementation and conduct of the Colon Cancer Screening and Prevention
Program.
(6) The advisory committee shall establish and provide oversight for a colon cancer
screening public awareness campaign. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services
shall contract with the Kentucky Cancer Consortium at the University of Kentucky
to provide the required support. The amount of the contract shall not be included in
the base budget of the university as used by the Kentucky Higher Education
Page 220 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] in determining the
funding formula for the university.
(7) The Colon Cancer Screening and Prevention Advisory Committee shall provide an
annual report on implementation and outcomes from the Colon Cancer Screening
and Prevention Program and recommendations to the Legislative Research
Commission, the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services, the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, the Governor, the secretary of the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and the commissioner of the Department
for Public Health.
(8) The Kentucky Cancer Program, jointly administered by the University of Kentucky
and the University of Louisville, shall establish a colon cancer screening, education,
and outreach program in each of the state area development districts. The colon
cancer screening, education, and outreach program shall focus on individuals who
lack access to colon cancer screening. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services
shall contract with the University of Louisville and the University of Kentucky to
provide the required support. The amount of the contract shall not be included in
the base budgets of the universities as used by the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] in determining the
funding formula for the universities.
Section 119. KRS 309.363 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person, institution, or business entity offering a massage therapy program of
instruction shall file a completed application for a certificate of good standing with
the board on a form prescribed by the board and pay a fee as specified in KRS
309.357. The completed application shall provide proof acceptable to the board that
the following criteria have been met:
(a) The school is licensed to operate by the Kentucky Commission on Proprietary
Education, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Page 221 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Postsecondary Education], or their equivalent in another state;
(b) A curriculum statement showing clock hours devoted to each subject with the
following minimums:
1. One hundred twenty-five (125) hours of anatomy, physiology, or
kinesiology;
2. A two hundred (200) hour course to include massage theory, technique,
and practice focusing on gliding strokes, kneading, direct pressure, deep
friction, joint movement, superficial warming techniques, percussion,
compression, vibration, jostling, shaking, and rocking;
3. Two hundred (200) hours of approach to the business of massage,
specifically including contraindications, benefits, business, history,
ethics, client documentation, legalities of massage, and modality courses
designed to meet the school's specific program objectives;
4. Forty (40) hours of pathology; and
5. The school may use its discretion in allotting the additional thirty-five
(35) curricular hours that are required under KRS 309.358; and
(c) A listing of instructional staff and their qualifications as follows:
1. Instructors of the practical courses shall be licensed massage therapists
and shall have three (3) years of experience in the practice of massage
therapy;
2. Instructors of science courses shall be either licensed massage therapists
with three (3) years of experience in the practice of massage therapy or
have certification or specific higher education in the subject they are
teaching; and
3. Instructors in adjunctive courses shall have subject-specific education
and experience.
(2) A school may be presumed to have met the qualifications in subsection (1)(b) and
Page 222 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(c) of this section if it holds a current designation of "Approved School" from the
National Certification Board of Therapeutic Massage and Bodywork or has the
designation of "accredited" or "COMTA-endorsed curriculum" from the Council for
Massage Therapy Accreditation.
(3) The board shall accept National Certification Board for Therapeutic Massage and
Bodywork guidelines in approving continuing education.
Section 120. KRS 309.464 is amended to read as follows:
The department shall:
(1) Promulgate administrative regulations, in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A,
necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS 309.462, including establishing:
(a) The core competencies of community health work;
(b) The community health worker certification application and renewal process,
including training, mentorship, and continuing education requirements;
(c) A certification application and renewal fee;
(d) Procedures for certification denial, suspension, and revocation; and
(e) The scope of practice for certified community health workers;
(2) Approve competency-based training programs and training providers, which shall
include the Kentucky Community and Technical College System;
(3) Approve organizations to provide continuing education for certified community
health workers; and
(4) Work with the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Kentucky
Council on Postsecondary Education] and the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System to ensure that appropriate college course credits are awarded to
individuals who complete certified community health worker training, mentorship,
and continuing education provided by competency-based providers approved by the
department.
Section 121. KRS 367.660 is amended to read as follows:
Page 223 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
The following solicitations are exempt from the provisions of KRS 367.650 to 367.670:
(1) Solicitations by an organization of contributions from its members and their
families only, if membership is not included in a solicitation to avoid the provisions
of KRS 367.650 to 367.670, is not granted upon the basis of contributions alone,
and is within the exception of KRS 367.650(3).
(2) Solicitations by a religious organization for funds for religious purposes such as
maintenance of a house of worship, conduct of services, and propagation of its faith
and tenets as distinguished from other charitable and civic purposes employed by
nonreligious organizations.
(3) Solicitations by a publicly-owned or nonprofit privately-endowed educational
institution regulated by the Kentucky Board of Education, the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], or an
equivalent public authority of the jurisdiction where the institution is located, from
the alumni, faculty members, student body of the institution and their families, and
from corporations, for the continuance of an established educational program.
(4) Local solicitations by a student group or parent-teacher association for its campus
or group connected activities with the approval of the administration of the
educational institution.
Section 122. KRS 11A.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Business" means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited
partnership, sole proprietorship, firm, enterprise, franchise, association,
organization, self-employed individual, holding company, joint stock company,
receivership, trust, or any legal entity through which business is conducted, whether
or not for profit;
(2) "Commission" means the Executive Branch Ethics Commission;
(3) "Compensation" means any money, thing of value, or economic benefit conferred
Page 224 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
on, or received by, any person in return for services rendered, or to be rendered, by
himself or herself or another;
(4) "Family" means spouse and children, as well as a person who is related to a public
servant as any of the following, whether by blood or adoption: parent, brother,
sister, grandparent, grandchild, father-in-law, mother-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-
in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, stepfather, stepmother, stepson, stepdaughter,
stepbrother, stepsister, half brother, half sister;
(5) "Gift" means a payment, loan, subscription, advance, deposit of money, services, or
anything of value, unless consideration of equal or greater value is received; "gift"
does not include gifts from family members, campaign contributions, the waiver of
a registration fee for a presenter at a conference or training described in KRS
45A.097(5), or door prizes available to the public;
(6) "Income" means any money or thing of value received or to be received as a claim
on future services, whether in the form of a fee, salary, expense allowance,
forbearance, forgiveness, interest, dividend, royalty, rent, capital gain, or any other
form of compensation or any combination thereof;
(7) "Officer" means:
(a) All major management personnel in the executive branch of state government,
including the secretary of the cabinet, the Governor's chief executive officers,
cabinet secretaries, deputy cabinet secretaries, general counsels,
commissioners, deputy commissioners, executive directors, executive
assistants, policy advisors, special assistants, administrative coordinators,
executive advisors, staff assistants, and division directors;
(b) Members and full-time chief administrative officers of:
1. The Parole Board;
2. Office of Claims and Appeals;
3. Board of Tax Appeals;
Page 225 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
4. Board of Claims;
5. Crime Victims Compensation Board;
6. Kentucky Retirement Systems board of trustees;
7. Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System board of trustees;
8. The Kentucky Public Employees Deferred Compensation Authority
board of trustees;
9. Public Service Commission;
10. Worker's Compensation Board and its administrative law judges;
11. The Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission;
12. The Kentucky Board of Education;
13. The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education];
14. County Employees Retirement System board of trustees;
15. Kentucky Public Pensions Authority; and
16. The Kentucky Horse Racing and Gaming Corporation;
(c) Salaried members of executive branch boards and commissions; and
(d) Any person who, through a personal service contract or any other contractual
employment arrangement with an agency, performs on a full-time,
nonseasonal basis a function of any major management position listed in this
subsection;
(8) "Official duty" means any responsibility imposed on a public servant by virtue of
his or her position in the state service;
(9) "Public servant" means:
(a) The Governor;
(b) The Lieutenant Governor;
(c) The Secretary of State;
(d) The Attorney General;
Page 226 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(e) The Treasurer;
(f) The Commissioner of Agriculture;
(g) The Auditor of Public Accounts;
(h) All employees in the executive branch including officers as defined in
subsection (7) of this section and merit employees; and
(i) Any person who, through any contractual arrangement with an agency, is
employed to perform a function of a position within an executive branch
agency on a full-time, nonseasonal basis;
(10) "Agency" means every state office, cabinet, department, board, commission, public
corporation, or authority in the executive branch of state government. A public
servant is employed by the agency by which his or her appointing authority is
employed, unless his or her agency is attached to the appointing authority's agency
for administrative purposes only, or unless the agency's characteristics are of a
separate independent nature distinct from the appointing authority and it is
considered an agency on its own, such as an independent department;
(11) "Lobbyist" means any person employed as a legislative agent as defined in KRS
6.611(23) or any person employed as an executive agency lobbyist as defined in
KRS 11A.201(9);
(12) "Lobbyist's principal" means the entity in whose behalf the lobbyist promotes,
opposes, or acts;
(13) "Candidate" means those persons who have officially filed candidacy papers or who
have been nominated by their political party pursuant to KRS 118.105, 118.115,
118.325, or 118.760 for any of the offices enumerated in subsections (9)(a) to (g) of
this section;
(14) "Does business with" or "doing business with" means contracting, entering into an
agreement, leasing, or otherwise exchanging services or goods with a state agency
in return for payment by the state, including accepting a grant, but not including
Page 227 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
accepting a state entitlement fund disbursement;
(15) "Public agency" means any governmental entity;
(16) "Appointing authority" means the agency head or any person whom he or she has
authorized by law to act on behalf of the agency with respect to employee
appointments;
(17) "Represent" means to attend an agency proceeding, write a letter, or communicate
with an employee of an agency on behalf of someone else;
(18) "Directly involved" means to work on personally or to supervise someone who
works on personally;
(19) "Sporting event" means any professional or amateur sport, athletic game, contest,
event, or race involving machines, persons, or animals, for which admission tickets
are offered for sale and that is viewed by the public;
(20) "Person" means an individual, proprietorship, firm, partnership, limited partnership,
joint venture, joint stock company, syndicate, business or statutory trust, donative
trust, estate, company, corporation, limited liability company, association, club,
committee, organization, or group of persons acting in concert; and
(21) "Salaried" means receiving a fixed compensation or benefit reserved for full-time
employees, which is paid on a regular basis without regard to the actual number of
hours worked.
Section 123. KRS 12.020 (Effective until July 1, 2025) is amended to read as
follows:
Departments, program cabinets and their departments, and the respective major
administrative bodies that they include are enumerated in this section. It is not intended
that this enumeration of administrative bodies be all-inclusive. Every authority, board,
bureau, interstate compact, commission, committee, conference, council, office, or any
other form of organization shall be included in or attached to the department or program
cabinet in which they are included or to which they are attached by statute or statutorily
Page 228 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
authorized executive order; except in the case of the Personnel Board and where the
attached department or administrative body is headed by a constitutionally elected
officer, the attachment shall be solely for the purpose of dissemination of information and
coordination of activities and shall not include any authority over the functions,
personnel, funds, equipment, facilities, or records of the department or administrative
body.
I. Cabinet for General Government - Departments headed by elected officers:
(1) The Governor.
(2) Lieutenant Governor.
(3) Department of State.
(a) Secretary of State.
(b) Board of Elections.
(c) Registry of Election Finance.
(4) Department of Law.
(a) Attorney General.
(5) Department of the Treasury.
(a) Treasurer.
(6) Department of Agriculture.
(a) Commissioner of Agriculture.
(b) Agricultural Development Board.
(c) Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation.
(7) Auditor of Public Accounts.
(a) Commonwealth Office of the Ombudsman.
II. Program cabinets headed by appointed officers:
(1) Justice and Public Safety Cabinet:
(a) Department of Kentucky State Police.
1. Office of Administrative Services.
Page 229 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
a. Division of Operational Support.
b. Division of Management Services.
2. Office of Operations.
a. Division of West Troops.
b. Division of East Troops.
c. Division of Special Enforcement.
d. Division of Commercial Vehicle Enforcement.
3. Office of Technical Services.
a. Division of Forensic Sciences.
b. Division of Electronic Services.
c. Division of Records Management.
(b) Department of Criminal Justice Training.
(c) Department of Corrections.
(d) Department of Juvenile Justice.
(e) Office of the Secretary.
(f) Office of Drug Control Policy.
(g) Office of Legal Services.
(h) Office of the Kentucky State Medical Examiner.
(i) Parole Board.
(j) Kentucky State Corrections Commission.
(k) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Services.
(l) Office of Human Resource Management.
1. Division of Human Resource Administration.
2. Division of Employee Management.
(m) Department of Public Advocacy.
(n) Office of Communications.
1. Information Technology Services Division.
Page 230 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(o) Office of Financial Management Services.
1. Division of Financial Management.
(p) Grants Management Division.
(2) Energy and Environment Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Legal Division I.
b. Legal Division II.
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
4. Office of Communication.
5. Mine Safety Review Commission.
6. Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves.
7. Kentucky Public Service Commission.
(b) Department for Environmental Protection.
1. Office of the Commissioner.
2. Division for Air Quality.
3. Division of Water.
4. Division of Environmental Program Support.
5. Division of Waste Management.
6. Division of Enforcement.
7. Division of Compliance Assistance.
(c) Department for Natural Resources.
1. Office of the Commissioner.
2. Division of Mine Permits.
3. Division of Mine Reclamation and Enforcement.
4. Division of Abandoned Mine Lands.
Page 231 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
5. Division of Oil and Gas.
6. Division of Mine Safety.
7. Division of Forestry.
8. Division of Conservation.
9. Office of the Reclamation Guaranty Fund.
(d) Office of Energy Policy.
1. Division of Energy Assistance.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
1. Division of Human Resources Management.
2. Division of Financial Management.
3. Division of Information Services.
(3) Public Protection Cabinet.
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Communications and Public Outreach.
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Insurance Legal Division.
b. Charitable Gaming Legal Division.
c. Alcoholic Beverage Control Legal Division.
d. Housing, Buildings and Construction Legal Division.
e. Financial Institutions Legal Division.
f. Professional Licensing Legal Division.
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
4. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Human Resources.
b. Division of Fiscal Responsibility.
(b) Office of Claims and Appeals.
1. Board of Tax Appeals.
Page 232 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
2. Board of Claims.
3. Crime Victims Compensation Board.
(c) Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission.
(d) Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.
1. Division of Distilled Spirits.
2. Division of Malt Beverages.
3. Division of Enforcement.
(e) Department of Charitable Gaming.
1. Division of Licensing and Compliance.
2. Division of Enforcement.
(f) Department of Financial Institutions.
1. Division of Depository Institutions.
2. Division of Non-Depository Institutions.
3. Division of Securities.
(g) Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.
1. Division of Fire Prevention.
2. Division of Plumbing.
3. Division of Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning.
4. Division of Building Code Enforcement.
(h) Department of Insurance.
1. Division of Health and Life Insurance and Managed Care.
2. Division of Property and Casualty Insurance.
3. Division of Administrative Services.
4. Division of Financial Standards and Examination.
5. Division of Licensing.
6. Division of Insurance Fraud Investigation.
7. Division of Consumer Protection.
Page 233 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(i) Department of Professional Licensing.
1. Real Estate Authority.
2. Division of Real Property Boards.
(4) Transportation Cabinet:
(a) Department of Highways.
1. Office of Project Development.
2. Office of Project Delivery and Preservation.
3. Office of Highway Safety.
4. Highway District Offices One through Twelve.
(b) Department of Vehicle Regulation.
(c) Department of Aviation.
(d) Department of Rural and Municipal Aid.
1. Office of Local Programs.
2. Office of Rural and Secondary Roads.
(e) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Public Affairs.
2. Office for Civil Rights and Small Business Development.
3. Office of Budget and Fiscal Management.
4. Office of Inspector General.
5. Secretary's Office of Safety.
(f) Office of Support Services.
(g) Office of Transportation Delivery.
(h) Office of Audits.
(i) Office of Human Resource Management.
(j) Office of Information Technology.
(k) Office of Legal Services.
(5) Cabinet for Economic Development:
Page 234 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legal Services.
2. Department for Business and Community Development.
a. Development and Retention Division – West Kentucky.
b. Development, Retention, and Administrative Division –
Central and East Kentucky.
c. Community and Workforce Development Division.
3. Department for Financial Services.
a. Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority.
b. Finance and Personnel Division.
c. IT and Resource Management Division.
d. Compliance Division.
e. Program Administration Division.
f. Bluegrass State Skills Corporation.
g. The GRANT Commission.
4. Office of Strategy and Public Affairs.
a. Marketing and Communications Division.
b. Research and Strategy Division.
5. Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation.
a. Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy.
(6) Cabinet for Health and Family Services:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Public Affairs.
2. Office of Legal Services.
3. Office of Inspector General.
4. Office of Human Resource Management.
5. Office of Finance and Budget.
Page 235 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
6. Office of Legislative and Regulatory Affairs.
7. Office of Administrative Services.
8. Office of Application Technology Services.
9. Office of Data Analytics.
10. Office of Medical Cannabis.
a. Division of Enforcement and Compliance.
b. Division of Licensure and Access.
(b) Department for Public Health.
(c) Department for Medicaid Services.
(d) Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual
Disabilities.
(e) Department for Aging and Independent Living.
(f) Department for Community Based Services.
(g) Department for Income Support.
(h) Department for Family Resource Centers and Volunteer Services.
(7) Finance and Administration Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Office of the Inspector General.
(c) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
(d) Office of General Counsel.
(e) Office of the Controller.
(f) Office of Administrative Services.
(g) Office of Policy and Audit.
(h) Department for Facilities and Support Services.
(i) Department of Revenue.
(j) Commonwealth Office of Technology.
(k) State Property and Buildings Commission.
Page 236 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(l) Office of Equal Employment Opportunity and Contract Compliance.
(m) Kentucky Employees Retirement Systems.
(n) Commonwealth Credit Union.
(o) State Investment Commission.
(p) Kentucky Housing Corporation.
(q) Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority.
(r) Kentucky Turnpike Authority.
(s) Historic Properties Advisory Commission.
(t) Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority.
(u) Kentucky River Authority.
(v) Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System Board of Trustees.
(w) Executive Branch Ethics Commission.
(x) Office of Fleet Management.
(8) Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet:
(a) Kentucky Department of Tourism.
1. Division of Tourism Services.
2. Division of Marketing and Administration.
3. Division of Communications and Promotions.
(b) Kentucky Department of Parks.
1. Division of Information Technology.
2. Division of Human Resources.
3. Division of Financial Operations.
4. Division of Purchasing.
5. Division of Facilities.
6. Division of Park Operations.
7. Division of Sales, Marketing, and Customer Service.
8. Division of Engagement.
Page 237 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
9. Division of Food Services.
10. Division of Rangers.
(c) Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.
1. Division of Law Enforcement.
2. Division of Administrative Services.
3. Division of Engineering, Infrastructure, and Technology.
4. Division of Fisheries.
5. Division of Information and Education.
6. Division of Wildlife.
7. Division of Marketing.
(d) Kentucky Horse Park.
1. Division of Support Services.
2. Division of Buildings and Grounds.
3. Division of Operational Services.
(e) Kentucky State Fair Board.
1. Office of Administrative and Information Technology Services.
2. Office of Human Resources and Access Control.
3. Division of Expositions.
4. Division of Kentucky Exposition Center Operations.
5. Division of Kentucky International Convention Center.
6. Division of Public Relations and Media.
7. Division of Venue Services.
8. Division of Personnel Management and Staff Development.
9. Division of Sales.
10. Division of Security and Traffic Control.
11. Division of Information Technology.
12. Division of the Louisville Arena.
Page 238 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
13. Division of Fiscal and Contract Management.
14. Division of Access Control.
(f) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Finance.
2. Office of Government Relations and Administration.
(g) Office of Legal Affairs.
(h) Office of Human Resources.
(i) Office of Public Affairs and Constituent Services.
(j) Office of Arts and Cultural Heritage.
(k) Kentucky African-American Heritage Commission.
(l) Kentucky Foundation for the Arts.
(m) Kentucky Humanities Council.
(n) Kentucky Heritage Council.
(o) Kentucky Arts Council.
(p) Kentucky Historical Society.
1. Division of Museums.
2. Division of Oral History and Educational Outreach.
3. Division of Research and Publications.
4. Division of Administration.
(q) Kentucky Center for the Arts.
1. Division of Governor's School for the Arts.
(r) Kentucky Artisans Center at Berea.
(s) Northern Kentucky Convention Center.
(t) Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center.
(9) Personnel Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Department of Human Resources Administration.
Page 239 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(c) Office of Employee Relations.
(d) Kentucky Public Employees Deferred Compensation Authority.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
(f) Office of Legal Services.
(g) Governmental Services Center.
(h) Department of Employee Insurance.
(i) Office of Diversity, Equality, and Training.
(j) Office of Public Affairs.
(10) Education and Labor Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legal Services.
a. Workplace Standards Legal Division.
b. Workers' Claims Legal Division.
c. Workforce Development Legal Division.
2. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Human Resources Management.
b. Division of Fiscal Management.
c. Division of Operations and Support Services.
3. Office of Technology Services.
a. Division of Information Technology Services.
4. Office of Policy and Audit.
5. Office of Legislative Services.
6. Office of Communications.
7. Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
8. Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
9. Early Childhood Advisory Council.
10. Governors' Scholars Program.
Page 240 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
11. Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program.
12. Foundation for Adult Education.
(b) Department of Education.
1. Kentucky Board of Education.
2. Kentucky Technical Education Personnel Board.
3. Education Professional Standards Board.
(c) Board of Directors for the Center for School Safety.
(d) Department for Libraries and Archives.
(e) Kentucky Environmental Education Council.
(f) Kentucky Educational Television.
(g) Kentucky Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.
(h) Department of Workforce Development.
1. Career Development Office.
2. Office of Vocational Rehabilitation.
a. Division of Kentucky Business Enterprise.
b. Division of the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Training Center.
c. Division of Blind Services.
d. Division of Field Services.
e. Statewide Council for Vocational Rehabilitation.
f. Employment First Council.
3. Office of Employer and Apprenticeship Services.
a. Division of Apprenticeship.
4. Kentucky Apprenticeship Council.
5. Division of Technical Assistance.
6. Office of Adult Education.
7. Office of the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(i) Department of Workplace Standards.
Page 241 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
1. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Compliance.
2. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Education and
Training.
3. Division of Wages and Hours.
(j) Office of Unemployment Insurance.
(k) Kentucky Unemployment Insurance Commission.
(l) Department of Workers' Claims.
1. Division of Workers' Compensation Funds.
2. Office of Administrative Law Judges.
3. Division of Claims Processing.
4. Division of Security and Compliance.
5. Division of Specialist and Medical Services.
6. Workers' Compensation Board.
(m) Workers' Compensation Funding Commission.
(n) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board.
(o) State Labor Relations Board.
(p) Employers' Mutual Insurance Authority.
(q) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission.
(r) Workers' Compensation Nominating Committee.
(s) Office of Educational Programs.
(t) Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(u) Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education.
(v) Kentucky Work Ready Skills Advisory Committee.
(w) Kentucky Geographic Education Board.
(x) Disability Determination Services Program.
III. Other departments headed by appointed officers:
(1) [Council on Postsecondary Education.
Page 242 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(2) ]Department of Military Affairs.
(2)[(3)] Department for Local Government.
(3)[(4)] Kentucky Commission on Human Rights.
(4)[(5)] Kentucky Commission on Women.
(5)[(6)] Department of Veterans' Affairs.
(6)[(7)] Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs.
(7)[(8)] Office of Minority Empowerment.
(8)[(9)] Governor's Council on Wellness and Physical Activity.
(9)[(10)] Kentucky Communications Network Authority.
Section 124. KRS 12.020 (Effective July 1, 2025) is amended to read as
follows:
Departments, program cabinets and their departments, and the respective major
administrative bodies that they include are enumerated in this section. It is not intended
that this enumeration of administrative bodies be all-inclusive. Every authority, board,
bureau, interstate compact, commission, committee, conference, council, office, or any
other form of organization shall be included in or attached to the department or program
cabinet in which they are included or to which they are attached by statute or statutorily
authorized executive order; except in the case of the Personnel Board and where the
attached department or administrative body is headed by a constitutionally elected
officer, the attachment shall be solely for the purpose of dissemination of information and
coordination of activities and shall not include any authority over the functions,
personnel, funds, equipment, facilities, or records of the department or administrative
body.
I. Cabinet for General Government - Departments headed by elected officers:
(1) The Governor.
(2) Lieutenant Governor.
(3) Department of State.
Page 243 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(a) Secretary of State.
(b) Board of Elections.
(c) Registry of Election Finance.
(4) Department of Law.
(a) Attorney General.
(5) Department of the Treasury.
(a) Treasurer.
(6) Department of Agriculture.
(a) Commissioner of Agriculture.
(b) Agricultural Development Board.
(c) Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation.
(7) Auditor of Public Accounts.
(a) Commonwealth Office of the Ombudsman.
II. Program cabinets headed by appointed officers:
(1) Justice and Public Safety Cabinet:
(a) Department of Kentucky State Police.
1. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Operational Support.
b. Division of Management Services.
2. Office of Operations.
a. Division of West Troops.
b. Division of East Troops.
c. Division of Special Enforcement.
d. Division of Commercial Vehicle Enforcement.
3. Office of Technical Services.
a. Division of Forensic Sciences.
b. Division of Electronic Services.
Page 244 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
c. Division of Records Management.
(b) Department of Criminal Justice Training.
(c) Department of Corrections.
(d) Department of Juvenile Justice.
(e) Office of the Secretary.
(f) Office of Drug Control Policy.
(g) Office of Legal Services.
(h) Office of the Kentucky State Medical Examiner.
(i) Parole Board.
(j) Kentucky State Corrections Commission.
(k) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Services.
(l) Office of Human Resource Management.
1. Division of Human Resource Administration.
2. Division of Employee Management.
(m) Department of Public Advocacy.
(n) Office of Communications.
1. Information Technology Services Division.
(o) Office of Financial Management Services.
1. Division of Financial Management.
(p) Grants Management Division.
(2) Energy and Environment Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Legal Division I.
b. Legal Division II.
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
Page 245 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
4. Office of Communication.
5. Mine Safety Review Commission.
6. Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves.
7. Kentucky Public Service Commission.
(b) Department for Environmental Protection.
1. Office of the Commissioner.
2. Division for Air Quality.
3. Division of Water.
4. Division of Environmental Program Support.
5. Division of Waste Management.
6. Division of Enforcement.
7. Division of Compliance Assistance.
(c) Department for Natural Resources.
1. Office of the Commissioner.
2. Division of Mine Permits.
3. Division of Mine Reclamation and Enforcement.
4. Division of Abandoned Mine Lands.
5. Division of Oil and Gas.
6. Division of Mine Safety.
7. Division of Forestry.
8. Division of Conservation.
9. Office of the Reclamation Guaranty Fund.
(d) Office of Energy Policy.
1. Division of Energy Assistance.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
1. Division of Human Resources Management.
2. Division of Financial Management.
Page 246 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
3. Division of Information Services.
(3) Public Protection Cabinet.
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Communications and Public Outreach.
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Insurance Legal Division.
b. Alcoholic Beverage Control Legal Division.
c. Housing, Buildings and Construction Legal Division.
d. Financial Institutions Legal Division.
e. Professional Licensing Legal Division.
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
4. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Human Resources.
b. Division of Fiscal Responsibility.
(b) Office of Claims and Appeals.
1. Board of Tax Appeals.
2. Board of Claims.
3. Crime Victims Compensation Board.
(c) Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission.
(d) Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.
1. Division of Distilled Spirits.
2. Division of Malt Beverages.
3. Division of Enforcement.
(e) Department of Financial Institutions.
1. Division of Depository Institutions.
2. Division of Non-Depository Institutions.
3. Division of Securities.
Page 247 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(f) Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.
1. Division of Fire Prevention.
2. Division of Plumbing.
3. Division of Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning.
4. Division of Building Code Enforcement.
(g) Department of Insurance.
1. Division of Health and Life Insurance and Managed Care.
2. Division of Property and Casualty Insurance.
3. Division of Administrative Services.
4. Division of Financial Standards and Examination.
5. Division of Licensing.
6. Division of Insurance Fraud Investigation.
7. Division of Consumer Protection.
(h) Department of Professional Licensing.
1. Real Estate Authority.
2. Division of Real Property Boards.
(4) Transportation Cabinet:
(a) Department of Highways.
1. Office of Project Development.
2. Office of Project Delivery and Preservation.
3. Office of Highway Safety.
4. Highway District Offices One through Twelve.
(b) Department of Vehicle Regulation.
(c) Department of Aviation.
(d) Department of Rural and Municipal Aid.
1. Office of Local Programs.
2. Office of Rural and Secondary Roads.
Page 248 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(e) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Public Affairs.
2. Office for Civil Rights and Small Business Development.
3. Office of Budget and Fiscal Management.
4. Office of Inspector General.
5. Secretary's Office of Safety.
(f) Office of Support Services.
(g) Office of Transportation Delivery.
(h) Office of Audits.
(i) Office of Human Resource Management.
(j) Office of Information Technology.
(k) Office of Legal Services.
(5) Cabinet for Economic Development:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legal Services.
2. Department for Business and Community Development.
a. Development and Retention Division – West Kentucky.
b. Development, Retention, and Administrative Division –
Central and East Kentucky.
c. Community and Workforce Development Division.
3. Department for Financial Services.
a. Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority.
b. Finance and Personnel Division.
c. IT and Resource Management Division.
d. Compliance Division.
e. Program Administration Division.
f. Bluegrass State Skills Corporation.
Page 249 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
g. The GRANT Commission.
4. Office of Strategy and Public Affairs.
a. Marketing and Communications Division.
b. Research and Strategy Division.
5. Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation.
a. Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy.
(6) Cabinet for Health and Family Services:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Public Affairs.
2. Office of Legal Services.
3. Office of Inspector General.
4. Office of Human Resource Management.
5. Office of Finance and Budget.
6. Office of Legislative and Regulatory Affairs.
7. Office of Administrative Services.
8. Office of Application Technology Services.
9. Office of Data Analytics.
10. Office of Medical Cannabis.
a. Division of Enforcement and Compliance.
b. Division of Licensure and Access.
(b) Department for Public Health.
(c) Department for Medicaid Services.
(d) Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual
Disabilities.
(e) Department for Aging and Independent Living.
(f) Department for Community Based Services.
(g) Department for Family Resource Centers and Volunteer Services.
Page 250 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(7) Finance and Administration Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Office of the Inspector General.
(c) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
(d) Office of General Counsel.
(e) Office of the Controller.
(f) Office of Administrative Services.
(g) Office of Policy and Audit.
(h) Department for Facilities and Support Services.
(i) Department of Revenue.
(j) Commonwealth Office of Technology.
(k) State Property and Buildings Commission.
(l) Office of Equal Employment Opportunity and Contract Compliance.
(m) Kentucky Employees Retirement Systems.
(n) Commonwealth Credit Union.
(o) State Investment Commission.
(p) Kentucky Housing Corporation.
(q) Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority.
(r) Kentucky Turnpike Authority.
(s) Historic Properties Advisory Commission.
(t) Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority.
(u) Kentucky River Authority.
(v) Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System Board of Trustees.
(w) Executive Branch Ethics Commission.
(x) Office of Fleet Management.
(8) Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet:
(a) Kentucky Department of Tourism.
Page 251 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
1. Division of Tourism Services.
2. Division of Marketing and Administration.
3. Division of Communications and Promotions.
(b) Kentucky Department of Parks.
1. Division of Information Technology.
2. Division of Human Resources.
3. Division of Financial Operations.
4. Division of Purchasing.
5. Division of Facilities.
6. Division of Park Operations.
7. Division of Sales, Marketing, and Customer Service.
8. Division of Engagement.
9. Division of Food Services.
10. Division of Rangers.
(c) Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.
1. Division of Law Enforcement.
2. Division of Administrative Services.
3. Division of Engineering, Infrastructure, and Technology.
4. Division of Fisheries.
5. Division of Information and Education.
6. Division of Wildlife.
7. Division of Marketing.
(d) Kentucky Horse Park.
1. Division of Support Services.
2. Division of Buildings and Grounds.
3. Division of Operational Services.
(e) Kentucky State Fair Board.
Page 252 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
1. Office of Administrative and Information Technology Services.
2. Office of Human Resources and Access Control.
3. Division of Expositions.
4. Division of Kentucky Exposition Center Operations.
5. Division of Kentucky International Convention Center.
6. Division of Public Relations and Media.
7. Division of Venue Services.
8. Division of Personnel Management and Staff Development.
9. Division of Sales.
10. Division of Security and Traffic Control.
11. Division of Information Technology.
12. Division of the Louisville Arena.
13. Division of Fiscal and Contract Management.
14. Division of Access Control.
(f) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Finance.
2. Office of Government Relations and Administration.
(g) Office of Legal Affairs.
(h) Office of Human Resources.
(i) Office of Public Affairs and Constituent Services.
(j) Office of Arts and Cultural Heritage.
(k) Kentucky African-American Heritage Commission.
(l) Kentucky Foundation for the Arts.
(m) Kentucky Humanities Council.
(n) Kentucky Heritage Council.
(o) Kentucky Arts Council.
(p) Kentucky Historical Society.
Page 253 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
1. Division of Museums.
2. Division of Oral History and Educational Outreach.
3. Division of Research and Publications.
4. Division of Administration.
(q) Kentucky Center for the Arts.
1. Division of Governor's School for the Arts.
(r) Kentucky Artisans Center at Berea.
(s) Northern Kentucky Convention Center.
(t) Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center.
(9) Personnel Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Department of Human Resources Administration.
(c) Office of Employee Relations.
(d) Kentucky Public Employees Deferred Compensation Authority.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
(f) Office of Legal Services.
(g) Governmental Services Center.
(h) Department of Employee Insurance.
(i) Office of Diversity, Equality, and Training.
(j) Office of Public Affairs.
(10) Education and Labor Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legal Services.
a. Workplace Standards Legal Division.
b. Workers' Claims Legal Division.
c. Workforce Development Legal Division.
2. Office of Administrative Services.
Page 254 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
a. Division of Human Resources Management.
b. Division of Fiscal Management.
c. Division of Operations and Support Services.
3. Office of Technology Services.
a. Division of Information Technology Services.
4. Office of Policy and Audit.
5. Office of Legislative Services.
6. Office of Communications.
7. Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
8. Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
9. Early Childhood Advisory Council.
10. Governors' Scholars Program.
11. Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program.
12. Foundation for Adult Education.
(b) Department of Education.
1. Kentucky Board of Education.
2. Kentucky Technical Education Personnel Board.
3. Education Professional Standards Board.
(c) Board of Directors for the Center for School Safety.
(d) Department for Libraries and Archives.
(e) Kentucky Environmental Education Council.
(f) Kentucky Educational Television.
(g) Kentucky Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.
(h) Department of Workforce Development.
1. Career Development Office.
2. Office of Vocational Rehabilitation.
a. Division of Kentucky Business Enterprise.
Page 255 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
b. Division of the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Training Center.
c. Division of Blind Services.
d. Division of Field Services.
e. Statewide Council for Vocational Rehabilitation.
f. Employment First Council.
3. Office of Employer and Apprenticeship Services.
a. Division of Apprenticeship.
4. Kentucky Apprenticeship Council.
5. Division of Technical Assistance.
6. Office of Adult Education.
7. Office of the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(i) Department of Workplace Standards.
1. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Compliance.
2. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Education and
Training.
3. Division of Wages and Hours.
(j) Office of Unemployment Insurance.
(k) Kentucky Unemployment Insurance Commission.
(l) Department of Workers' Claims.
1. Division of Workers' Compensation Funds.
2. Office of Administrative Law Judges.
3. Division of Claims Processing.
4. Division of Security and Compliance.
5. Division of Specialist and Medical Services.
6. Workers' Compensation Board.
(m) Workers' Compensation Funding Commission.
(n) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board.
Page 256 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(o) State Labor Relations Board.
(p) Employers' Mutual Insurance Authority.
(q) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission.
(r) Workers' Compensation Nominating Committee.
(s) Office of Educational Programs.
(t) Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(u) Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education.
(v) Kentucky Work Ready Skills Advisory Committee.
(w) Kentucky Geographic Education Board.
(x) Disability Determination Services Program.
III. Other departments headed by appointed officers:
(1) [Council on Postsecondary Education.
(2) ]Department of Military Affairs.
(2)[(3)] Department for Local Government.
(3)[(4)] Kentucky Commission on Human Rights.
(4)[(5)] Kentucky Commission on Women.
(5)[(6)] Department of Veterans' Affairs.
(6)[(7)] Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs.
(7)[(8)] Office of Minority Empowerment.
(8)[(9)] Governor's Council on Wellness and Physical Activity.
(9)[(10)] Kentucky Communications Network Authority.
Section 125. KRS 12.023 is amended to read as follows:
The following organizational units and administrative bodies shall be attached to the
Office of the Governor:
(1) Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education];
(2) Department of Military Affairs;
Page 257 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(3) Department for Local Government;
(4) Kentucky Commission on Human Rights;
(5) Kentucky Commission on Women;
(6) Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs;
(7) Office of Minority Empowerment;
(a) The Martin Luther King Commission;
(8) Office of Homeland Security; and
(9) Kentucky Communications Network Authority.
Section 126. KRS 12.295 is amended to read as follows:
The following organizational units and administrative bodies shall be governed by their
respective substantive chapters as set out below:
(1) Board of Directors for the Center for School Safety under KRS Chapter 158;
(2) Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] under KRS Chapters[Chapter] 164 and 164A;
(3) Department of Education under KRS Chapters 156, 157, 158, 161, 163, and 167;
(4) Education Professional Standards Board under KRS Chapter 161;
(5) Kentucky Board of Education under KRS Chapters 156 and 157;
(6) Kentucky Commission on Deaf and Hard of Hearing under KRS Chapter 163; and
(7) Kentucky Educational Television under KRS Chapter 168.
Section 127. KRS 18A.115 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The classified service to which KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200 shall apply shall comprise
all positions in the state service now existing or hereafter established, except the
following:
(a) The General Assembly and employees of the General Assembly, including the
employees of the Legislative Research Commission;
(b) Officers elected by popular vote and persons appointed to fill vacancies in
elective offices;
Page 258 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(c) Members of boards and commissions;
(d) Officers and employees on the staff of the Governor, the Lieutenant
Governor, the Office of the Secretary of the Governor's Cabinet, and the
Office of Program Administration;
(e) Cabinet secretaries, commissioners, office heads, and the administrative heads
of all boards and commissions, including the executive director of Kentucky
Educational Television;
(f) Employees of Kentucky Educational Television who have been determined to
be exempt from classified service by the Kentucky Authority for Educational
Television, which shall have sole authority over such exempt employees for
employment, dismissal, and setting of compensation, up to the maximum
established for the executive director and his or her principal assistants;
(g) One (1) principal assistant or deputy for each person exempted under
subsection (1)(e) of this section;
(h) One (1) additional principal assistant or deputy as may be necessary for
making and carrying out policy for each person exempted under subsection
(1)(e) of this section in those instances in which the nature of the functions,
size, or complexity of the unit involved are such that the secretary approves
such an addition on petition of the relevant cabinet secretary or department
head and such other principal assistants, deputies, or other major assistants as
may be necessary for making and carrying out policy for each person
exempted under subsection (1)(e) of this section in those instances in which
the nature of the functions, size, or complexity of the unit involved are such
that the board may approve such an addition or additions on petition of the
department head approved by the secretary. Effective August 1, 2010:
1. All positions approved under this paragraph prior to August 1, 2010,
shall be abolished effective December 31, 2010, unless reapproved
Page 259 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
under subparagraph 2. of this paragraph; and
2. A position approved under this paragraph on or after August 1, 2010,
shall be approved for a period of five (5) years, after which time the
position shall be abolished unless reapproved under this subparagraph
for an additional five (5) year period;
(i) Division directors subject to the provisions of KRS 18A.170. Division
directors in the classified service as of January 1, 1980, shall remain in the
classified service;
(j) Physicians employed as such;
(k) One (1) private secretary for each person exempted under subsection (1)(e),
(g), and (h) of this section;
(l) The judicial department, referees, receivers, jurors, and notaries public;
(m) Officers and members of the staffs of state universities and colleges and
student employees of such institutions; officers and employees of the
Teachers' Retirement System; and officers, teachers, and employees of local
boards of education;
(n) Patients or inmates employed in state institutions;
(o) Persons employed in a professional or scientific capacity to make or conduct a
temporary or special inquiry, investigation, or examination on behalf of the
General Assembly, or a committee thereof, or by authority of the Governor,
and persons employed by state agencies for a specified, limited period to
provide professional, technical, scientific, or artistic services under the
provisions of KRS 45A.690 to 45A.725;
(p) Interim employees;
(q) Officers and members of the state militia;
(r) Department of Kentucky State Police troopers;
(s) University or college engineering students or other students employed part-
Page 260 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
time or part-year by the state through special personnel recruitment programs;
provided that while so employed such aides shall be under contract to work
full-time for the state after graduation for a period of time approved by the
commissioner or shall be participants in a cooperative education program
approved by the commissioner;
(t) Superintendents of state mental institutions, including heads of centers for
individuals with an intellectual disability, and penal and correctional
institutions as referred to in KRS 196.180(2);
(u) Staff members of the Kentucky Historical Society, if they are hired in
accordance with KRS 171.311;
(v) County and Commonwealth's attorneys and their respective appointees;
(w) Chief district engineers and the state highway engineer;
(x) Veterinarians employed as such by the Kentucky Horse Racing and Gaming
Corporation;
(y) Employees of the Kentucky Peace Corps;
(z) Employees of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council
on Postsecondary Education];
(aa) Executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology;
(ab) Employees of Serve Kentucky;
(ac) Persons employed in certified teaching positions at the Kentucky School for
the Blind and the Kentucky School for the Deaf;
(ad) Federally funded time-limited employees as defined in KRS 18A.005; and
(ae) Employees of the Department of Agriculture who are employed to support the
Agricultural Development Board and the Kentucky Agricultural Finance
Corporation.
(2) Nothing in KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200 is intended, or shall be construed, to alter or
amend the provisions of KRS 150.022 and 150.061.
Page 261 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(3) Nothing in KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200 is intended or shall be construed to affect any
nonmanagement, nonpolicy-making position which must be included in the
classified service as a prerequisite to the grant of federal funds to a state agency.
(4) Career employees within the classified service promoted to positions exempted
from classified service shall, upon termination of their employment in the exempted
service, revert to a position in that class in the agency from which they were
terminated if a vacancy in that class exists. If no such vacancy exists, they shall be
considered for employment in any vacant position for which they were qualified
pursuant to KRS 18A.130 and 18A.135.
(5) Nothing in KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200 shall be construed as precluding appointing
officers from filling unclassified positions in the manner in which positions in the
classified service are filled except as otherwise provided in KRS 18A.005 to
18A.200.
(6) The positions of employees who are transferred, effective July 1, 1998, from the
Cabinet for Workforce Development to the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System shall be abolished and the employees' names removed from the
roster of state employees. Employees that are transferred, effective July 1, 1998, to
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System under KRS Chapter 164
shall have the same benefits and rights as they had under KRS Chapter 18A and
have under KRS 164.5805; however, they shall have no guaranteed reemployment
rights in the KRS Chapter 151B or KRS Chapter 18A personnel systems. An
employee who seeks reemployment in a state position under KRS Chapter 151B or
KRS Chapter 18A shall have years of service in the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System counted towards years of experience for calculating
benefits and compensation.
(7) On August 15, 2000, all certified and equivalent personnel, all unclassified
personnel, and all certified and equivalent and unclassified vacant positions in the
Page 262 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Department for Adult Education and Literacy shall be transferred from the
personnel system under KRS Chapter 151B to the personnel system under KRS
Chapter 18A. The positions shall be deleted from the KRS Chapter 151B personnel
system. All records shall be transferred including accumulated annual leave, sick
leave, compensatory time, and service credit for each affected employee. The
personnel officers who administer the personnel systems under KRS Chapter 151B
and KRS Chapter 18A shall exercise the necessary administrative procedures to
effect the change in personnel authority. No certified or equivalent employee in the
Department for Adult Education and Literacy shall suffer any penalty in the
transfer.
(8) On August 15, 2000, secretaries and assistants attached to policymaking positions
in the Department for Technical Education and the Department for Adult Education
and Literacy shall be transferred from the personnel system under KRS Chapter
151B to the personnel system under KRS Chapter 18A. The positions shall be
deleted from the KRS Chapter 151B system. All records shall be transferred
including accumulated annual leave, sick leave, compensatory time, and service
credit for each affected employee. No employee shall suffer any penalty in the
transfer.
(9) On May 1, 2017, all contract employees of Eastern Kentucky University who are
engaged in providing instructional and support services to the Department of
Criminal Justice Training shall be transferred to the personnel system under KRS
Chapter 18A. All records shall be transferred, including accumulated annual leave,
sick leave, compensatory time, and service credit for each affected employee. The
personnel officers who administer the personnel systems for Eastern Kentucky
University and under KRS Chapter 18A shall exercise the necessary administrative
procedures to effect the change in personnel authority. No employee shall suffer
any penalty in the transfer.
Page 263 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(10) On July 1, 2024, all employees of the Louisville and Jefferson County Public
Defender Corporation shall be transferred to the personnel system under KRS
Chapter 18A. Records of each employee's job classification, compensation, dates of
employment, dates of professional licensure, probationary status, accumulated leave
balances by category, months of service, and any other information necessary under
KRS Chapter 18A shall be transferred. The personnel officers who administer the
personnel systems for the Louisville and Jefferson County Public Defender
Corporation and under KRS Chapter 18A shall exercise the necessary
administrative procedures to effect the change in the personnel authority. No
employee shall suffer any penalty in the transfer.
Section 128. KRS 42.732 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the Kentucky Information Technology Advisory Council to:
(a) Advise the executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology on
approaches to coordinating information technology solutions among libraries,
public schools, local governments, universities, and other public entities;
(b) Advise the executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology on
coordination among and across the organizational units of the executive
branch of state government to prepare for, respond to, and prevent attacks;
and
(c) Provide a forum for the discussion of emerging technologies that enhance
electronic accessibility to various publicly funded sources of information and
services.
(2) The Kentucky Information Technology Advisory Council shall consist of:
(a) The state budget director or a designee;
(b) The state librarian or a designee;
(c) One (1) representative from the public universities to be appointed by the
Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the Kentucky Higher
Page 264 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education];
(d) Three (3) citizen members from the private sector with information
technology knowledge and experience appointed by the Governor;
(e) Two (2) representatives of local government appointed by the Governor;
(f) One (1) representative from the area development districts appointed by the
Governor from a list of names submitted by the executive directors of the area
development districts;
(g) One (1) member of the media appointed by the Governor;
(h) The executive director of the Kentucky Authority for Educational Television;
(i) The chair of the Public Service Commission or a designee;
(j) Two (2) members of the Kentucky General Assembly, one (1) from each
chamber, selected by the Legislative Research Commission;
(k) One (1) representative of the Administrative Office of the Courts;
(l) One (1) representative from the public schools system appointed by the
Governor;
(m) One (1) representative of the Kentucky Chamber of Commerce;
(n) The executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology; and
(o) The executive director of the Kentucky Communications Network Authority
or designee.
(3) Appointed members of the council shall serve for a term of two (2) years. Members
who serve by virtue of an office shall serve on the council while they hold the
office.
(4) Vacancies on the council shall be filled in the same manner as the original
appointments. If a nominating organization changes its name, its successor
organization having the same responsibilities and purposes shall be the nominating
organization.
(5) Members shall receive no compensation but shall receive reimbursement for actual
Page 265 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
and necessary expenses in accordance with travel and subsistence requirements
established by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.
Section 129. KRS 42.738 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The executive director shall establish and implement a statewide public safety
interoperability plan. This plan shall include the development of required
architecture and standards that will ensure[ insure] that new or upgraded
Commonwealth public safety communications systems will interoperate. The
Kentucky Wireless Interoperability Executive Committee shall be responsible for
the evaluation and recommendation of all wireless communications architecture,
standards, and strategies. The executive director shall provide direction,
stewardship, leadership, and general oversight of information technology and
information resources. The executive director shall report by September 15
annually to the Interim Joint Committee on [Seniors, ]Veterans, Military Affairs,
and Public Protection and the Interim Joint Committee on State Government on
progress and activity by agencies of the Commonwealth to comply with standards
to achieve public safety communications interoperability.
(2) The Kentucky Wireless Interoperability Executive Committee shall serve as the
advisory body for all wireless communications strategies presented by agencies of
the Commonwealth and local governments. All state agencies in the
Commonwealth shall present all project plans for primary wireless public safety
voice or data communications systems for review and recommendation by the
committee, and the committee shall forward the plans to the executive director for
final approval. Local government entities shall present project plans for primary
wireless public safety voice or data communications systems for review and
recommendation by the Kentucky Wireless Interoperability Executive Committee.
(3) The committee shall develop funding and support plans that provide for the
maintenance of and technological upgrades to the public safety shared
Page 266 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
infrastructure, and shall make recommendations to the executive director, the
Governor's Office for Policy and Management, and the General Assembly.
(4) The executive director shall examine the project plans for primary wireless public
safety voice or data communications systems of state agencies as required by
subsection (2) of this section, and shall determine whether they meet the required
architecture and standards for primary wireless public safety voice or data
communications systems.
(5) The Kentucky Wireless Interoperability Executive Committee shall consist of
twenty (20) members as follows:
(a) A person knowledgeable in the field of wireless communications appointed by
the executive director who shall serve as chair;
(b) The executive director of the Office of Infrastructure Services,
Commonwealth Office of Technology;
(c) The executive director of Kentucky Educational Television, or the executive
director's designee;
(d) The information technology lead of the Transportation Cabinet;
(e) The information technology lead of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;
(f) The information technology lead of the Department of Kentucky State Police;
(g) The commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, or the
commissioner's designee;
(h) The information technology lead of the Energy and Environment Cabinet;
(i) The director of the Division of Emergency Management, Department of
Military Affairs;
(j) The executive director of the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security;
(k) The information technology lead of the Department for Public Health, Cabinet
for Health and Family Services;
(l) A representative from an institution of postsecondary education appointed by
Page 267 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
the Governor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the executive
director[president] of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education];
(m) The executive director of the Center for Rural Development, or the executive
director's designee;
(n) A representative from a municipal government to be appointed by the
Governor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky League of
Cities;
(o) A representative from a county government to be appointed by the Governor
from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Association of
Counties;
(p) A representative from a municipal police department to be appointed by the
Governor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky
Association of Chiefs of Police;
(q) A representative from a local fire department to be appointed by the Governor
from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Association of Fire
Chiefs;
(r) A representative from a county sheriff's department to be appointed by the
Governor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Sheriffs'
Association;
(s) A representative from a local Emergency Medical Services agency to be
appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the
Kentucky Board of Emergency Medical Services; and
(t) A representative from a local 911 dispatch center to be appointed by the
Governor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Chapter of
the National Emergency Number Association/Association of Public Safety
Communications Officials.
Page 268 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(6) Appointed members of the committee shall serve for a two (2) year term. Members
who serve by virtue of an office shall serve on the committee while they hold that
office.
(7) The committee shall meet quarterly, or as often as necessary for the conduct of its
business. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of
business. Members' designees shall have voting privileges at committee meetings.
(8) The committee shall be attached to the Commonwealth Office of Technology for
administrative purposes only. Members shall not be paid and shall not be
reimbursed for travel expenses.
(9) The Public Safety Working Group is hereby created for the primary purpose of
fostering cooperation, planning, and development of the public safety frequency
spectrum as regulated by the Federal Communications Commission, including the
700 MHz public safety band. The group shall endeavor to bring about a seamless,
coordinated, and integrated public safety communications network for the safe,
effective, and efficient protection of life and property. The Public Safety Working
Group membership and other working group memberships deemed necessary shall
be appointed by the chair of the Kentucky Wireless Interoperability Executive
Committee.
(10) The committee may establish additional working groups as determined by the
committee.
Section 130. KRS 42.740 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby established a Geographic Information Advisory Council, attached
to the Commonwealth Office of Technology for administrative purposes, to advise
the executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology on issues
relating to geographic information and geographic information systems.
(2) The council shall recommend policies and procedures that assist state and local
jurisdictions in developing, deploying, and leveraging geographic information
Page 269 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
resources and geographic information systems technology for the purpose of
improving public administration.
(3) The council shall closely coordinate with users of geographic information systems
to recommend policies and procedures that ensure the maximum use of geographic
information by minimizing the redundancy of geographic information and
geographic information resources, as well as to ensure that the geographic
information clearinghouse maintained by the Division of Geographic Information
Systems meets the needs of all state agencies.
(4) (a) The Geographic Information Advisory Council shall consist of twenty-five
(25) members and one (1) legislative liaison. The members shall be
knowledgeable in the use and application of geographic information systems
technology and shall have sufficient authority within their organizations to
influence the implementation of council recommendations.
(b) The council shall consist of:
1. The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet or his or her designee;
2. The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or his or
her designee;
3. The director of the Kentucky Geological Survey or his or her designee;
4. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her
designee;
5. The executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology or
her or his designee, who shall serve as chair;
6. The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development[ Cabinet] or
his or her designee;
7. The commissioner of the Department for Local Government or his or
her designee;
8. The secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or his or her
Page 270 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
designee;
9. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3)
persons submitted by the executive director[president] of the Kentucky
Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education];
10. The adjutant general of the Department of Military Affairs or his or her
designee;
11. The commissioner of the Department of Education or his or her
designee;
12. The secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet or his or her
designee;
13. The Commissioner of the Department of Agriculture or his or her
designee;
14. The secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet or his or her
designee;
15. The executive director of the Office of Property Valuation or his or her
designee;
16. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of six (6)
persons submitted by the president of the Kentucky League of Cities;
17. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of six (6)
persons submitted by the president of the Kentucky Association of
Counties;
18. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3)
persons submitted by the president of the Kentucky Chapter of the
American Planning Association;
19. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3)
persons submitted by the president of the Kentucky Association of
Page 271 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Professional Surveyors;
20. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3)
persons submitted by the president of the Kentucky Society of
Professional Engineers;
21. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3)
persons submitted by the chairman of the Kentucky Board of Registered
Geologists;
22. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3)
persons submitted by the president of the Council of Area Development
Districts;
23. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3)
persons submitted by the president of the Kentucky Association of
Mapping Professionals;
24. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3)
persons submitted by the executive director of the Kentucky Property
Valuation Administrators Association; and
25. The executive director of the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security.
(c) The council shall have one (1) nonvoting legislative liaison, to be appointed
by the Legislative Research Commission.
(5) The council may have committees and subcommittees as determined by the council
or an executive committee, if an executive committee exists.
(6) A member of the council shall not:
(a) Be an officer, employee, or paid consultant of a business entity that has, or of
a trade association for business entities that have, a substantial interest in the
geographic information industry and is doing business in the Commonwealth;
(b) Own, control, or have, directly or indirectly, more than ten percent (10%)
interest in a business entity that has a substantial interest in the geographic
Page 272 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
information industry;
(c) Be in any manner connected with any contract or bid for furnishing any
governmental body of the Commonwealth with geographic information
systems, the computers on which they are automated, or a service related to
geographic information systems;
(d) Be a person required to register as a lobbyist because of activities for
compensation on behalf of a business entity that has, or on behalf of a trade
association of business entities that have, substantial interest in the geographic
information industry;
(e) Accept or receive money or another thing of value from an individual, firm, or
corporation to whom a contract may be awarded, directly or indirectly, by
rebate, gift, or otherwise; or
(f) Be liable to civil action or any action performed in good faith in the
performance of duties as a council member.
(7) Those council members specified in subsection (4)(a) of this section who serve by
virtue of an office shall serve on the board while they hold that office.
(8) Appointed members of the council shall serve for a term of four (4) years.
Vacancies in the membership of the council shall be filled in the same manner as
the original appointments. If a nominating organization changes its name, its
successor organization having the same responsibilities and purposes shall be the
nominating organization.
(9) The council shall have no funds of its own, and council members shall not receive
compensation of any kind from the council.
(10) A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.
Members' designees shall have voting privileges at council meetings.
Section 131. KRS 56.777 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A High-Performance Buildings Advisory Committee is hereby created and shall be
Page 273 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
administratively staffed by the cabinet.
(2) The committee shall consist of sixteen (16) members and shall include:
(a) A representative of the cabinet designated by the secretary;
(b) A representative of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet designated by the
secretary;
(c) A representative of the Department of Education designated by the
commissioner;
(d) A representative of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] designated by the executive
director[president];
(e) A representative of the Office of Energy Policy designated by the executive
director; and
(f) A representative appointed by the Governor from each of the following:
1. The design and construction industry involved in public works
contracting;
2. The Kentucky Chapter of the U. S. Green Building Council;
3. The University of Kentucky College of Design;
4. The Kentucky Forest Industries Association;
5. The Kentucky Society of the American Institute of Architects;
6. The American Society of Heating, Refrigerating, and Air-Conditioning
Engineers;
7. The Associated General Contractors of Kentucky;
8. The West Kentucky Construction Association;
9. The Kentucky Manufactured Housing Institute;
10. The Kentucky Ready Mixed Concrete Association; and
11. The Plantmix Asphalt Industry of Kentucky.
(3) The representative of the cabinet shall serve as the chairperson of the committee.
Page 274 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
All appointments shall be for a term of two (2) years. Committee members shall
serve until their successors are appointed and shall be eligible for reappointment.
(4) The committee shall meet at least monthly or as convened by the chairperson.
(5) The members of the committee shall receive reimbursement for the cost of travel to
and from the meetings and any costs necessarily incurred in carrying out their
duties.
(6) The committee shall:
(a) Consult with architects, engineers, builders, energy and conservation
organizations, and other interested stakeholders, and make recommendations
to the cabinet regarding:
1. Standards and benchmarks developed under existing high-performance
building programs, including the ENERGY STAR rating system, Green
Globes rating system, and Leadership in Energy and Environmental
Design (LEED) Green Building rating system; and
2. Standards and guidelines developed and adopted by the U.S. Green
Building Council, the American Society of Heating, Refrigerating and
Air-Conditioning Engineers, and the Illuminating Engineering Society
of North America partnership concerning the design of sustainable
buildings to balance environmental responsibility, resource efficiency,
occupant comfort and well-being, and community sensitivity;
(b) Assist the cabinet in the review of state building projects to ensure that
building performance and efficiency are maximized to the extent
economically feasible using a life-cycle cost analysis;
(c) Assist the cabinet in developing a process of documentation of the attainment
of high-performance building standards; and
(d) Assist the cabinet in conducting an ongoing professional development
program for state and local building designers, construction companies,
Page 275 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
school districts, building managers, and the general public on high-
performance building design, construction, maintenance, and operation.
(7) Prior to the implementation of KRS 56.770 to 56.784, the cabinet shall promulgate
administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A necessary to implement
this section. The cabinet shall consider the recommendations made by the High-
Performance Buildings Advisory Committee pursuant to subsection (6) of this
section and shall establish the criteria for the high-performance building standards
and the benchmarks by which the high-performance building standards will be
measured. At a minimum, the cabinet shall:
(a) Include the standards for site selection and management, water efficiency,
energy conservation, waste reduction, material and resource use, and indoor
air quality; and
(b) Require that each high-performance building be designed, constructed, or
renovated so that it is capable of being rated as an ENERGY STAR building
in accordance with the criteria and rating system adopted by the United States
Environmental Protection Agency and in effect at the time the building is
designed or, in the case of leased buildings, at the time the lease is entered
into on or after July 1, 2018.
(8) In developing the criteria for the high-performance building standards, the cabinet
shall consider and encourage the use of:
(a) Locally grown lumber from forest lands implementing sustainable practices
established by the American Tree Farm System's Sustainable Forest Initiative
or the Kentucky Forest Stewardship Program established under KRS 149.330
to 149.355;
(b) Building materials manufactured with recycled content within the
Commonwealth; and
(c) Renewable energy sources.
Page 276 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Section 132. KRS 61.932 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) An agency or nonaffiliated third party that maintains or otherwise possesses
personal information, regardless of the form in which the personal
information is maintained, shall implement, maintain, and update security
procedures and practices, including taking any appropriate corrective action,
to protect and safeguard against security breaches.
(b) Reasonable security and breach investigation procedures and practices
established and implemented by organizational units of the executive branch
of state government shall be in accordance with relevant enterprise policies
established by the Commonwealth Office of Technology. Reasonable security
and breach investigation procedures and practices established and
implemented by units of government listed under KRS 61.931(1)(b) and (c)
that are not organizational units of the executive branch of state government
shall be in accordance with policies established by the Department for Local
Government. The Department for Local Government shall consult with public
entities as defined in KRS 65.310 in the development of policies establishing
reasonable security and breach investigation procedures and practices for
units of local government pursuant to this subsection. Reasonable security and
breach investigation procedures and practices established and implemented by
public school districts listed under KRS 61.931(1)(d) shall be in accordance
with administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Board of
Education. Reasonable security and breach investigation procedures and
practices established and implemented by educational entities listed under
KRS 61.931(1)(e) shall be in accordance with policies established by the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education]. The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall, upon request of
an agency, make available technical assistance for the establishment and
Page 277 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
implementation of reasonable security and breach investigation procedures
and practices.
(c) 1. If an agency is subject to any additional requirements under the
Kentucky Revised Statutes or under federal law, protocols, or
agreements relating to the protection and privacy of personal
information, the agency shall comply with these additional
requirements, in addition to the requirements of KRS 61.931 to 61.934.
2. If a nonaffiliated third party is required by federal law or regulation to
conduct security breach investigations or to make notifications of
security breaches, or both, as a result of the nonaffiliated third party's
unauthorized disclosure of one (1) or more data elements of personal
information that is the same as one (1) or more of the data elements of
personal information listed in KRS 61.931(6)(a) to (f), the nonaffiliated
third party shall meet the requirements of KRS 61.931 to 61.934 by
providing to the agency a copy of any and all reports and investigations
relating to such security breach investigations or notifications that are
required to be made by federal law or regulations. This subparagraph
shall not apply if the security breach includes the unauthorized
disclosure of data elements that are not covered by federal law or
regulation but are listed in KRS 61.931(6)(a) to (f).
(2) (a) For agreements executed or amended on or after January 1, 2015, any agency
that contracts with a nonaffiliated third party and that discloses personal
information to the nonaffiliated third party shall require as part of that
agreement that the nonaffiliated third party implement, maintain, and update
security and breach investigation procedures that are appropriate to the nature
of the information disclosed, that are at least as stringent as the security and
breach investigation procedures and practices referenced in subsection (1)(b)
Page 278 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
of this section, and that are reasonably designed to protect the personal
information from unauthorized access, use, modification, disclosure,
manipulation, or destruction.
(b) 1. A nonaffiliated third party that is provided access to personal
information by an agency, or that collects and maintains personal
information on behalf of an agency shall notify the agency in the most
expedient time possible and without unreasonable delay but within
seventy-two (72) hours of determination of a security breach relating to
the personal information in the possession of the nonaffiliated third
party. The notice to the agency shall include all information the
nonaffiliated third party has with regard to the security breach at the
time of notification. Agreements referenced in paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall specify how the cost of the notification and
investigation requirements under KRS 61.933 are to be apportioned
when a security breach is suffered by the agency or nonaffiliated third
party.
2. The notice required by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph may be
delayed if a law enforcement agency notifies the nonaffiliated third
party that notification will impede a criminal investigation or jeopardize
homeland or national security. If notice is delayed pursuant to this
subparagraph, notification shall be given as soon as reasonably feasible
by the nonaffiliated third party to the agency with which the
nonaffiliated third party is contracting. The agency shall then record the
notification in writing on a form developed by the Commonwealth
Office of Technology that the notification will not impede a criminal
investigation and will not jeopardize homeland or national security. The
Commonwealth Office of Technology shall promulgate administrative
Page 279 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
regulations under KRS 61.931 to 61.934 regarding the content of the
form.
Section 133. KRS 61.933 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any agency that collects, maintains, or stores personal information that
determines or is notified of a security breach relating to personal information
collected, maintained, or stored by the agency or by a nonaffiliated third party
on behalf of the agency shall as soon as possible, but within seventy-two (72)
hours of determination or notification of the security breach:
1. Notify the commissioner of the Kentucky State Police, the Auditor of
Public Accounts, and the Attorney General. In addition, an agency shall
notify the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or
her designee if an agency is an organizational unit of the executive
branch of state government; notify the commissioner of the Department
for Local Government if the agency is a unit of government listed in
KRS 61.931(1)(b) or (c) that is not an organizational unit of the
executive branch of state government; notify the commissioner of the
Kentucky Department of Education if the agency is a public school
district listed in KRS 61.931(1)(d); and notify the executive
director[president] of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] if the agency is an
educational entity listed under KRS 61.931(1)(e). Notification shall be
in writing on a form developed by the Commonwealth Office of
Technology. The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall
promulgate administrative regulations under KRS 61.931 to 61.934
regarding the contents of the form; and
2. Begin conducting a reasonable and prompt investigation in accordance
with the security and breach investigation procedures and practices
Page 280 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
referenced in KRS 61.932(1)(b) to determine whether the security
breach has resulted in or is likely to result in the misuse of the personal
information.
(b) Upon conclusion of the agency's investigation:
1. If the agency determined that a security breach has occurred and that the
misuse of personal information has occurred or is reasonably likely to
occur, the agency shall:
a. Within forty-eight (48) hours of completion of the investigation,
notify in writing all officers listed in paragraph (a)1. of this
subsection, and the commissioner of the Department for Libraries
and Archives, unless the provisions of subsection (3) of this
section apply;
b. Within thirty-five (35) days of providing the notifications required
by subdivision a. of this subparagraph, notify all individuals
impacted by the security breach as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, unless the provisions of subsection (3) of this section
apply; and
c. If the number of individuals to be notified exceeds one thousand
(1,000), the agency shall notify, at least seven (7) days prior to
providing notice to individuals under subdivision b. of this
subparagraph, the Commonwealth Office of Technology if the
agency is an organizational unit of the executive branch of state
government, the Department for Local Government if the agency
is a unit of government listed under KRS 61.931(1)(b) or (c) that is
not an organizational unit of the executive branch of state
government, the Kentucky Department of Education if the agency
is a public school district listed under KRS 61.931(1)(d), or the
Page 281 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] if the agency is an educational entity
listed under KRS 61.931(1)(e); and notify all consumer credit
reporting agencies included on the list maintained by the Office of
the Attorney General that compile and maintain files on consumers
on a nationwide basis, as defined in 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681a(p), of
the timing, distribution, and content of the notice; or
2. If the agency determines that the misuse of personal information has not
occurred and is not likely to occur, the agency is not required to give
notice, but shall maintain records that reflect the basis for its decision
for a retention period set by the State Archives and Records
Commission as established by KRS 171.420. The agency shall notify
the appropriate entities listed in paragraph (a)1. of this subsection that
the misuse of personal information has not occurred.
(2) (a) The provisions of this subsection establish the requirements for providing
notice to individuals under subsection (1)(b)1.b. of this section. Notice shall
be provided as follows:
1. Conspicuous posting of the notice on the website[web site] of the
agency;
2. Notification to regional or local media if the security breach is localized,
and also to major statewide media if the security breach is widespread,
including broadcast media, such as radio and television; and
3. Personal communication to individuals whose data has been breached
using the method listed in subdivision a., b., or c. of this subparagraph
that the agency believes is most likely to result in actual notification to
those individuals, if the agency has the information available:
a. In writing, sent to the most recent address for the individual as
Page 282 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
reflected in the records of the agency;
b. By electronic mail, sent to the most recent electronic mail address
for the individual as reflected in the records of the agency, unless
the individual has communicated to the agency in writing that they
do not want email notification; or
c. By telephone, to the most recent telephone number for the
individual as reflected in the records of the agency.
(b) The notice shall be clear and conspicuous, and shall include:
1. To the extent possible, a description of the categories of information that
were subject to the security breach, including the elements of personal
information that were or were believed to be acquired;
2. Contact information for the notifying agency, including the address,
telephone number, and toll-free number if a toll-free number is
maintained;
3. A description of the general acts of the agency, excluding disclosure of
defenses used for the protection of information, to protect the personal
information from further security breach; and
4. The toll-free numbers, addresses, and website[web site] addresses, along
with a statement that the individual can obtain information from the
following sources about steps the individual may take to avoid identity
theft, for:
a. The major consumer credit reporting agencies;
b. The Federal Trade Commission; and
c. The Office of the Kentucky Attorney General.
(c) The agency providing notice pursuant to this subsection shall cooperate with
any investigation conducted by the agencies notified under subsection (1)(a)
of this section and with reasonable requests from the Office of Consumer
Page 283 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Protection of the Office of the Attorney General, consumer credit reporting
agencies, and recipients of the notice, to verify the authenticity of the notice.
(3) (a) The notices required by subsection (1) of this section shall not be made if,
after consultation with a law enforcement agency, the agency receives a
written request from a law enforcement agency for a delay in notification
because the notice may impede a criminal investigation. The written request
may apply to some or all of the required notifications, as specified in the
written request from the law enforcement agency. Upon written notification
from the law enforcement agency that the criminal investigation has been
completed, or that the sending of the required notifications will no longer
impede a criminal investigation, the agency shall send the notices required by
subsection (1)(b)1. of this section.
(b) The notice required by subsection (1)(b)1.b. of this section may be delayed if
the agency determines that measures necessary to restore the reasonable
integrity of the data system cannot be implemented within the timeframe
established by subsection (1)(b)1.b. of this section, and the delay is approved
in writing by the Office of the Attorney General. If notice is delayed pursuant
to this subsection, notice shall be made immediately after actions necessary to
restore the integrity of the data system have been completed.
(4) Any waiver of the provisions of this section is contrary to public policy and shall be
void and unenforceable.
(5) This section shall not apply to:
(a) Personal information that has been redacted;
(b) Personal information disclosed to a federal, state, or local government entity,
including a law enforcement agency or court, or their agents, assigns,
employees, or subcontractors, to investigate or conduct criminal investigations
and arrests or delinquent tax assessments, or to perform any other statutory
Page 284 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
duties and responsibilities;
(c) Personal information that is publicly and lawfully made available to the
general public from federal, state, or local government records;
(d) Personal information that an individual has consented to have publicly
disseminated or listed; or
(e) Any document recorded in the records of either a county clerk or circuit clerk
of a county, or in the records of a United States District Court.
(6) The Office of the Attorney General may bring an action in the Franklin Circuit
Court against an agency or a nonaffiliated third party that is not an agency, or both,
for injunctive relief, and for other legal remedies against a nonaffiliated third party
that is not an agency to enforce the provisions of KRS 61.931 to 61.934. Nothing in
KRS 61.931 to 61.934 shall create a private right of action.
Section 134. KRS 63.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and otherwise provided by law,
any person appointed by the Governor, either with or without the advice and
consent of the Senate, may be removed from office by the Governor for any cause
the Governor deems sufficient, by an order of the Governor entered in the executive
journal removing the officer.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, members of the
Kentucky Board of Education; the board of trustees of the University of
Kentucky; the board of trustees of the University of Louisville; and the board
of regents respectively of Eastern Kentucky University, Western Kentucky
University, Morehead State University, Kentucky State University, Northern
Kentucky University, Murray State University, and the Kentucky Community
and Technical College System shall not be removed except for cause.
(b) Members of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council
on Postsecondary Education] shall not be removed except for cause.
Page 285 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(c) A member of a board of trustees or board of regents specified in paragraph (a)
of this subsection may be removed for cause as follows:
1. The Governor or the board of trustees or board of regents, as applicable,
shall notify, in writing, the member and the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education]
that the member should be removed for cause and shall specify the
conduct warranting removal;
2. The member shall have seven (7) days to voluntarily resign or to provide
evidence to the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] that the member's
conduct does not warrant removal;
3. Within thirty (30) days after receipt of notice from the Governor or the
board, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council
on Postsecondary Education] shall review the written notice, investigate
the member and the conduct alleged to support removal, and make a
nonbinding recommendation, in writing, to the Governor as to whether
the member should be removed, a copy of which shall also be provided
to the Legislative Research Commission;
4. The Governor shall then make a determination, in writing, whether the
member should be removed and shall notify the member, the applicable
board, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council
on Postsecondary Education], and the Legislative Research Commission
of the determination; and
5. If the Governor's determination is to remove the member, the Governor
shall remove the member by executive order, and shall replace the
member with a new appointment according to the applicable statutes for
the board of trustees or board of regents.
Page 286 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(d) For the purposes of this subsection, a member may be removed for cause for
conduct including but not limited to malfeasance, misfeasance, incompetence,
or gross neglect of duty.
(3) For a board specified in subsection (2)(a) of this section that is required by law to
have proportional representation in its membership based on residence, political
affiliation, gender, minority racial composition, or professional qualifications, the
Governor or other appointing authority may remove any member of the board and
replace him or her with another individual in order to bring the membership into
compliance with the statutory proportional representation requirement for the board,
provided that the Governor or other appointing authority shall:
(a) Only exercise the removal authority granted in this subsection if appointment
at the end of the next expiring term of a member, or at the end of the next
expiring term of members if two (2) or more members' terms expire at the
same time, cannot cure the deficiency in the proportional representation
requirement;
(b) Remove the fewest number of members necessary to bring the membership
into compliance with the proportional representation requirement for the
board;
(c) Identify the order in which the members were appointed to their current terms
on the board and, beginning with the most recently appointed member who
may be removed and replaced to bring the membership into compliance with
the proportional representation requirement, remove the member or members
according to the length of their tenure on the board, without taking into
account any prior term of service on the board by the member;
(d) Provide any member proposed to be removed with the following:
1. Written notice, at least seven (7) days prior to the member's removal
from the board, stating the statutory proportional representation
Page 287 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
requirement that the member does not satisfy; and
2. An opportunity during the seven (7) day notice period for the member to
voluntarily resign or to provide evidence to the Governor or other
appointing authority that the member does satisfy the proportional
representation requirement or that another member on the board who
also does not satisfy the requirement has a shorter tenure than the
member proposed to be removed;
(e) Replace any removed member with only those individuals who will bring the
board into compliance with the proportional representation requirement; and
(f) Appoint any new member in the same manner as provided by law for the
member being removed and to fill the remainder of the removed member's
unexpired term.
(4) For a board of trustees or board of regents specified in subsection (2)(a) of this
section, the Governor may remove for cause all appointed members of the board
and replace the entire appointed membership as follows:
(a) The Governor shall notify, in writing, the board and the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] that
the entire appointed membership of the board should be removed for cause
and shall specify the conduct warranting removal;
(b) The board or its members shall have seven (7) days to voluntarily resign or to
provide evidence to the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] that the conduct of the board
or of individual members does not warrant removal;
(c) Within thirty (30) days after receipt of notice from the Governor, the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall review the written notice, investigate the board and the
conduct alleged to support removal, and make a nonbinding recommendation,
Page 288 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
in writing, to the Governor as to whether the appointed board membership
should be removed, a copy of which shall also be provided to the Legislative
Research Commission;
(d) The Governor shall then make a determination, in writing, whether the entire
appointed board membership should be removed and shall notify the
members, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education], and the Legislative Research Commission of the
determination; and
(e) If the Governor's determination is to remove the entire appointed membership
of the board, the Governor shall remove the members by executive order, and
shall replace the members with new appointments according to the applicable
statutes for the board of trustees or board or regents.
For the purposes of this subsection, the entire appointed membership of a board of
trustees or board of regents may be removed for cause if the board is no longer
functioning according to its statutory mandate as specified in the enabling statutes
applicable to the board, or if the board membership's conduct as a whole constitutes
malfeasance, misfeasance, incompetence, or gross neglect of duty, such that the
conduct cannot be attributed to any single member or members.
Section 135. KRS 64.475 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby established an advisory council to be known as the Executive
Branch Compensation Advisory Council.
(a) The council shall consist of three (3) voting members: the state budget
director, the secretary of the Governor's Executive Cabinet, and the secretary
of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.
(b) The state budget director shall serve as the chair of the council.
(c) If a voting member is unable to attend a meeting of the council, he or she shall
designate, in writing, a member of his or her staff to attend in his or her place,
Page 289 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
and such designation shall confer on such designee, for that meeting only, the
authority to act, including the right to vote on any matter coming before the
council.
(2) The council shall be attached to the Personnel Cabinet for administrative purposes.
Personnel Cabinet staff shall provide necessary administrative and operational
support for the council. The council may, from time to time, utilize the services of
professional and technical personnel employed by other agencies of state
government, if the need arises. The council shall meet on a quarterly basis at a time
and place to be determined by the council. Additional meetings may be called upon
request of two (2) voting members of the council.
(3) The duties of the council shall include the following:
(a) Advise and make recommendations to the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet
on appropriate salaries for the following:
1. The heads of the various departments in the executive branch of state
government, with the exception of:
a. Departments headed by constitutionally elected officers;
b. The Department of Education;
c. The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council
on Postsecondary Education]; and
d. The Kentucky Authority for Educational Television;
2. The heads of offices, as defined in KRS 12.010;
3. The administrative heads of boards and commissions and for their
employees, if they are not covered by the salary schedules set forth in
KRS Chapter 16, KRS Chapter 18A, or KRS Chapter 151B,
notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary empowering a board,
commission, authority, or other administrative body for which the
Personnel Cabinet provides personnel and payroll services except for
Page 290 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
any board governing any of the Kentucky Retirement Systems, the
County Employees Retirement System, the Kentucky Public Pensions
Authority, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority, or the
Kentucky Authority for Educational Television[, or the Council on
Postsecondary Education] to establish, set, or approve the salaries of its
administrative head and other employees;
4. Requests from boards, commissions, or cabinet heads to approve salary
increases in excess of those increases provided other state employees to
individuals in the positions listed in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this
subsection;
(b) Advise the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet on requests from agencies to
establish or abolish a separate salary schedule, or schedules, reflective of the
marketplace need to recruit and hire classified employees in technical or
professional fields when the classified service salary schedule is inadequate.
A positive recommendation of such requests shall not be granted unless
significant credible evidence exists of a job market shortage and an
inadequacy of the classified or unclassified salary schedules to recruit and
retain competent, qualified applicants for such positions; and
(c) Recommend that the Personnel Cabinet conduct salary surveys of the
executive branch positions outlined in subsection (3)(a)1., 2., and 3. of this
section, using state governments in the seven (7) states contiguous to the
Commonwealth, other states in the southeastern United States, and private
sector employers, where appropriate.
(4) The council's recommendations shall:
(a) Take into consideration the provisions of KRS 64.640, if the specific position
in question is subject to the provisions of KRS 64.640; and
(b) Not take into consideration the provisions of KRS 64.640, if the specific
Page 291 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
position in question is exempt from the provisions of KRS 64.640.
Section 136. KRS 64.640 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, and excepting
officers elected by popular vote, employees of the General Assembly, including
employees of the Legislative Research Commission, members of boards and
commissions, those officers and employees of Kentucky Educational Television
exempt from classified service as provided in KRS 18A.115, presidents and
employees of the state universities and the state colleges, officers employed by the
Department of Kentucky State Police under KRS Chapter 16, and persons
employed by the commissioner of parks on a temporary basis under KRS 148.026,
the Personnel Cabinet shall prepare schedules of compensation, payable out of the
State Treasury, with a minimum salary rate, and other salary rates as are deemed
necessary or advisable, for the office or position of employment of every state
officer and employee, including specifically the offices and positions of
employment in every constitutional administrative department, statutory
administrative department, independent agency, board, commission, or other unit of
state government. The language of any statute empowering a board, commission,
authority, or other administrative body for which the Personnel Cabinet provides
personnel and payroll services, except for any board governing any of the Kentucky
Retirement Systems, the County Employees Retirement System, the Kentucky
Public Pensions Authority, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority,
or the Kentucky Authority for Educational Television[, or the Council on
Postsecondary Education,] to establish, set, or approve the salaries of its
administrative head and other employees to the contrary notwithstanding, the
establishment or setting of salaries for administrative heads or other employees
shall be subject to the approval of the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet. The
schedules and rates shall be based upon studies of the duties and responsibilities of
Page 292 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
the offices and positions and upon a comparison with rates being paid for similar or
comparable services elsewhere, and in the preparation of such schedules, the
Personnel Cabinet shall ascertain and record the duties, responsibilities, and
authority pertaining to the various offices and positions in the state service, and
classify such positions in the manner provided in KRS 18A.030, 18A.035, 18A.110,
18A.130, 18A.135, and 18A.150 to 18A.160. No such schedule shall become
effective until it has been approved by the Governor by executive order.
(2) The Governor shall set the compensation payable out of the State Treasury to each
officer or position in the state service, which officer or position heads a statutory
administrative department, independent agency, or other unit of state government,
except for those excluded under subsection (1) of this section. Such compensation
shall be based upon studies of the duties and responsibilities and classification of
the positions by the Governor and upon a comparison with compensation being paid
for similar or comparable services elsewhere, provided, however, such
compensation shall not exceed the total taxable compensation of the Governor
derived from state sources, the provisions of KRS 64.660 to the contrary
notwithstanding. For the purposes of this section, the total taxable compensation of
the Governor from state sources shall include the amount provided for
compensation to the Governor under KRS 64.480 and any benefits or discretionary
spending accounts that are imputed as taxable income for federal tax purposes.
(3) The compensation payable out of the State Treasury to officers and employees
subordinate to any office or position covered by subsection (2) of this section shall
not exceed the maximum rate established pursuant to subsection (2) of this section
for such office or position, except with respect to physicians as provided in KRS
64.655 and employees of the Public Service Commission of Kentucky whose
compensation shall be fixed, within constitutional limits, by the Personnel Cabinet
with the approval of the Governor as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
Page 293 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(4) Nothing in this section shall preclude the allowance of maintenance to officers and
employees of the state.
Section 137. KRS 138.510 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Before August 1, 2022, except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection
and subsection (3) of this section, an excise tax is imposed on all tracks
conducting pari-mutuel wagering on live racing under the jurisdiction of the
corporation as follows:
1. For each track with a daily average live handle of one million two
hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000) or above, the tax shall be in the
amount of three and one-half percent (3.5%) of all money wagered on
live races at the track during the fiscal year; and
2. For each track with a daily average live handle under one million two
hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000), the tax shall be one and one-half
percent (1.5%) of all money wagered on live races at the track during
the fiscal year.
(b) Beginning August 1, 2022, the excise tax imposed on all tracks conducting
pari-mutuel wagering on live racing under jurisdiction of the corporation shall
be one and one-half percent (1.5%) of all money wagered on live races at the
track during the fiscal year.
(c) Beginning on April 1, 2014, an excise tax is imposed on all tracks conducting
pari-mutuel wagering on historical horse races under the jurisdiction of the
corporation at a rate of one and one-half percent (1.5%) of all money wagered
on historical horse races at the track during the fiscal year.
(d) Money shall be deducted from the tax paid under paragraphs (a), (b), and (c)
of this subsection and deposited as follows:
1. a. Before August 1, 2022, an amount equal to three-quarters of one
percent (0.75%) of all money wagered on live races and historical
Page 294 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
horse races at the track for Thoroughbred racing shall be deposited
in the Thoroughbred development fund established in KRS
230.400; and
b. Beginning August 1, 2022, an amount equal to three-quarters of
one percent (0.75%) of all money wagered on live races and
historical horse races at the track for Thoroughbred racing shall be
deposited in the Thoroughbred development fund established in
KRS 230.400 until forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) has
been deposited during a fiscal year, at which point the amount
deposited in the fund shall decrease to four-tenths of one percent
(0.4%) of all money wagered on live and historical horse races at
the track for Thoroughbred racing for the remainder of the fiscal
year;
2. a. Before August 1, 2022, an amount equal to one percent (1%) of all
money wagered on live races and historical horse races at the track
for harness racing shall be deposited in the Kentucky standardbred
development fund established in KRS 230.770. Beginning August
1, 2022, an amount equal to one percent (1%) of all money
wagered on live races at the track for harness racing shall be
deposited in the Kentucky standardbred development fund until a
total of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) has been deposited
during a fiscal year from this subparagraph, at which point the
amount deposited shall decrease to four-tenths of one percent
(0.4%) of all money wagered for the remainder of the fiscal year;
and
b. Beginning August 1, 2022, an amount equal to one percent (1%)
of all money wagered on historical horse races at the track for
Page 295 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
harness racing shall be distributed in the exact amounts based
upon contracts between the parties that have been filed with the
corporation, but at least one-half (1/2) of the funds shall be
deposited into the Kentucky standardbred development fund
established in KRS 230.770 until a total of twenty million dollars
($20,000,000) has been deposited into the Kentucky standardbred
development fund during a fiscal year from this subparagraph, at
which point the amount deposited in this subdivision shall
decrease to four-tenths of one percent (0.4%) of all money
wagered for the remainder of the fiscal year. The corporation shall
provide the department all information necessary from the
contracts in order for the funds in this subparagraph to be
distributed;
3. An amount equal to one percent (1%) of all money wagered on live
races and historical horse races at the track for quarter horse, paint
horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian horse racing shall be deposited in the
Kentucky quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and Arabian
development fund established by KRS 230.445;
4. An amount equal to two-tenths of one percent (0.2%) of all money
wagered on live races and historical horse races at the track shall be paid
out in equal amounts as follows:
a. To the equine industry program trust and revolving fund
established by KRS 230.550 to support the Equine Industry
Program at the University of Louisville, except that the amount
deposited from money wagered on historical horse races in any
fiscal year shall not exceed eight hundred fifty thousand dollars
($850,000);
Page 296 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
b. To the University of Kentucky for equine industry programs at the
university, except that the amount paid from money wagered on
historical horse races in any fiscal year shall not exceed four
hundred thousand dollars ($400,000);
c. To the Bluegrass Community and Technical College for the
provision of equine industry programs by the system, except that
the amount paid from money wagered on historical horse races in
any fiscal year shall not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000);
d. Amounts remaining from money wagered on historical horse races
in a fiscal year after payments are made in accordance with
subdivisions a., b., and c. of this subparagraph shall be distributed
in equal amounts to:
i. The Kentucky Horse Racing and Gaming Corporation for the
benefit of Thoroughbred, standardbred, and American
quarter horse aftercare facilities in Kentucky, in an amount
not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).
The Kentucky Horse Racing and Gaming Corporation shall
serve as the administrative agent for these funds, and shall
distribute them annually to organizations engaged in the
accreditation and monitoring of aftercare facilities. Any
funds distributed under this subpart by the Kentucky Horse
Racing and Gaming Corporation shall be awarded to
aftercare facilities based in Kentucky only after the facilities
have achieved and maintained levels of service and operation
that resulted in national accreditation; and
ii. The Kentucky equine management internship program for
Page 297 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
equine management training, in an amount not to exceed two
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000); and
e. Any amounts remaining from money wagered on historical horse
races in a fiscal year after payments are made in accordance with
subdivisions a., b., c., and d. of this subparagraph shall be paid to
the general fund;
5. a. An amount equal to one-tenth of one percent (0.1%) of all money
wagered on live races and historical horse races at the track shall
be deposited in a trust and revolving fund to be used for the
construction, expansion, or renovation of facilities or the purchase
of equipment for equine programs at state universities and the
Bluegrass Community and Technical College, except that the
amount deposited from money wagered on historical horse races in
any fiscal year shall not exceed three hundred twenty thousand
dollars ($320,000).
b. These funds shall not be used for salaries or for operating funds
for teaching, research, or administration. Funds allocated under
this subparagraph shall not replace other funds for capital purposes
or operation of equine programs at state universities and the
Bluegrass Community and Technical College.
c. The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Kentucky
Council on Postsecondary Education] shall serve as the
administrative agent for these funds, and shall establish an
advisory committee of interested parties, including all universities
and the Bluegrass Community and Technical College with
established equine programs, to evaluate proposals and make
recommendations for the awarding of funds.
Page 298 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
d. The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Kentucky
Council on Postsecondary Education] may promulgate
administrative regulations to establish procedures for
administering the program and criteria for evaluating and awarding
grants; and
6. An amount equal to one-tenth of one percent (0.1%) of all money
wagered on live races and historical horse races shall be distributed to
the corporation to support equine drug testing as provided in KRS
230.265(3), except that the amount deposited from money wagered on
historical horse races in any fiscal year shall not exceed three hundred
twenty thousand dollars ($320,000).
(e) The excise tax imposed by paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection shall not
apply to pari-mutuel wagering on live harness racing at a county fair.
(2) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, an excise tax is
imposed on:
1. All tracks conducting telephone account wagering;
2. All tracks participating as receiving tracks in intertrack wagering under
the jurisdiction of the corporation; and
3. All tracks participating as receiving tracks displaying simulcasts and
conducting interstate wagering thereon.
(b) 1. Before August 1, 2022, the tax shall be three percent (3%) of all money
wagered on races as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection during
the fiscal year.
2. Beginning August 1, 2022, the tax shall be one and one-half percent
(1.5%) of all money wagered on races as provided in paragraph (a) of
this subsection during the fiscal year.
(c) A noncontiguous track facility approved by the corporation on or after
Page 299 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
January 1, 1999, shall be exempt from the tax imposed under this subsection,
if the facility is established and operated by a licensed track which has a total
annual handle on live racing of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
or less. The amount of money exempted under this paragraph shall be retained
by the noncontiguous track facility, KRS 230.3771 and 230.378
notwithstanding.
(d) Money shall be deducted from the tax paid under paragraphs (a) and (b) of
this subsection as follows:
1. An amount equal to one percent (1%) of the amount wagered shall be
deposited as follows:
a. In the Thoroughbred development fund established in KRS
230.400 if the host track is conducting a Thoroughbred race
meeting or the interstate wagering is conducted on a Thoroughbred
race meeting;
b. In the Kentucky standardbred development fund established in
KRS 230.770, if the host track is conducting a harness race
meeting or the interstate wagering is conducted on a harness race
meeting; or
c. In the Kentucky quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, and
Arabian development fund established by KRS 230.445, if the host
track is conducting a quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, or
Arabian horse race meeting or the interstate wagering is conducted
on a quarter horse, paint horse, Appaloosa, or Arabian horse race
meeting;
2. An amount equal to twenty-five thousandths of one percent (0.025%) of
the amount wagered shall be allocated to the equine industry program
trust and revolving fund established by KRS 230.550 to be used to
Page 300 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
support the Equine Industry Program at the University of Louisville;
3. An amount equal to one-twentieth of one percent (0.05%) of the amount
wagered shall be deposited in a trust and revolving fund to be used for
the construction, expansion, or renovation of facilities or the purchase of
equipment for equine programs at state universities, as detailed in
subsection (1)(d)5. of this section; and
4. An amount equal to one-twentieth of one percent (0.05%) of the amount
wagered shall be distributed to the corporation to support equine drug
testing as provided in KRS 230.265(3).
(3) If a host track in this state is the location for the conduct of a two (2) day
international horse racing event that distributes in excess of a total of twenty million
dollars ($20,000,000) in purses and awards:
(a) The excise tax imposed by subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section shall not
apply to money wagered at the track on live races conducted at the track
during the two (2) day international horse racing event; and
(b) Amounts wagered at the track on live races conducted at the track during the
two (2) day international horse racing event shall not be included in
calculating the daily average live handle for purposes of subsection (1) of this
section.
(4) If a host track in this state is the location for the conduct of an international harness
racing event spanning multiple days that distributes at least five million dollars
($5,000,000) in purses and awards, the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall be
granted a race title sponsorship and promotional package at the international
harness racing event with all usual and customary benefits assigned to promote
Kentucky tourism. The Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall not be charged
any fees for the promotional package.
(5) The taxes imposed by this section shall be paid, collected, and administered as
Page 301 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
provided in KRS 138.530.
Section 138. KRS 151B.132 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics is hereby established and attached
to the Education and Labor Cabinet, Office of the Secretary.
(2) The office's purpose is to collect accurate data in the Kentucky Longitudinal Data
System in order to link the data and generate timely reports about student
performance through employment to be used to guide decision makers in improving
the Commonwealth of Kentucky's education system and training programs.
(3) The office shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the Governor
pursuant to KRS 12.050. The executive director shall be appointed from
nominations made to the Governor by the board. The office may employ additional
staff necessary to carry out the office's duties consistent with available funding and
state personnel laws.
(4) The public agencies providing data to the Kentucky Longitudinal Data System shall
be:
(a) [The Council on Postsecondary Education;
(b) ]The Department of Education;
(b)[(c)] The Early Childhood Advisory Council;
(c)[(d)] The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(d)[(e)] The Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education; and
(e)[(f)] Other agencies of the Education and Labor Cabinet.
(5) The Kentucky Longitudinal Data System, upon approval of the board, may include
data from any additional public agency.
(6) Any private institution of higher education, private school, or parochial school,
upon approval of the board, may provide data to the Kentucky Longitudinal Data
System.
(7) Any data provided to the Kentucky Longitudinal Data System shall be certified to
Page 302 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
be accurate by the providing agency, institution, or school. Ownership of data
provided shall be retained by the providing entity.
(8) The office may receive funding for its operation of the Kentucky Longitudinal Data
System from the following sources:
(a) State appropriations;
(b) Federal grants;
(c) User fees; and
(d) Any other grants or contributions from public agencies or other entities.
Section 139. KRS 151B.133 is amended to read as follows:
The duties of the Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics shall be to:
(1) Oversee and maintain the warehouse of data in the Kentucky Longitudinal Data
System;
(2) Develop de-identification standards and processes using modern statistical methods;
(3) Conduct research and evaluation regarding federal, state, and local education and
training programs at all levels;
(4) Audit and ensure compliance of education and training programs with applicable
federal and state requirements as authorized by federal and state law;
(5) Work with public agencies and other entities to define statewide education,
workforce development, and employment metrics and ensure the integrity and
quality of data being collected;
(6) Link data from multiple sources for consideration in developing broad public policy
initiatives;
(7) Develop requirements and definitions for data to be provided by any public agency,
private institution of higher education, private school, or parochial school, as
directed by the Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics;
(8) Develop a reasonable fee schedule for services provided;
(9) Establish data quality standards;
Page 303 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(10) Promulgate administrative regulations necessary for the proper administration of
the Kentucky Longitudinal Data System;
(11) Ensure compliance with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20
U.S.C. sec 1232g, and all other relevant federal and state privacy laws;
(12) Respond to approved research data requests in accordance with the data access and
use policy established by the board;
(13) Develop and disseminate, in cooperation with the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] and the Department of
Education, information on the employment and earnings of the public
postsecondary institution graduates in Kentucky. This information shall be updated
at least every three (3) years and shall be:
(a) Posted on the website[Web site] of the Office of the Kentucky Center for
Statistics;
(b) Posted on the website[Web site] of the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education];
(c) Posted on the website[Web site] of each public postsecondary institution, with
the website[Web site ] address published in each institution's catalogue; and
(d) Made available to every high school guidance and career counselor, who shall
be notified of its availability for the purpose of informing all high school
students preparing for postsecondary education; and
(14) Enter into contracts or other agreements with appropriate entities, including but not
limited to federal, state, and local agencies, to the extent necessary to carry out its
duties and responsibilities only if such contracts or agreements incorporate adequate
protections with respect to the confidentiality of any information to be shared.
Section 140. KRS 151B.134 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics is hereby established and attached
to the Education and Labor Cabinet, Office of the Secretary.
Page 304 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(2) The board shall be composed of:
(a) The commissioner of the Department of Education or designee;
(b) The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or designee;
(c) [The president of the Council on Postsecondary Education or designee;
(d) ]The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet or designee; and
(d)[(e)] The executive director of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority or designee.
(3) The duties and functions of the board shall be to:
(a) Develop a detailed data access and use policy for requests that shall include
but not be limited to the following:
1. Direct access to data in the Kentucky Longitudinal Data System shall be
restricted to authorized staff of the office;
2. Data or information that may result in any individual or employer being
identifiable based on the size or uniqueness of the population under
consideration may not be reported in any form by the office; and
3. The office may not release data or information if disclosure is prohibited
under relevant federal or state privacy laws;
(b) Establish the research agenda of the office;
(c) Make nominations to the Governor for the appointment of an executive
director;
(d) Oversee compliance by the office with the federal Family Educational Rights
and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. sec. 1232g, and other relevant federal and state
privacy laws;
(e) Ensure that reports generated by the Office of the Kentucky Center for
Statistics are distributed to appropriate personnel within the agencies
represented by the board members; and
(f) Provide general oversight of the office.
Page 305 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(4) The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet shall serve as chair of the board.
(5) The board shall meet at least semiannually and at other times upon the call of the
chair. The meetings shall be subject to the open meetings requirements of KRS
61.800 to 61.850 and 61.991.
(6) The board may form committees, work groups, or advisory councils to accomplish
its purposes.
Section 141. KRS 151B.290 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Education and Workforce Collaborative is hereby created for the
purpose of ensuring the continued implementation of the Kentucky Workforce
Innovation Board's strategic plan.
(2) The Kentucky Education and Workforce Collaborative shall consist of the
following twenty-one (21) members:
(a) The Governor or his or her designee, who shall serve as chair;
(b) The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet or his or her designee;
(c) The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or his or her
designee;
(d) The president of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System or
his or her designee;
(e) The executive director[president] for the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] or his or her
designee;
(f) The commissioner of the Kentucky Department of Education or his or her
designee;
(g) The president of the Kentucky Chamber of Commerce or his or her designee;
(h) A representative of the board of directors from each of the Commonwealth's
ten (10) local workforce development areas as selected by the board of
directors;
Page 306 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(i) A representative selected by the Kentucky Association of Counties;
(j) A representative selected by the Kentucky Farm Bureau;
(k) The chair of the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board or his or her
designee; and
(l) The executive director/CEO of the Kentucky League of Cities or his or her
designee.
(3) Meetings shall be held at least quarterly or at the call of the chair.
(4) The Kentucky Education and Workforce Collaborative shall submit quarterly
reports to the Legislative Research Commission summarizing its progress.
(5) The Kentucky Education and Workforce Collaborative shall designate one (1)
member as its legislative liaison to communicate with the General Assembly about
the collaborative's progress and ensure that the work of the collaborative is separate
and distinct from the work of the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board. The
liaison shall not be a member who is also a representative of a local workforce
development area.
(6) The Kentucky Education and Workforce Collaborative shall reach the following
milestones and report findings, determinations, and procedures to the Kentucky
Workforce Innovation Board:
(a) Identification of all federal and state-funded workforce programs in the
Commonwealth by September 30, 2023;
(b) Development of a complete framework for implementation and transition by
September 30, 2023; and
(c) Evaluation and preparation of a determination of viability concerning the
transfer of child-care services to local workforce development boards.
(7) The Commonwealth shall reach the following milestones:
(a) Procurement of a replacement for the UI and Case Management/Reporting
System by December 31, 2023; and
Page 307 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(b) Transition and consolidation of all federal and state workforce training,
employment, and employment-related programs into one (1) entity that shall
have primary responsibility for the operation of and management of funding
for the newly created consolidated entity by December 31, 2023.
(8) The local workforce development boards shall each reach the following milestones:
(a) By July 1, 2024, assumption of fiscal and administrative responsibilities for
planning, oversight, and evaluation of all public workforce programs in the
board's local workforce development area in the state. Each plan shall include:
1. Governor-certified local workforce development boards to provide local
control;
2. Designated Kentucky Career Centers (KCCs) throughout the local
workforce development area to provide the entire array of program
services at each identified location;
3. Integrated cross-program, functional service delivery systems to provide
ease of access to local businesses and job seekers, with individual
programs that are not apparent, but are defined by service requested by
customer; and
4. An emphasis on core competencies such that:
a. Local workforce development boards are focused on fiscal and
program administration;
b. KCCs are focused on service delivery; and
c. Educational entities are focused on providing data-driven,
workforce preparation services and competencies; and
5. Functional services that include but are not limited to business services,
job search, group training and assessment services, intensive job search
preparation, and training with case management;
(b) By July 1, 2024, development of comprehensive system-wide budgets,
Page 308 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
strategic plans, implementation plans, supervision agreements with different
programmatic employers, memoranda of understanding for the KCCs, and
any infrastructure funding agreements required by the Workforce Innovation
and Opportunity Act; and
(c) By July 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, preparation and transmission of a
report to the Kentucky Education and Workforce Collaborative and Kentucky
Workforce Innovation Board, detailing its attainment of the policies and goals
contained in the Governor's current executive order issued pursuant to the
Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.
Section 142. KRS 154.12-205 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created an independent, de jure corporation of the Commonwealth
with all the general corporate powers incidental thereto which shall be known as the
"Bluegrass State Skills Corporation." The corporation shall be a political
subdivision of the state and shall be attached to the Cabinet for Economic
Development.
(2) The corporation is created and established to improve and promote the employment
opportunities of the citizens of the Commonwealth by creating and expanding
programs of skills training and education which meet the needs of qualified
companies.
(3) The corporation shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of seventeen
(17) members, including the following five (5) ex officio members: the
commissioner of the Department of Workforce Development or his or her designee,
the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development, the secretary of the
Education and Labor Cabinet, the executive director[president] of the Kentucky
Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], and
the president of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System. The
twelve (12) other members shall be appointed by the Governor, including persons
Page 309 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
having knowledge and experience in business and industry, skills training,
education, and minority employment; and at least one (1) of the twelve (12)
members shall be appointed to represent labor organizations. Each member
appointed by the Governor shall serve for a term of four (4) years, except that in
making the initial appointments, the Governor shall appoint three (3) members to
serve for one (1) year, three (3) members to serve for two (2) years, three (3)
members to serve for three (3) years, and three (3) members to serve for four (4)
years. All succeeding appointments shall be for a term of four (4) years.
(4) In the event of a vacancy, the Governor may appoint a replacement member who
shall hold office during the remainder of the term so vacated.
(5) Any member may be removed from his or her appointment by the Governor for
cause.
(6) The Governor shall designate a member of the board as its chairman.
(7) Members of the board of directors of the corporation, except for ex officio
members, shall be entitled to compensation for their services in the amount of one
hundred dollars ($100) for each regular or special called meeting of the corporation,
and all members shall be entitled to reimbursement for any actual and necessary
expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.
(8) The board of directors of the corporation shall annually elect a vice chairman, a
secretary, and a treasurer. The secretary shall keep a record of the proceedings of
the corporation and shall be custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed
with the corporation, and its official seal.
(9) The Cabinet for Economic Development shall provide staff and support services to
the corporation and shall direct and supervise its administrative affairs and general
management subject to the policies, control, and direction of the board.
(10) All officers and employees of the corporation having access to its funding shall give
bond to the corporation, at its expense, in the amount and with the surety as the
Page 310 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
board may prescribe.
Section 143. KRS 154.15-020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Communications Network Authority is established and shall be
attached to the Office of the Governor. The authority shall be headed by an
executive director who shall be hired by the board and approved by the Governor.
(2) Notwithstanding KRS 42.726, the duties of the authority shall be to:
(a) Oversee and maintain KentuckyWired, the Commonwealth's open-access
broadband network;
(b) Manage the master agreement establishing the public-private partnership
between the Commonwealth and its private industry partner or partners. The
purpose of the agreement is to design, engineer, build, operate, maintain, and
upgrade the network;
(c) Provide network connectivity to public agencies;
(d) Offer access to entities eligible to utilize excess capacity on the network;
(e) Manage other aspects of the network and its utilization through the executive
director and with oversight and input from the board established in KRS
154.15-030 and the advisory group established in this section;
(f) Promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A
necessary to implement the purposes of this subchapter;
(g) Enter into contracts with public and private entities to carry out its duties and
responsibilities. A contract or other agreement involving the acquisition or
disposition of a property interest by the Commonwealth shall be signed by the
secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. KRS Chapters 45A and
56 may require the secretary's signature on other contracts or agreements;
(h) Provide program management services ensuring the financial viability of the
master agreement and related contracts and agreements, including grant
administration, contract compliance and oversight, community planning
Page 311 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
support, and constituent services;
(i) Seek out, secure, and manage funding sources for the network; and
(j) Create an advisory group, including major stakeholders, to provide input and
feedback on issues important to the user community and to the long-term
sustainability of the project and the network. The advisory group shall be
administratively attached to and managed by the authority. The advisory
group shall include but not be limited to representatives of:
1. The Department of Education;
2. The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education];
3. The Cabinet for Economic Development;
4. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
5. The Transportation Cabinet;
6. The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;
7. The Finance and Administration Cabinet;
8. The Administrative Office of the Courts;
9. The Legislative Research Commission;
10. Institutions of higher education;
11. Local government entities;
12. Libraries;
13. Public health care institutions or agencies;
14. Kentucky Educational Television; and
15. Others whose input will benefit the network.
(3) With the approval of the board, the executive director may hire additional officers
and other personnel necessary for the proper functioning of the authority, fix their
salaries, and prescribe their duties. The executive director and persons employed by
the authority shall not be subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 18A.
Page 312 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(4) (a) With the approval of the board, the executive director may make, execute, and
effectuate contracts, leveraging future revenues from provision of
government-to-government services and sale or lease of excess capacity, to
incur debt in the name of the authority and enter into financing agreements
with the Commonwealth, agencies of the Commonwealth, lending
institutions, investors, or investing entities.
(b) The total amount of debt or financing under this subsection shall not exceed
one hundred ten million dollars ($110,000,000), and shall not leverage any
future revenues committed to the repayment of any other debt, or expected to
be used for the repayment of any other debt, as of the time the debt or
financing is entered into.
(c) Any proposed debt or financing under this subsection shall be submitted to the
Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee for review at least fourteen
(14) days prior to the committee meeting.
(d) If any debt or financing is incurred under this subsection, the authority shall
provide to the Legislative Research Commission:
1. Within thirty (30) days of entering into a debt or financing agreement, a
copy of the agreement; and
2. On January 1, April 1, July 1, and October 1 of each year that the debt
or financing is outstanding:
a. The amount of principal and interest remaining on the debt or
financing;
b. The use to which the capital gained from the debt or financing has
been put; and
c. Any amendments, if any, to the original debt or financing
instruments or agreements.
Section 144. KRS 156.029 is amended to read as follows:
Page 313 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(1) There is hereby established a Kentucky Board of Education, which shall consist of
eleven (11) voting members appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the
Senate of the General Assembly, with the executive director[president] of the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] and the secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet serving as ex
officio nonvoting members, and an active public elementary or secondary school
teacher and a public high school student appointed by the board as described in
subsection (3) of this section serving as nonvoting members. Seven (7) voting
members shall represent each of the Supreme Court districts as established by KRS
21A.010, and four (4) voting members shall represent the state at large. Each of the
voting members shall serve for a four (4) year term, except the initial appointments
shall be as follows: the seven (7) members representing Supreme Court districts
shall serve a term which shall expire on April 14, 1994; and the four (4) at-large
members shall serve a term which shall expire on April 14, 1992. Subsequent
appointments shall be submitted to the Senate for confirmation in accordance with
KRS 11.160.
(2) Appointments of the voting members shall be made without reference to
occupation. No voting member at the time of his or her appointment or during the
term of his or her service shall be engaged as a professional educator. Beginning
with voting members appointed on or after June 29, 2021, appointments to the
group of members representing Supreme Court districts and to the group of at-large
members, respectively, shall reflect equal representation of the two (2) sexes,
inasmuch as possible; reflect no less than proportional representation of the two (2)
leading political parties of the Commonwealth based on the state's voter registration
and the political affiliation of each appointee as of December 31 of the year
preceding the date of his or her appointment; and reflect the minority racial
composition of the Commonwealth based on the total minority racial population
Page 314 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
using the most recent census or estimate data from the United States Census
Bureau. If the determination of proportional minority representation does not result
in a whole number of minority members, it shall be rounded up to the next whole
number. A particular political affiliation shall not be a prerequisite to appointment
to the board generally; however, if any person is appointed to the board that does
not represent either of the two (2) leading political parties of the Commonwealth,
the proportional representation by political affiliation requirement shall be
determined and satisfied based on the total number of members on the board less
any members not affiliated with either of the two (2) leading political parties.
Pursuant to KRS 63.080, a member shall not be removed except for cause or,
beginning with voting members appointed on or after June 29, 2021, in accordance
with KRS 63.080(3). Notwithstanding KRS 12.028, the board shall not be subject to
reorganization by the Governor.
(3) Ex officio and other nonvoting members shall not be represented by proxy at any
meeting of the board.
(4) The nonvoting teacher and student members shall be selected by the board from the
state's six (6) congressional districts on a rotating basis from different districts. The
public high school student shall be classified as a junior at the time of appointment.
The teacher and student members shall serve for a one (1) year term, except the
initial appointments shall serve a term which shall expire on April 14, 2022. The
board shall promulgate an administrative regulation establishing the process for
selecting the nonvoting teacher and student members.
(5) A vacancy in the voting membership of the board shall be filled by the Governor
for the unexpired term with the consent of the Senate. In the event that the General
Assembly is not in session at the time of the appointment, the consent of the Senate
shall be obtained during the time the General Assembly next convenes.
(6) At the first regular meeting of the board in each fiscal year, a chairperson shall be
Page 315 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
elected from its voting membership.
(7) The members shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties.
(8) The commissioner of education shall serve as the executive secretary to the board.
(9) The primary function of the board shall be to develop and adopt policies and
administrative regulations, with the advice of the Local Superintendents Advisory
Council, by which the Department of Education shall be governed in planning,
coordinating, administering, supervising, operating, and evaluating the educational
programs, services, and activities within the Department of Education which are
within the jurisdiction of the board.
Section 145. KRS 156.555 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Center for Middle School Academic Achievement is created to improve the
content knowledge and instructional practice of middle school teachers through the
coordination of professional development programs for middle school teachers, the
provision of technical assistance to schools and teachers, and the collection and
dissemination of information and research regarding effective models of teaching
the core disciplines to middle school students.
(2) The center shall:
(a) Foster collaboration between the center, the Department of Education, the
Education Professional Standards Board, postsecondary institutions of
education, postsecondary departments or colleges of arts and sciences, and
other entities to develop content-based teacher preparation programs and
ongoing professional development programs for middle school teachers,
aligned with the Department of Education's core content for assessment;
(b) Assist school districts in assessing and addressing their needs and deficiencies
in middle school curriculum and instruction;
(c) Assist grant recipients of the Middle School Mathematics and Science
Page 316 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Scholars Program established under KRS 158.848 with professional
development for participating teachers;
(d) Assist middle school teachers in establishing and maintaining networks of
communication to share information regarding middle school instructional
practice, curriculum development, and other areas of common interest,
building upon existing networks;
(e) Develop and maintain a clearinghouse for information about:
1. Educational models addressing content knowledge and skills of middle
school students, based on reliable, replicable research;
2. Core content achievement levels of Kentucky students in relation to
students in other states and other countries; and
3. The relationship between student achievement levels and curriculum
content, curriculum structure and alignment with content, teacher
training, and teaching methods;
(f) Develop and implement a research structure, in collaboration with the
Department of Education, to evaluate the effectiveness of different middle
school instructional models; and
(g) Submit an annual report to the Governor and the Legislative Research
Commission by September 1 of each year. The report shall include
information outlining the center's activities, information provided by the
Kentucky Department of Education regarding the use of money from the
Teachers' Professional Growth Fund, and other information regarding efforts
to improve the quality of middle school instruction in Kentucky.
(3) With the advice of the commissioner of education and the Education Professional
Standards Board, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council
on Postsecondary Education] shall develop a process to solicit, review, and approve
a proposal for locating the Center for Middle School Academic Achievement at a
Page 317 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
public or private college or university. The authority[council] shall choose a
college or university that has demonstrated the coordination of course delivery
between the faculties of the college of education and arts and sciences departments
within the college or university. The authority[council] shall approve the location
for the center no later than November 15, 2000.
Section 146. KRS 156.671 is amended to read as follows:
The chief state school officer shall convene the Commissioner of the Department for
Information Systems, one (1) representative of Kentucky Educational Television, one (1)
representative of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education], and one (1) representative of the Department of Education to
create a strategic plan for distance learning in the Commonwealth and submit it to the
Legislative Research Commission by July 1, 1993. The plan shall set forth the
Commonwealth's vision for developing a long-term and statewide distance learning
strategy. It shall include, but not be limited to, definitions of the types of distance
learning delivery systems, an evaluation process for determining and certifying the
educational and cost effectiveness of each type of delivery system, comparisons of the
various types of delivery systems, and recommendations for implementation.
Section 147. KRS 156.740 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Interagency Commission on Educational and Job Training Coordination is
hereby created. Its membership shall be composed of the following individuals,
serving in an ex officio capacity:
(a) The chairman of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education];
(b) The executive director[president] of the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education];
(c) The chairman of the Kentucky Board of Education;
(d) The commissioner of the Department of Education;
Page 318 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(e) The commissioner of the Department of Workforce Development; and
(f) [The chairman of the Board for the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority; and
(g) ]The president of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System.
(2) Members shall serve by virtue of their office. The chairman of the commission shall
be chosen annually by a simple majority vote of the members. A quorum for
conducting business shall be one-half (1/2) of the members plus one (1). The chair
shall rotate annually, so that no person or agency holds the chairmanship in
successive years.
Section 148. KRS 156.856 is amended to read as follows:
Tuition and fees for secondary pupils enrolled in the state secondary area vocational
education and technology centers operated by the Office of Career and Technical
Education shall be free to all residents of Kentucky. The Kentucky Board of Education
shall fix the rate of tuition and fees for adults who are enrolled in secondary programs in
the state-operated area vocational education and technology centers under its control.
Adult students enrolled in full-time postsecondary programs under the jurisdiction of the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System that are physically located in an
area vocational education or technology center shall pay the tuition as established by the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education]
and fees as established by the board of regents for the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System.
Section 149. KRS 157.921 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Geographic Education Board is established to provide leadership and
planning for geography education for the population of Kentucky through the
efforts of elementary, secondary, and postsecondary educators, government
agencies, and public interests. The board shall be an independent agency and be
attached to the Education and Labor Cabinet for administrative purposes.
Page 319 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(2) The twelve (12) member board shall be appointed to two (2) year terms, initially
appointed by the Governor, and composed of the following members:
(a) Three (3) representatives from postsecondary institutions;
(b) One (1) representative from the Council for Social Sciences;
(c) Six (6) representatives from elementary and secondary schools;
(d) One (1) representative of the Department of Education; and
(e) One (1) representative of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education].
(3) The board shall select from its membership a chair and establish bylaws, including
bylaws governing board membership and length of terms. Upon expiration of the
initial appointments and adoption of bylaws governing membership and length of
terms by the board, the board shall be self-perpetuating, and the appointment and
length of terms shall be made in accordance with the board's bylaws. Vacancies that
occur before the expiration of the initial appointments shall be filled by the
Governor for the remaining term of the vacancy.
(4) The board members shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for
actual expenses incurred in accordance with state procedures and policies.
Section 150. KRS 157.922 is amended to read as follows:
The functions of the board shall be to:
(1) Create an annual plan to improve assessment, curriculums, outreach, and
professional development related to geography education in Kentucky;
(2) Establish a competitive system for awarding grants for programs to encourage and
support geography education;
(3) Seek and receive private support to fund state programs to encourage and support
geography education;
(4) Prepare an annual report of its activities and annual plan, forward copies of the
report to the Governor, the Legislative Research Commission, the Kentucky Board
Page 320 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
of Education, and the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council
on Postsecondary Education], and make copies available to citizens of the
Commonwealth; and
(5) Make recommendations and seek changes through administrative regulations,
legislation, and other means to promote geography education in Kentucky.
Section 151. KRS 158.007 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS Chapter 158 unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Advanced placement" or "AP" means a college-level course that incorporates all
topics and instructional strategies specified by the College Board on its standard
syllabus for a given subject area and is licensed by the College Board.
(2) "Advanced science and mathematics" means Advanced Placement or AP biology,
calculus, chemistry, computer science, environmental science, and physics, and
International Baccalaureate or IB biology, chemistry, computer science,
environmental systems, mathematical studies, further mathematics, and physics.
(3) "Board" means the Kentucky Board of Education.
(4) "College Board Advanced Placement examination" means the advanced placement
test administered by the College Entrance Examination Board.
(5) "College Board" means the College Entrance Examination Board, a national
nonprofit association that provides college admission guidance and advanced
placement examinations.
(6) "Core curriculum" means at least one (1) course in science, one (1) course in
mathematics, and at least one (1) course in two (2) of the following subject areas:
English, social studies, foreign language, and the arts.
(7) "Department" means the Kentucky Department of Education.
(8) "Dual credit" means a college-level course of study developed in accordance with
KRS 164.098 in which a high school student receives credit from both the high
school and postsecondary institution in which the student is enrolled upon
Page 321 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
completion of a single class or designated program of study.
(9) "Dual enrollment" means a college-level course of study developed in accordance
with KRS 164.098 in which a student is enrolled in a high school and
postsecondary institution simultaneously.
(10) "International Baccalaureate" or "IB" means the International Baccalaureate
Organization's Diploma Programme, a comprehensive two (2) year program
designed for highly motivated students.
(11) "Kentucky Virtual High School" means secondary-level instructional programs or
courses offered by the Kentucky Department of Education through the internet and
other on-line, computer-based methods.
(12) "Kentucky Virtual University" means a college-level instructional program offered
by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] through the internet or other on-line, computer-based
methods.
Section 152. KRS 158.305 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Aphasia" means a condition characterized by either partial or total loss of the
ability to communicate verbally or through written words. A person with
aphasia may have difficulty speaking, reading, writing, recognizing the names
of objects, or understanding what other people have said. The condition may
be temporary or permanent and does not include speech problems caused by
loss of muscle control;
(b) "Dyscalculia" means the inability to understand the meaning of numbers, the
basic operations of addition and subtraction, the complex operations of
multiplication and division, or to apply math principles to solve practical or
abstract problems;
(c) "Dysgraphia" means difficulty in automatically remembering and mastering
Page 322 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
the sequence of muscle motor movements needed to accurately write letters or
numbers;
(d) "Dyslexia" has the same meaning as in KRS 158.307;
(e) "Enrichment program" means accelerated intervention within the school day
or outside of the school day or school calendar led by individuals most
qualified to provide the intervention that includes evidence-based reading
instructional programming related to reading instruction in the areas of
phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension, and
other instructional strategies aligned to reading and writing standards required
by KRS 158.6453 and outlined in administrative regulation promulgated by
the Kentucky Board of Education;
(f) "Evidence-based" has the same meaning as in 20 U.S.C. sec. 7801(21);
(g) "Phonemic awareness" has the same meaning as in KRS 158.307;
(h) "Reading diagnostic assessment" has the same meaning as in KRS 158.792;
(i) "Reading improvement plan" means an accelerated intervention plan for a
student in kindergarten through grade four (4) that is developed to increase a
student's rate of progress toward proficient performance in reading that is
identified as necessary based on the student's results on an approved reading
diagnostic assessment. This plan should be developed in collaboration and
accordance with any existing program services plan, individualized education
program, or Section 504 Plan unless the program services plan, individualized
education program, or Section 504 Plan already addresses improving reading;
(j) "Reading improvement team" means a team that develops and oversees the
progress of a reading improvement plan and includes:
1. The parent or guardian of the student that is the subject of the reading
improvement plan;
2. No less than one (1) regular education teacher of the student to provide
Page 323 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
information about the general curriculum for same-aged peers;
3. A representative of the local education agency who is knowledgeable
about the reading curriculum and the availability of the evidence-based
literacy resources of the local education agency; and
4. Any specialized certified school employees for students receiving
language instruction educational programming or special education
services; and
(k) "Universal screener" means a process of providing a brief assessment to all
students within a grade level to assess the students' performance on the
essential components of reading.
(2) Notwithstanding any other statute or administrative regulation to the contrary, the
Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations to further
define a multitiered system of supports for district-wide use of a system for students
in kindergarten through grade three (3), that includes a tiered continuum of
interventions with varying levels of intensity and duration and which connects
general, compensatory, and special education programs to provide interventions
implemented with fidelity to evidence-based research and matched to individual
student strengths and needs. At a minimum, evidence of implementation shall be
submitted by the district to the department by October 1 of each year and shall
include but not be limited to the activities required under KRS 158.649.
(3) The Department of Education shall provide technical assistance and training, if
requested by a local district, to assist in the implementation of the district-wide,
multitiered system of supports as a means to identify and assist any student
experiencing difficulty in reading, writing, mathematics, or behavior and to
determine appropriate instructional modifications needed by advanced learners to
make continuous progress.
(4) The technical assistance and training shall be designed to improve:
Page 324 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(a) The use of specific screening processes and programs to identify student
strengths and needs;
(b) The use of screening data for designing instructional interventions;
(c) The use of multisensory instructional strategies and other interventions
validated for effectiveness by evidence-based research;
(d) Progress monitoring of student performance; and
(e) Accelerated, intensive, direct instruction that addresses students' individual
differences, including advanced learners, and enables students that are
experiencing difficulty to catch up with typically performing peers.
(5) (a) By January 1, 2023, each superintendent or public charter school board of
directors shall select:
1. At least one (1) universal screener for reading that is determined by the
department to be reliable and valid to be administered to all students in
kindergarten through grade three (3); and
2. At least one (1) reading diagnostic assessment for reading that is
determined by the department to be reliable and valid to be administered
as part of a multitiered system of supports for students in kindergarten
through grade three (3).
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 158.6453(19) and 160.345, each superintendent or
public charter school board shall adopt a common comprehensive reading
program that is determined by the department to be reliable, valid, and aligned
to reading and writing standards required by KRS 158.6453 and outlined in
administrative regulation promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education
for kindergarten through grade three (3) for all schools or a subset of schools,
with consultation of all affected elementary school councils.
(c) All teachers of students in kindergarten through grade three (3), including
public charter school teachers, shall be trained on any reading diagnostic
Page 325 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
assessment and universal screener selected by the superintendent or public
charter school board prior to administration of the assessment. The training
shall address:
1. How to properly administer the reading diagnostic assessment;
2. How to interpret the results of the reading diagnostic assessment to
identify students needing interventions;
3. How to use the assessment results to design instruction and
interventions;
4. The use of the assessment to monitor the progress of student
performance; and
5. The use of accelerated, intensive, and direct instruction that addresses
students' individual differences and enables students to achieve
proficiency in reading, including but not limited to daily, one-on-one
instruction.
(6) Beginning with the 2023-2024 school year, a universal screener determined by the
Department of Education to be reliable and valid shall be:
(a) Given in the first forty-five (45) days of the school year for all kindergarten
students at a public school or public charter school; and
(b) Given in the first thirty (30) days of the school year for grades one (1) through
three (3) at a public school or public charter school.
(7) A reading improvement plan shall be developed and implemented by a reading
improvement team for any student in kindergarten through grade three (3) identified
as needing accelerated interventions to progress toward proficient performance in
reading. The reading improvement plan shall require:
(a) Intensive intervention that includes effective instructional strategies and
appropriate instructional materials necessary to help the student make
accelerated progress toward proficient performance in reading and become
Page 326 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
ready for the next grade, including but not limited to daily, one-on-one
instruction with students the most in need provided by certified teachers
specifically trained to provide one-on-one instruction;
(b) A school to provide a written quarterly progress report containing the
information required by paragraph (a) of this subsection to a parent or
guardian of any student subject to a reading improvement plan. The written
quarterly progress report for the reading improvement plan may be included
in the school's existing quarterly progress report; and
(c) Individual placement decisions for children who are eligible for special
education and related services to be determined by the appropriate admissions
and release committee in accordance with administrative regulations
promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education.
(8) Beginning in the 2023-2024 school year, if a student's rate of progress toward
proficient performance in reading needs accelerated interventions as demonstrated
by the results of an approved reading diagnostic assessment, the local school district
shall provide:
(a) Enrichment programs through grade three (3) using evidence-based reading
instruction and other strategies;
(b) Intensive instructional services, progress monitoring measures, and supports
to students through grade three (3); and
(c) Parents and legal guardians of students identified for accelerated interventions
in reading in kindergarten through grade three (3) with a "Read at Home"
plan, including information on how to participate in regular parent-guided
home reading.
(9) Beginning in the 2024-2025 school year, if a student does not score in the proficient
performance level or higher in reading, as defined in KRS 158.791(2), on the state
annually required grade three (3) assessment, the local school district shall provide:
Page 327 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(a) 1. Enrichment programs in grade four (4) using evidence-based reading
instruction and other strategies; or
2. Intensive instructional services, progress monitoring measures, and
supports to students in grade four (4); and
(b) Written notification of the interventions and supports described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection to the parent or legal guardian of the student, including a
description of proposed interventions and supports to be provided.
(10) By September 1, 2023, if funds are appropriated, the department shall establish
required teacher academies or coaching models for teachers of students in
prekindergarten through grade three (3). The teacher academies or coaching models
shall be related to evidence-based practices in instruction, instructional materials,
and assessment in reading.
(11) The department shall develop and maintain a web-based resource providing
teachers access to:
(a) Information on the use of specific screening processes and programs to
identify student strengths and needs, including those for advanced learners;
(b) Current, evidence-based research and age-appropriate instructional tools that
may be used for substantial, steady improvement in:
1. Reading when a student is experiencing difficulty with phonemic
awareness, phonics, vocabulary, fluency, general reading
comprehension, or reading in specific content areas, or is exhibiting
characteristics of dyslexia, aphasia, or other reading difficulties;
2. Writing when a student is experiencing difficulty with consistently
producing letters or numbers with accuracy or is exhibiting
characteristics of dysgraphia;
3. Mathematics when a student is experiencing difficulty with basic math
facts, calculations, or application through problem solving, or is
Page 328 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
exhibiting characteristics of dyscalculia or other mathematical
difficulties; or
4. Behavior when a student is exhibiting behaviors that interfere with his
or her learning or the learning of other students; and
(c) Current, evidence-based research and age-appropriate instructional tools that
may be used for continuous progress of advanced learners.
(12) The department shall encourage districts to utilize both state and federal funds as
appropriate to implement a district-wide multitiered system of supports.
(13) The department is encouraged to coordinate technical assistance and training on
current best practice interventions with state postsecondary education institutions.
(14) The department shall collaborate with the statewide reading research center
established under KRS 164.0207, the Kentucky Center for Mathematics, the
Kentucky Center for Instructional Discipline, the Education Professional Standards
Board, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education], postsecondary teacher education programs, and other
agencies and organizations as deemed appropriate to ensure that teachers are
prepared to utilize evidence-based interventions in reading, writing, mathematics,
and behavior.
(15) In compliance with 20 U.S.C. sec. 1414(a)(1)(E), screening of a student to
determine appropriate instructional strategies for curriculum implementation shall
not be considered to be an evaluation for eligibility for special education and related
services and nothing in this section shall limit a school district from completing an
initial evaluation of a student suspected of having a disability.
Section 153. KRS 158.307 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Dyslexia" means a specific learning disability that is neurological in origin. It
is characterized by difficulties with accurate or fluent word recognition and by
Page 329 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
poor spelling and decoding abilities. These difficulties typically result from a
deficit in the phonological component of language that is often unexpected in
relation to other cognitive abilities and the provision of effective classroom
instruction. Secondary consequences may include problems in reading
comprehension and reduced reading experience that can impede the growth of
vocabulary and background knowledge;
(b) "Evidence-based" has the same meaning as in 20 U.S.C. sec. 7801(21); and
(c) "Phonemic awareness" means the ability to recognize that a spoken word
consists of a sequence of individual sounds and the ability to manipulate
individual sounds in speaking.
(2) By January 1, 2019, the Department of Education shall make available a dyslexia
toolkit that includes guidance, technical assistance, and training to assist all local
school districts in the implementation of evidence-based practices for instructing
students identified with or displaying characteristics of dyslexia.
(3) The dyslexia toolkit shall include but not be limited to the following guidance for
local districts targeting students in kindergarten through grade three (3) who have
been identified with or displaying characteristics of dyslexia:
(a) Evidence-based practices designed specifically for students with dyslexia;
(b) Characteristics of targeted instruction for dyslexia;
(c) Guidance on developing instructional plans for students with dyslexia;
(d) Best practices toward meaning-centered reading and writing;
(e) Structured multisensory and literacy approaches to teaching language and
reading skills; and
(f) Suggested professional development activities.
(4) The department shall collaborate with the Education Professional Standards Board,
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education], and other groups as necessary to improve and update professional
Page 330 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
development opportunities for teachers specifically related to dyslexia. Professional
development opportunities may focus on:
(a) Development and ongoing implementation of training and coaching for
teachers;
(b) Identifying high-quality trainers to provide support to local districts utilizing a
coaching model to develop building level dyslexia experts;
(c) Developing awareness training modules for all instructional staff to include
information about characteristics of dyslexia; and
(d) Evidence-based interventions, structured multisensory and literacy approaches
to teach language and reading skills, and accommodations for dyslexia and
other specific learning disabilities.
(5) Each local board of education may develop a policy addressing the implementation
of a program for the identification of and strategies for assisting students in
kindergarten through grade three (3) with dyslexia.
(6) The local board policies may include but not be limited to:
(a) The definition and characteristics of dyslexia;
(b) A process for identifying students who are displaying characteristics of
dyslexia;
(c) A process for the utilization of evaluation tools to accurately identify students
who are displaying characteristics of dyslexia. Any qualified dyslexia
evaluation tool utilized by a local district shall address but not be limited to
the following components:
1. Phonological awareness and phonemic awareness;
2. Sound symbol recognition;
3. Alphabet knowledge;
4. Decoding skills;
5. Encoding skills; and
Page 331 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
6. Rapid naming;
(d) A process for how evaluation tools are administered and evaluated by trained
district personnel or licensed professionals;
(e) A process for outreach to parents of students identified with or displaying the
characteristics of dyslexia with information and resource materials and how
dyslexia may be addressed in the student's educational setting;
(f) Identification of evidence-based interventions, structured multisensory and
literacy approaches to teach language and reading skills, and accommodations
that schools may utilize to provide services to students identified as having
dyslexia; and
(g) A process for monitoring a student's progress after the positive identification,
including assessments to ascertain whether the intervention services improve
the student's language processing and reading skills.
(7) By June 30 of each year, each local school district that developed a policy
addressing the implementation of a program for the identification of and strategies
for assisting students in kindergarten through grade three (3) with dyslexia shall
provide the department the following data for the current school year:
(a) The number of students in kindergarten through grade three (3) that were
identified as displaying characteristics of dyslexia;
(b) The number of students in paragraph (a) of this subsection that were identified
through the response-to-intervention process;
(c) The number of students in kindergarten through grade three (3) that were
evaluated for dyslexia;
(d) The number of students in kindergarten through grade three (3) that were
identified with dyslexia;
(e) The dyslexia evaluation tools used to identify students;
(f) The number of students in kindergarten through grade three (3) that were
Page 332 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
participating in interventions within the school setting;
(g) The process or tools used to evaluate student progress; and
(h) The number of trained district personnel or licensed professionals used to
administer the dyslexia evaluation tools.
(8) (a) The department shall establish a study project to gather information on early
screening and intervention services for children with characteristics of
dyslexia. The commissioner of education shall select three (3) school districts
to participate in the study project, one (1) of which shall be located in an
urban setting, one (1) of which shall be located in a suburban setting, and one
(1) of which shall be located in a rural setting.
(b) The department shall establish guidelines and procedures for the study
project.
(c) The study project shall operate for three (3) full school years, beginning with
the school year that begins at least three (3) months after July 14, 2018.
(d) The goal of the study project shall be to evaluate the effectiveness of early
reading assistance programs for children with characteristics of dyslexia.
(e) The commissioner may consult with recognized organizations that specialize
in structured literacy programs for the treatment of dyslexia in establishing
and operating the study project.
(f) The department shall submit a final report outlining the findings of the study
to the Interim Joint Committee on Education by November 1 after the final
academic year of the study project.
Section 154. KRS 158.622 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations
establishing the criteria a school shall meet in order to designate a course an
advanced placement course, including content and program standards concerning
student admission criteria, data collection, and reporting.
Page 333 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(2) Upon receipt of adequate federal funding for these purposes, the Department of
Education shall:
(a) Expand advanced placement teacher training institutes, including offering
advanced placement teacher training instruction and assistance through the
Kentucky Virtual High School or in conjunction with the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education]
through the Kentucky Virtual University;
(b) Require teachers who are planning to participate in advanced placement
teacher training and complete advanced placement training at advanced
placement institutes facilitated by the department to sign an agreement to
teach at least one (1) advanced placement course in a Kentucky public school
or the Kentucky Virtual High School when assigned by the school principal;
(c) Develop the Kentucky Virtual Advanced Placement Academy which shall
offer school districts and their students access to a core advanced placement
curriculum through the Kentucky Virtual High School;
(d) Identify, in conjunction with the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], resources at the secondary
and postsecondary levels that can be directed toward advanced placement or
dual enrollment instruction;
(e) Compare the costs of offering advanced placement courses through traditional
on-site instruction, the Kentucky Virtual High School, and other methods and
shall offer each school district assistance, if requested, in analyzing how the
school district can most cost-effectively offer the largest number of advanced
placement courses;
(f) Identify current and future funding sources for advanced placement or dual
enrollment instructional programs and the amount of funds available or
anticipated from those sources; and
Page 334 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(g) Submit a report to the Kentucky General Assembly outlining compliance with
this section.
(3) Each school district shall:
(a) Accept for credit toward graduation any course a student successfully
completes through the Kentucky Virtual High School and incorporate the
grade the student receives in a Kentucky Virtual High School course in
calculating that student's grade point average without distinction between the
grade received in the Kentucky Virtual High School course and courses taught
within the school district for which the student receives a grade;
(b) Accept for credit toward graduation and completion of high school course
requirements an advanced placement, a high school equivalent, or a Kentucky
Virtual High School course taken by a student in grades 5, 6, 7, or 8 if that
student attains performance levels expected of high school students in that
district as determined by achieving a score of "3" or higher on a College
Board Advanced Placement examination or a grade of "B" or better in a high
school equivalent or a Kentucky Virtual High School course; and
(c) Pay tuition and other costs for students from their districts who are enrolled in
a Kentucky Virtual High School course for credit that is part of the student's
regular school day coursework by proportionately sharing funds generated
under KRS 157.360 or other funding sources.
Section 155. KRS 158.6453 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Accelerated learning" means an organized way of helping students meet
individual academic goals by providing direct instruction to eliminate student
performance deficiencies or enable students to move more quickly through
course requirements and pursue higher level skill development;
(b) "Constructed-response items" or "performance-based items" means individual
Page 335 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
test items that require the student to create an answer rather than select a
response and may include fill-in-the-blank, short-answer, extended-answer,
open-response, and writing-on-demand formats;
(c) "Criterion-referenced test" means a test that is aligned with defined academic
content standards and measures an individual student's level of performance
against the standards;
(d) "End-of-course examination" means the same as defined in KRS 158.860;
(e) "Formative assessment" means a process used by teachers and students during
instruction to adjust ongoing teaching and learning to improve students'
achievement of intended instructional outcomes. Formative assessments may
include the use of commercial assessments, classroom observations, teacher-
designed classroom tests and assessments, and other processes and
assignments to gain information about individual student learning;
(f) "Interim assessments" means assessments that are given periodically
throughout the year to provide diagnostic information and to show individual
student performance against content standards;
(g) "Summative assessment" means an assessment given at the end of the school
year, semester, or other period of time to evaluate students' performance
against content standards within a unit of instruction or a course; and
(h) "Writing" means a purposeful act of thinking and expression that uses
language to explore ideas and communicate meaning to others. Writing is a
complex, multifaceted act of communication and is distinct from basic
handwriting or penmanship.
(2) (a) Beginning in fiscal year 2017-2018, and every six (6) years thereafter, the
Kentucky Department of Education shall implement a process for reviewing
Kentucky's academic standards and the alignment of corresponding
assessments for possible revision or replacement to ensure alignment with
Page 336 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
transition readiness standards necessary for global competitiveness, state
career and technical education standards, and KRS 158.196.
(b) The revisions to the content standards shall:
1. Focus on critical knowledge, skills, and capacities needed for success in
the global economy;
2. Result in fewer but more in-depth standards to facilitate mastery
learning;
3. Communicate expectations more clearly and concisely to teachers,
parents, students, and citizens;
4. Be based on evidence-based research;
5. Consider international benchmarks; and
6. Ensure that the standards are aligned from elementary to high school to
postsecondary education so that students can be successful at each
education level.
(c) 1. The department shall establish four (4) standards and assessments
review committees, with each committee composed of a minimum of six
(6) Kentucky public school teachers and a minimum of two (2)
representatives from Kentucky institutions of higher education,
including at least one (1) representative from a public institution of
higher education. Each committee member shall teach in the subject
area that his or her committee is assigned to review and have no prior or
current affiliation with a curriculum or assessment resources vendor.
2. One (1) of the four (4) committees shall be assigned to focus on the
review of language arts and writing academic standards and
assessments, one (1) on the review of mathematics academic standards
and assessments, one (1) on the review of science academic standards
and assessments, and one (1) on the review of social studies academic
Page 337 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
standards and assessments.
(d) 1. The department shall establish twelve (12) advisory panels to advise and
assist each of the four (4) standards and assessments review committees.
2. Three (3) advisory panels shall be assigned to each standards and
assessments review committee. One (1) panel shall review the standards
and assessments for kindergarten through grade five (5), one (1) shall
review the standards and assessments for grades six (6) through eight
(8), and one (1) shall review the standards and assessments for grades
nine (9) through twelve (12).
3. Each advisory panel shall be composed of at least one (1) representative
from a Kentucky institution of higher education and a minimum of six
(6) Kentucky public school teachers who teach in the grade level and
subject reviewed by the advisory panel to which they are assigned and
have no prior or current affiliation with a curriculum or assessment
resources vendor.
(e) The commissioner of education and the executive director[president] of the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall also provide consultants for the standards and assessments
review committees and the advisory panels who are business and industry
professionals actively engaged in career fields that depend on the various
content areas.
(f) 1. The standards and assessments process review committee is hereby
established and shall be composed of the commissioner of education or
designee as a nonvoting member and nine (9) voting representatives of
public schools, of whom at least two (2) shall be parents of public
school students, appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate
in accordance with KRS 11.160 as follows:
Page 338 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
a. One (1) language arts teacher;
b. One (1) math teacher;
c. One (1) science teacher;
d. One (1) social studies teacher;
e. Two (2) school principals;
f. Two (2) school superintendents; and
g. One (1) school board member.
2. On making appointments to the committee, the Governor shall ensure
broad geographical urban and rural representation and representation of
elementary, middle, and high school levels; ensure equal representation
of the two (2) sexes, inasmuch as possible; and ensure that appointments
reflect the minority racial composition of the Commonwealth.
3. The review of the committee shall be limited to the procedural aspects
of the review process undertaken prior to its consideration.
4. Notwithstanding KRS 12.028, the committee shall not be subject to
reorganization by the Governor.
(g) 1. The review process implemented under this subsection shall be an open,
transparent process that allows all Kentuckians an opportunity to
participate. The department shall ensure the public's assistance in
reviewing and suggesting changes to the standards and alignment
adjustments to corresponding state assessments by establishing a
website dedicated to collecting comments by the public and educators.
An independent third party, which has no prior or current affiliation with
a curriculum or assessment resources vendor, shall be selected by the
department to collect and transmit the comments to the department for
dissemination to the appropriate advisory panel for review and
consideration.
Page 339 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
2. Each advisory panel shall review the standards and assessments for its
assigned subject matter and grade level and the suggestions made by the
public and educators. After completing its review, each advisory panel
shall make recommendations for changes to the standards and alignment
adjustments for assessments to the appropriate standards and
assessments review committee.
3. Each standards and assessments review committee shall review the
findings and make recommendations to revise or replace existing
standards and to adjust alignment of assessments.
4. The recommendations shall be published on the website established in
this subsection for the purpose of gathering additional feedback from the
public. The commissioner shall subsequently present the
recommendations and the public feedback to the Interim Joint
Committee on Education.
5. The commissioner shall subsequently provide a report to the standards
and assessments process review committee summarizing the process
conducted under this subsection and the resulting recommendations. The
report shall include but not be limited to the timeline of the review
process, public feedback, and responses from the Interim Joint
Committee on Education.
6. After receiving the commissioner's report, the standards and assessments
process review committee shall either concur that stakeholders have had
adequate opportunity to provide input on standards and the
corresponding alignment of state assessments or find the input process
deficient. If the process is found deficient, the recommendations may be
returned to the appropriate standards and assessments review committee
for review as described in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph. If the
Page 340 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
process is found sufficient, the recommendations shall be forwarded
without amendment to the Kentucky Board of Education.
(h) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as may be needed for the administration
of the review process, including staggering the timing and sequence of the
review process by subject area and remuneration of the review committees
and advisory panels described in paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection.
(i) 1. The Kentucky Board of Education shall consider for approval the
revisions to academic standards for a content area and the alignment of
the corresponding state assessment once recommendations are received
from the standards and assessments process review committee. Existing
state academic standards shall remain in place until the board approves
new standards.
2. Any revision to, or replacement of, the academic standards and
assessments as a result of the review process conducted under this
subsection shall be implemented in Kentucky public schools no later
than the second academic year following the review process. Existing
academic standards shall be used until new standards are implemented.
3. The Department of Education shall disseminate the academic content
standards to the schools and teacher preparation programs.
(j) The Department of Education shall provide or facilitate statewide training
sessions for existing teachers and administrators on how to:
1. Integrate the revised content standards into classroom instruction;
2. Better integrate performance assessment of students within their
instructional practices; and
3. Help all students use higher-order thinking and communication skills.
(k) The Education Professional Standards Board in cooperation with the
Page 341 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Kentucky Board of Education and the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] shall coordinate
information and training sessions for faculty and staff in all of the teacher
preparation programs in the use of the revised academic content standards.
The Education Professional Standards Board shall ensure that each teacher
preparation program includes use of the academic standards in the pre-service
education programs and that all teacher interns will have experience planning
classroom instruction based on the revised standards.
(l) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] in cooperation with the Kentucky Department of
Education and the postsecondary education institutions in the state shall
coordinate information sessions regarding the academic content standards for
faculty who teach in the various content areas.
(3) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education shall be responsible for creating and
implementing a balanced statewide assessment program that measures the
students', schools', and districts' achievement of the goals set forth in KRS
158.645 and 158.6451, to ensure compliance with the federal Every Student
Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95, or its successor, and to ensure
school accountability.
(b) The board shall revise the annual statewide assessment program as needed in
accordance with revised academic standards and corresponding assessment
alignment adjustments approved by the board under subsection (2) of this
section.
(c) The statewide assessments shall not include any academic standards not
approved by the board under subsection (2) of this section.
(d) The board shall seek the advice of the Office of Education Accountability; the
School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council; the Education
Page 342 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Assessment and Accountability Review Subcommittee, and the department's
technical advisory committee in the development of the assessment program.
The statewide assessment program shall not include measurement of a
student's ability to become a self-sufficient individual or to become a
responsible member of a family, work group, or community.
(4) (a) The academic components of the statewide assessment program shall be
composed of annual student summative tests, which may include a
combination of multiple competency-based assessment and performance
measures approved by the Kentucky Board of Education.
(b) The annual student summative tests shall:
1. Measure individual student achievement in language, reading, English,
mathematics, science, and social studies at designated grades;
2. Provide teachers and parents a valid and reliable comprehensive analysis
of skills mastered by individual students;
3. Provide diagnostic information that identifies strengths and academic
deficiencies of individual students in the content areas;
4. Provide information to teachers that can enable them to improve
instruction for current and future students;
5. Provide longitudinal profiles for students; and
6. Ensure school and district accountability for student achievement of the
goals set forth in KRS 158.645 and 158.6451, except the statewide
assessment program shall not include measurement of a student's ability
to become a self-sufficient individual or to become a responsible
member of a family, work group, or community.
(5) The state student assessments shall include the following components:
(a) Elementary and middle grades requirements are:
1. A criterion-referenced test each in mathematics and reading in grades
Page 343 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
three (3) through eight (8) that is valid and reliable for an individual
student and that measures the depth and breadth of Kentucky's academic
content standards;
2. A criterion-referenced test each in science and social studies that is valid
and reliable for an individual student as necessary to measure the depth
and breadth of Kentucky's academic content standards to be
administered one (1) time within the elementary and middle grades,
respectively;
3. An on-demand assessment of student writing to be administered one (1)
time within the elementary grades and one (1) time within the middle
grades; and
4. An editing and mechanics test relating to writing, using multiple choice
and constructed response items, to be administered one (1) time within
the elementary and the middle grades, respectively;
(b) High school requirements are:
1. A criterion-referenced test in mathematics, reading, and science that is
valid and reliable for an individual student and that measures the depth
and breadth of Kentucky's academic content standards to be
administered one (1) time within the high school grades;
2. A criterion-referenced test in social studies that is valid and reliable for
an individual student as necessary to measure the depth and breadth of
Kentucky's academic content standards to be administered one (1) time
within the high school grades;
3. An on-demand assessment of student writing to be administered one (1)
time within the high school grades;
4. An editing and mechanics test relating to writing, using multiple choice
and constructed response items, to be administered one (1) time within
Page 344 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
the high school grades; and
5. A college admissions examination to assess English, reading,
mathematics, and science in the spring of grade eleven (11);
(c) The Kentucky Board of Education shall add any other component necessary
to comply with the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95,
or its successor, as determined by the United States Department of Education;
(d) The criterion-referenced components required in this subsection shall be
composed of constructed response items and multiple choice items;
(e) The Kentucky Board of Education may incorporate end-of-course
examinations into the assessment program to be used in lieu of requirements
for criterion-referenced tests required under paragraph (b) of this subsection;
and
(f) The results of the assessment program developed under this subsection shall
be used by schools and districts to determine appropriate instructional
modifications for all students in order for students to make continuous
progress, including that needed by advanced learners.
(6) Each school district shall administer the statewide student assessment during the
last fourteen (14) days of school in the district's instructional calendar. The
Kentucky Board of Education may change the testing window to allow for
innovative assessment systems or other online test administration and shall
promulgate administrative regulations that minimize the number of days of testing
and outline the procedures to be used during the testing process to ensure test
security, including procedures for testing makeup days, and to comply with federal
assessment requirements.
(7) A student enrolled in a district-operated or district-contracted alternative program
shall participate in the appropriate assessments required by this section.
(8) A local school district may select and use commercial interim or formative
Page 345 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
assessments or develop and use its own formative assessments to provide data on
how well its students are growing toward mastery of Kentucky academic standards,
so long as the district's local school board develops a policy minimizing the
reduction in instructional time related to the administration of the interim
assessments. Nothing in this section precludes teachers from using ongoing teacher-
developed formative processes.
(9) Each school that enrolls primary students shall use diagnostic assessments and
prompts that measure readiness in reading and mathematics for its primary students
as determined by the school to be developmentally appropriate. The schools may
use commercial products, use products and procedures developed by the district, or
develop their own diagnostic procedures. The results shall be used to inform the
teachers and parents or guardians of each student's skill level.
(10) The state board shall ensure that a technically sound longitudinal comparison of the
assessment results for the same students shall be made available.
(11) The following provisions shall apply to the college admissions examination
described in subsection (5)(b)5. of this section:
(a) The cost of the college admissions examination administered to students in
high school shall be paid for by the Kentucky Department of Education. The
costs of additional college admissions examinations shall be the responsibility
of the student;
(b) If funds are available, the Kentucky Department of Education shall provide a
college admissions examination preparation program to all public high school
juniors. The department may contract for necessary services; and
(c) Accommodations provided to a student with a disability taking the college
admissions assessment under this subsection shall consist of:
1. Accommodations provided in a manner allowed by the college
admissions assessment provider when results in test scores are
Page 346 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
reportable to a postsecondary institution for admissions and placement
purposes, except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph; or
2. Accommodations provided in a manner allowed by a student's
individualized education program as defined in KRS 158.281 for a
student whose disability precludes valid assessment of his or her
academic abilities using the accommodations provided under
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph when the student's scores are not
reportable to a postsecondary institution for admissions and placement
purposes.
(12) Kentucky teachers shall have a significant role in providing feedback about the
design of the assessments, except for the college admissions exam described in
subsection (5)(b)5. of this section. The assessments shall be designed to:
(a) Measure grade appropriate core academic content, basic skills, and higher-
order thinking skills and their application;
(b) Provide valid and reliable scores for schools. If scores are reported for
students individually, they shall be valid and reliable;
(c) Minimize the time spent by teachers and students on assessment; and
(d) Assess Kentucky academic standards only.
(13) The results from assessment under subsections (3) and (5) of this section shall be
reported to the school districts and schools no later than seventy-five (75) days
following the last day the assessment can be administered. Assessment reports
provided to the school districts and schools shall include an electronic copy of an
operational subset of test items from each assessment administered to their students
and the results for each of those test items by student and by school.
(14) The Department of Education shall gather information to establish the validity of
the assessment and accountability program. It shall develop a biennial plan for
validation studies that shall include but not be limited to the consistency of student
Page 347 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
results across multiple measures, the congruence of school scores with documented
improvements in instructional practice and the school learning environment, and the
potential for all scores to yield fair, consistent, and accurate student performance
level and school accountability decisions. Validation activities shall take place in a
timely manner and shall include a review of the accuracy of scores assigned to
students and schools, as well as of the testing materials. The plan shall be submitted
to the Commission by July 1 of the first year of each biennium. A summary of the
findings shall be submitted to the Legislative Research Commission by September
1 of the second year of the biennium.
(15) The Department of Education and the state board shall offer optional assistance to
local school districts and schools in developing and using continuous assessment
strategies needed to ensure student progress. The continuous assessment shall
provide diagnostic information to improve instruction to meet the needs of
individual students.
(16) The Administration Code for Kentucky's Assessment Program shall include
prohibitions of inappropriate test preparation activities by school district employees
charged with test administration and oversight, including but not limited to the issue
of teachers being required to do test practice in lieu of regular classroom instruction
and test practice outside the normal work day. The code shall include disciplinary
sanctions that may be taken toward a school or individuals.
(17) The Kentucky Board of Education, after the Department of Education has received
advice from the Office of Education Accountability; the School Curriculum,
Assessment, and Accountability Council; and the department's technical advisory
committee, shall promulgate an administrative regulation under KRS Chapter 13A
to establish the components of a reporting structure for assessments administered
under this section. The reporting structure shall include the following components:
(a) A school report card that clearly communicates with parents and the public
Page 348 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
about school performance. The school report card shall be sent to the parents
of the students of the districts, and information on electronic access to a
summary of the results for the district shall be published in the newspaper
with the largest circulation in the county. It shall include but not be limited to
the following components reported by race, gender, and disability when
appropriate:
1. Student academic achievement, including the results from each of the
assessments administered under this section;
2. For Advanced Placement, Cambridge Advanced International, and
International Baccalaureate, the courses offered, the number of students
enrolled, completing, and taking the examination for each course, and
the percentage of examinees receiving a score of three (3) or better on
AP examinations, a score of "e" or better on Cambridge Advanced
International examinations, or a score of four (4) or better on IB
examinations. The data shall be disaggregated by gender, race, students
with disabilities, and economic status;
3. Nonacademic achievement, including the school's attendance, retention,
graduation rates, and student transition to postsecondary;
4. School learning environment, including measures of parental
involvement; and
5. Any other school performance data required by the Every Student
Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95, or its successor;
(b) An individual student report to parents for each student in grades three (3)
through eight (8) summarizing the student's skills in reading, science, social
studies, and mathematics. The school's staff shall develop a plan for
accelerated learning for any student with identified deficiencies or strengths;
and
Page 349 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(c) A student's score on the college admissions assessment administered under
subsection (5)(b)5. of this section.
(18) (a) Beginning in fiscal year 2017-2018, and every six (6) years thereafter, the
Kentucky Department of Education shall implement a comprehensive process
for reviewing and revising the academic standards in visual and performing
arts and practical living skills and career studies for all levels and in foreign
language for middle and high schools. The department shall develop review
committees for the standards for each of the content areas that include
representation from certified specialist public school teachers and
postsecondary teachers in those subject areas.
(b) The academic standards in practical living skills for elementary, middle, and
high school levels shall include a focus on drug abuse prevention, with an
emphasis on the prescription drug epidemic and the connection between
prescription opioid abuse and addiction to other drugs, such as heroin and
synthetic drugs.
(c) The department shall provide to all schools guidelines for programs that
incorporate the adopted academic standards in visual and performing arts and
practical living and career studies. The department shall provide to middle and
high schools guidelines for including a foreign language program. The
guidelines shall address program length and time, courses offered, staffing,
resources, and facilities.
(d) The Kentucky Department of Education, in consultation with certified public
school teachers of visual and performing arts, may develop program standards
for the visual and performing arts.
(19) The Kentucky Department of Education shall provide to all school districts
guidelines for including an effective writing program within the curriculum.
(20) (a) The Kentucky Department of Education, in consultation with the review
Page 350 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
committees described in subsection (18) of this section, shall develop a school
profile report to be used by all schools to document how they will address the
adopted academic standards in their implementation of the programs as
described in subsection (18) of this section, which may include student
opportunities and experiences in extracurricular activities. The department
shall include the essential workplace ethics program on the school profile
report.
(b) By October 1 of each year, each school principal shall complete the school
profile report, which shall be signed by the members of the school council, or
the principal if no school council exists, and the superintendent. The report
shall be electronically transmitted to the Kentucky Department of Education,
and the original shall be maintained on file at the local board office and made
available to the public upon request. The department shall include a link to
each school's profile report on its website.
(c) If a school staff member, student, or a student's parent has concerns regarding
deficiencies in a school's implementation of the programs described in
subsection (18) of this section, he or she may submit a written inquiry to the
school council.
Section 156. KRS 158.6455 is amended to read as follows:
It is the intent of the General Assembly that schools succeed with all students and receive
the appropriate consequences in proportion to that success.
(1) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education shall create an accountability system to
classify districts and schools in accordance with the academic standards and
student assessment program developed pursuant to KRS 158.6453.
(b) The accountability system shall include an annual meaningful differentiation
of all public schools in the state using multiple measures that describe the
overall performance of each district, school, and student subgroup.
Page 351 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Performance shall be based on a combination of academic and school quality
indicators and measures, hereinafter called "state indicators." The state
indicators shall exclusively include:
1. Student assessment results;
2. Progress toward achieving English proficiency by limited English
proficiency students;
3. Quality of school climate and safety;
4. High school graduation rates;
5. Postsecondary readiness for each high school student, which shall be
included as an academic indicator, and shall be measured by one (1) of
the following:
a. Meeting or exceeding a college readiness benchmark score on the
college admissions examination used as the statewide assessment
in KRS 158.6453(5)(b)5. or a college placement examination
approved by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education]. The college
readiness benchmark score shall be established by the Kentucky
Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education];
b. Achieving a minimum of three (3) hours of dual credit by
completing a course approved by the Kentucky Board of
Education or qualifying for a minimum of three (3) hours of
postsecondary articulated credit associated with a statewide
articulation agreement;
c. Achieving a benchmark score on an Advanced Placement,
International Baccalaureate, Cambridge Advanced International,
or other nationally recognized exam approved by the Kentucky
Page 352 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Board of Education that generally qualifies the student for three
(3) or more hours of college credit;
d. Completing a required number of hours or achieving a benchmark
within an apprenticeship, cooperative, or internship that is:
i. Not required to be offered as a high school course or during
the regular school day, week, or year;
ii. Aligned with a credential or associate degree; and
iii. Approved by the Kentucky Board of Education after
receiving input from the Local Superintendents Advisory
Council; or
e. Achieving any industry-recognized certifications, licensures, or
credentials, with more weight in accountability for industry-
recognized certifications, licensures, or credentials identified as
high demand in accordance with the process described in
paragraph (e) of this subsection. Eligible industry-recognized
certifications, licensures, or credentials shall not be limited to
those earned in conjunction with a minimum sequence of courses.
Each high school shall publicly report the credits, hours, and
credentials on an annual basis; and
6. Any other factor mandated by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act
of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95, or its successor.
(c) 1. Beginning with data from the 2020-2021 and 2021-2022 school years,
the accountability system performance for each district, school, and
student subgroup determined by the state indicators shall be based on a
combination of annual performance, hereinafter called "status," and
improvement over time, hereinafter called "change."
2. Status and change shall receive equal weight in determining overall
Page 353 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
performance. For all students as a group and separately for individual
subgroups, status shall be determined, beginning with the data from the
2020-2021 academic year, by using the current year performance and
change shall be determined, beginning with the data from the 2021-2022
academic year, by using the difference in performance from the prior to
current year, except change shall be based on the difference in
performance for the prior three (3) years for the purpose of determining
the lowest-performing five percent (5%) of schools under KRS
160.346(2) and (3).
3. For each state indicator, there shall be five (5) status levels ranging from
very high to very low and five (5) change levels ranging from increased
significantly to declined significantly.
4. The percentile cut scores for status and change levels shall be based on
distribution and shall be approved by the Kentucky Department of
Education and the Local Superintendents Advisory Council. The cut
scores shall remain in place for at least six (6) years unless existing cut
scores no longer support meaningful differentiation of schools as
required by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No.
114-95, or its successor.
(d) Beginning in the fall of 2022, the Kentucky Department of Education shall
develop an online display of the accountability system results hereinafter
called a "dashboard." A color-coded performance level for each state indicator
shall be displayed in a straightforward manner on the dashboard for overall
performance, status, and change by district, school, and individual subgroups.
Overall performance shall aggregate all available data for the state indicators.
(e) Based on data from the Kentucky Center for Education and Workforce
Statistics, each local workforce investment board, in conjunction with local
Page 354 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
economic development organizations from its state regional sector, shall
annually compile a list of industry-recognized certifications, licensures, and
credentials specific to the state and regional workforce area, rank them by
demand for the state and regional area, and provide the list to the Kentucky
Workforce Innovation Board. The Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board, in
conjunction with the Kentucky Department of Education, may revise the lists
before the Kentucky Department of Education disseminates the lists to all
school districts to be used as postsecondary readiness indicators.
(f) 1. The Kentucky Department of Education shall pay for the cost of an
assessment taken by a high school student for attaining an industry-
recognized certification, credential, or licensure if the student
consecutively completes at least two (2) related career pathway courses
approved by the department prior to taking the assessment.
2. If a high school student has not completed the two (2) course
requirement described in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph but meets
performance-based experience eligibility and passes an assessment, the
department shall provide a weighted reimbursement amount to the
school district for the cost of the assessment based on the level of
demand of the certificate, credential, or license earned. The Kentucky
Board of Education shall promulgate regulations establishing the
performance-based experience eligibility requirements and weighted
reimbursement amounts.
(g) Prior to promulgating administrative regulations to revise the accountability
system, the board shall seek advice from the School Curriculum, Assessment,
and Accountability Council; the Office of Education Accountability; the
Education Assessment and Accountability Review Subcommittee; and the
department's technical advisory committee.
Page 355 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(2) A student's test scores shall be counted in the accountability measure of:
(a) 1. The school in which the student is currently enrolled if the student has
been enrolled in that school for at least a full academic year as defined
by the Kentucky Board of Education; or
2. The school in which the student was previously enrolled if the student
was enrolled in that school for at least a full academic year as defined by
the Kentucky Board of Education; and
(b) The school district if the student is enrolled in the district for at least a full
academic year as defined by the Kentucky Board of Education; and
(c) The state if the student is enrolled in a Kentucky public school prior to the
beginning of the statewide testing period.
(3) After receiving the advice of the Office of Education Accountability; the School
Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council; and the department's
technical advisory committee, the Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate
an administrative regulation in conformity with KRS 158.6471 and 158.6472 and
KRS Chapter 13A to establish more rigorous action, intervention, and appropriate
consequences for schools that fail to exit comprehensive support and improvement
status described in KRS 160.346. The consequences shall be designed to improve
the academic performance and learning environment of identified schools and may
include but not be limited to:
(a) A review and audit process to determine the appropriateness of a school's or
district's classification and to recommend needed assistance;
(b) School and district improvement plans;
(c) Eligibility to receive Commonwealth school improvement funds under KRS
158.805;
(d) Education assistance from highly skilled certified staff; and
(e) Observation of school personnel.
Page 356 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(4) All students who drop out of school during a school year shall be included in a
school's annual average school graduation rate calculation.
(5) After receiving the advice of the Education Assessment and Accountability Review
Subcommittee, the Office of Education Accountability; the School Curriculum,
Assessment, and Accountability Council; and the department's technical advisory
committee, the Kentucky Board of Education may promulgate by administrative
regulation, in conformity with KRS 158.6471 and 158.6472 and KRS Chapter 13A,
a system of district accountability that includes establishing a formula for
accountability, goals for improvement over a three (3) year period, rewards for
leadership in improving teaching and learning in the district, and consequences that
address the problems and provide assistance when one (1) or more schools in the
district fail to exit comprehensive support and improvement status after three (3)
consecutive years of implementing the turnaround intervention process described in
KRS 160.346.
(6) After receiving the advice of the Office of Education Accountability; the School
Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council; and the department's
technical advisory committee, the Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate
administrative regulations in conformity with KRS 158.6471 and 158.6472 and
KRS Chapter 13A to establish a process whereby a school or school district shall be
allowed to appeal any performance judgment made by the department under this
section or KRS 160.346 of a principal, superintendent, school, or school district
which it considers grossly unfair. Upon appeal, an administrative hearing shall be
conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. The state board may adjust a
performance judgment on appeal when evidence of unusual circumstances warrants
the conclusion that the performance judgment is based on fraud or a mistake in
computations, is arbitrary, is lacking any reasonable basis, or when there are
significant new circumstances occurring during the three (3) year assessment period
Page 357 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
which are beyond the control of the appellant school or school district.
(7) Advice and recommendations provided by the department's technical advisory
committee shall be summarized and reported by the department by July 1 and
December 1 of each year to the Office of Education Accountability. The report shall
include:
(a) Advice and recommendations provided by panel members relating to:
1. Development and modification to the assessment and accountability
system;
2. The development of administrative regulations governing the
assessment and accountability system;
3. The setting of standards used in the assessment and accountability
system; and
4. KRS 158.6453, 158.6455, 158.782, or 158.860; and
(b) Any documentation used by the panel in support of the panel's advice and
recommendations.
Upon receipt of the report, the Office of Education Accountability shall forward the
report to the Education Assessment and Accountability Review Subcommittee and
the co-chairs of the Interim Joint Committee on Education.
Section 157. KRS 158.6459 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A high school student whose highest score on the college admissions examination
under KRS 158.6453(5)(b)5. in English, reading, or mathematics is below the
systemwide standard established by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] for entry into a credit-bearing
course at a public postsecondary institution without placement in a remedial course
or an entry-level course with supplementary academic support shall be provided the
opportunity to participate in accelerated learning designed to address his or her
identified academic deficiencies prior to high school graduation.
Page 358 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(2) A high school, in collaboration with its school district, shall develop and implement
accelerated learning that:
(a) Allows a student's learning plan to be individualized to meet the student's
academic needs based on an assessment of test results and consultation among
parents, teachers, and the student; and
(b) May include changes in a student's class schedule.
(3) The Kentucky Department of Education, the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], and public
postsecondary institutions shall offer support and technical assistance to schools
and school districts in the development of accelerated learning.
Section 158. KRS 158.646 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Institute for Education Research Board is hereby created.
(2) The board shall establish a corporation which can qualify and obtain status under
Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The purpose and mission of the
corporation shall be to solicit and raise funds through private foundations, grants,
and government agencies to support the independent evaluation of the Kentucky
Education Reform Act and related activities. The corporation shall serve as a
stimulus and clearinghouse for Kentucky Education Reform Act related research
projects.
(3) (a) The board shall cause an in-depth evaluation of the impact of Kentucky
Education Reform Act to be performed. This evaluation shall include, but not
be limited to, the effect of the reforms on students, individual schools, school
systems, and educators. The evaluation shall also include an analysis of the
reliability and validity of the changes in scores between baseline scores and
scores from subsequent administrations of tests.
(b) The board shall make recommendations to the citizens and elected leaders of
the Commonwealth concerning the enhancement of the benefits of the
Page 359 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Kentucky Education Reform Act and the expansion and improvement of
services to students.
(c) The board shall establish an organizational capacity to:
1. Develop and manage implementation of a research design to include the
issuing of requests for proposals; awarding of contracts; and general
oversight and coordination of the quality and quantity of research;
2. Conduct research in accordance with a comprehensive research design
and establish priorities; and
3. Design and implement a comprehensive educational data information
system.
(d) The board shall prepare an annual report of its activities and the activities of
the corporation and forward copies to the Governor, the Legislative Research
Commission, the Kentucky Board of Education, and the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] and
make copies available to the citizens of the Commonwealth.
(e) The board shall hire an executive officer and other necessary personnel to
carry out its responsibilities.
(f) The board shall consist of ten (10) members who shall initially be appointed
to two (2) year terms by the Governor. The board shall select from its
membership a chairperson and establish bylaws, including bylaws governing
board membership and length of terms. Upon expiration of the initial
appointments and adoption of bylaws governing membership and length of
terms by the board, the board shall be self-perpetuating, and the appointment
and length of terms shall be made in accordance with the board's bylaws.
Vacancies which occur before the expiration of the initial appointments shall
be filled by the Governor for the remaining term of the vacancy.
Section 159. KRS 158.648 is amended to read as follows:
Page 360 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(1) The State Advisory Council for Gifted and Talented Education is hereby created
and attached to the Kentucky Department of Education. The council's purpose is to
make recommendations regarding the provisions of services for gifted and talented
students in Kentucky's education system.
(a) The council shall be composed of nineteen (19) voting members who shall be
appointed by the Governor and three (3) nonvoting, ex officio members. The
members shall be appointed representing various constituencies as follows:
1. Four (4) members shall be teachers within local school districts
representing elementary, middle, and high school levels with at least one
(1) full-time teacher of gifted and talented students and one (1) full-time
teacher who teaches in a regular classroom;
2. Four (4) members shall be parents of students in local school districts,
including two (2) parents of students identified as gifted and talented
and at least one (1) who serves or has served on a school council;
3. Three (3) members shall be from postsecondary education institutions,
including one (1) from an independent college or university;
4. One (1) member shall be a superintendent of a local school district;
5. Two (2) members shall be principals, including one (1) from an
elementary or middle school and one (1) from a high school;
6. Two (2) members shall be coordinators of gifted and talented programs
and services in local school districts;
7. One (1) member shall be a local board of education member;
8. One (1) member shall represent the visual and performing arts; and
9. One (1) member shall be appointed from the private business sector.
(b) The three (3) nonvoting ex officio members shall be: the state consultant for
gifted and talented education in the Kentucky Department of Education, a
staff person designated by the executive secretary of the Education
Page 361 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Professional Standards Board, and a staff person designated by the executive
director[president] of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education]. Vacancies shall be filled by
the Governor as they occur in a manner consistent with the provisions for
initial appointment.
(c) Each board member shall serve a three (3) year term or until a successor is
appointed, except that for initial appointments to the board, three (3) of the
members shall be appointed to serve a one (1) year term, eight (8) of the
members shall be appointed to serve a two (2) year term, and eight (8) of the
members shall be appointed to serve a three (3) year term. A member may be
reappointed but may not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.
(2) The council shall advise the commissioner of education, the Kentucky Board of
Education, and the Education Professional Standards Board concerning the
development of administrative regulations and education policy regarding gifted
and talented students. The commissioner of education and the executive secretary
for the Education Professional Standards Board shall submit proposed
administrative regulations and educational policies relating to gifted and talented
education and other administrative regulations that impact gifted and talented
students for review by the advisory council prior to seeking approval of the
appropriate board.
(3) As the advisory council considers issues relating to gifted and talented students, it
shall seek dialogue with other agencies and organizations, including the Parent
Teachers Association, the Governor's Scholars Program, the Governor's School for
the Arts, the Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program, the Kentucky
Association of School Councils, the Kentucky Association for Gifted Education, the
Kentucky School Boards Association, the Kentucky Association of School
Administrators, and the Kentucky Council for Exceptional Children.
Page 362 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(4) The advisory council shall annually elect a chair from its membership, establish
meeting operational procedures, and meet at least two (2) times annually.
(5) The Department of Education shall provide staff and administrative support and
shall administer the funds appropriated to support the expenses of the council.
(6) The members of the advisory council shall serve without compensation but shall be
reimbursed for necessary expenses in the same manner as state employees.
Section 160. KRS 158.6485 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program is established as a statewide
summer experiential education program for creative and enterprising students to
enhance the next generation of business and economic leaders and enrich future
economic development across the Commonwealth. The Governor's School for
Entrepreneurs Program shall be attached to the Office of the Secretary in the
Education and Labor Cabinet for administrative purposes.
(2) As used in this section, "entrepreneurship education organization" means a not-for-
profit organization that has:
(a) Received tax-exempt status from the United States Internal Revenue Service;
(b) Registered with the Office of the Kentucky Secretary of State;
(c) A statewide mission to generate interest and knowledge in entrepreneurship;
and
(d) A history of operating education programs focused on entrepreneurship.
(3) (a) The Governor or the Governor's designee from the executive cabinet, the
commissioner of education, the executive director[president] of the Kentucky
Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education], and the secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet shall serve
as ex officio members of an advisory board to the Governor's School for
Entrepreneurs Program. In addition, the Governor shall appoint five (5)
members to the advisory board as provided in paragraph (b) of this
Page 363 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
subsection.
(b) By July 31, 2016, the Governor shall appoint five (5) initial members of the
advisory board to serve as follows:
1. One (1) shall be appointed to serve a three (3) year term;
2. Two (2) shall be appointed to serve a (2) year term; and
3. Two (2) shall be appointed to serve a (1) year term.
Members appointed by the Governor may be reappointed by the Governor to serve
successive terms. In making gubernatorial appointments, the Governor shall
consider recommendations and information on business and entrepreneurial
experience provided by a nominating committee of the board and shall attempt to
promote geographic balance on the board. The Governor shall make appointments
to fill gubernatorial vacancies as they occur. Each appointment after the initial
appointment shall be for a three (3) year term unless the appointment is to fill the
unexpired portion of a term.
(4) The Education and Labor Cabinet shall contract with an entrepreneurship education
organization to administer and operate the statewide Governor's School for
Entrepreneurs Program created in this section. The Education and Labor Cabinet
shall approve the contract application criteria, the process for submission of a
contract application, and the structure and type of evaluation criteria used in the
contract application review process.
(5) The annual appropriation for the statewide Governor's School for Entrepreneurs
Program from the general fund shall be transmitted to an entrepreneurship
education organization on July 1 of each year to facilitate the operation of the
summer program. Funds shall be used only for the purposes of the statewide
Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program and, notwithstanding KRS 45.229,
shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year.
(6) (a) The entrepreneurship education organization shall follow standard accounting
Page 364 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
practices and shall submit the following financial reports to the Office of the
Secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet, the Finance and
Administration Cabinet, and the Legislative Research Commission:
1. Quarterly reports of expenditures of state funds for the Governor's
School for Entrepreneurs Program, submitted on or before the thirtieth
day after the end of each quarter in the organization's fiscal year;
2. Annual reports of receipts and expenditures for the Governor's School
for Entrepreneurs Program, submitted on or before the sixtieth day after
the end of the fiscal year of the organization; and
3. The report of an annual financial compilation or review conducted by an
independent accounting firm, submitted on or before September 1 of
each year.
(b) On or before March 1 of each year, the entrepreneurship education
organization shall file a report detailing the operations of the Governor's
School for Entrepreneurs Program for the preceding year with the Office of
the Secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet, the Finance and
Administration Cabinet, and the Legislative Research Commission. The report
shall include information concerning the program, student and faculty
demographics, and program outcomes according to such measures of success
as the advisory board to the statewide Governor's School for Entrepreneurs
Program, in collaboration with the entrepreneurship education organization,
may develop.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prevent the entrepreneurship education
organization from soliciting program support, cooperation, and funds from
private businesses, foundations, industries, and government agencies with an
interest in technological innovations, economic development, and
entrepreneurial education. Funds may be solicited, accepted, received, and
Page 365 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
expended from public and private sources for the purpose of implementing
this section.
(7) The entrepreneurship education organization may perform other programs and
initiatives pertaining to its mission so long as all funds appropriated for the
statewide Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program are restricted solely for the
design, development, and operation of the statewide Governor's School for
Entrepreneurs Program.
Section 161. KRS 158.796 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Governor's Scholars Program is established to implement an enrichment
program for academically gifted students to enhance the next generation of civic
and economic leaders and create models of educational excellence. Governor's
Scholars Program, Inc. is authorized to operate the Governor's Scholars Program.
The Governor's Scholars Program shall be attached to the Office of the Secretary in
the Education and Labor Cabinet for administrative purposes.
(2) (a) The Governor or the Governor's designee from the executive cabinet, the
commissioner of education, and the executive director[president] of the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education] shall serve as ex officio voting members of the board of directors
of Governor's Scholars Program, Inc. In addition, the Governor shall appoint
five (5) members of the board as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
Other board members of Governor's Scholars Program, Inc. shall be selected
in the manner set forth in the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the
corporation.
(b) After June 20, 2005, the Governor shall appoint board members as follows:
1. In 2005, the Governor shall appoint two (2) board members to serve
three (3) year terms;
2. In 2006, the Governor shall appoint two (2) members to serve three (3)
Page 366 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
year terms; and
3. In 2007, the Governor shall appoint one (1) member to serve a three (3)
year term.
Members appointed by the Governor may be reappointed by the Governor to
serve successive terms. In making gubernatorial appointments, the Governor
shall consider recommendations and information provided by the nominating
committee of the board and shall attempt to promote geographic balance on
the board. One (1) of the gubernatorial appointees shall be designated by the
board to serve on the committee that functions as the executive committee of
Governor's Scholars Program, Inc. The Governor shall make appointments to
fill gubernatorial vacancies as they occur. Each appointment after the initial
appointment shall be for a three (3) year term unless the appointment is to fill
the unexpired portion of a term.
(c) The board of directors shall have the authority to hire, fire, and manage all
program personnel, including the executive director.
(3) The annual appropriation for the Governor's Scholars Program from the general
fund shall be transmitted to Governor's Scholars Program, Inc. on July 1 of each
year to facilitate the operation of the summer program. Funds shall be used only for
the purposes of the Governor's Scholars Program and shall not lapse at the end of
the fiscal year.
(4) (a) Governor's Scholars Program, Inc. shall follow standard accounting practices
and shall submit the following financial reports to the Office of the Governor,
the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and the Legislative Research
Commission:
1. Quarterly reports of expenditures of state funds, submitted on or before
the thirtieth day after the end of each quarter in the corporation's fiscal
year;
Page 367 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
2. Annual reports of receipts and expenditures for the Governor's Scholars
Program, submitted on or before the sixtieth day after the end of the
fiscal year of the corporation; and
3. The report of an annual financial audit conducted by an independent
auditor, submitted on or before September 1 of each year.
(b) On or before March 1 of each year, Governor's Scholars Program, Inc. shall
file with the Office of the Governor, the Finance and Administration Cabinet,
and the Legislative Research Commission a report detailing the operations of
the Governor's Scholars Program for the preceding year. The report shall
include information concerning the summer program, student and faculty
demographics, and program outcomes according to such measures of success
as the board may adopt.
Section 162. KRS 158.799 is amended to read as follows:
The Kentucky Science and Technology Council, Inc., shall, in cooperation with the
Department of Education and the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], develop and conduct a competition
among Kentucky middle and high school students for the purpose of choosing a
Kentuckian of national or international acclaim as a scientist, mathematician, or engineer
for whom the programs developed under KRS 158.798 shall be named.
Section 163. KRS 158.803 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Early Mathematics Testing Program is created to lower the number
of high school graduates in Kentucky who require remediation in mathematics upon
enrollment in postsecondary education institutions, by providing information to
primarily high school sophomores and juniors statewide regarding their level of
mathematics knowledge in relation to standards required for community and
technical colleges and university level mathematics courses early enough for
students to address deficiencies while still in high school.
Page 368 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(2) The testing program shall be a computer website-based program that incorporates a
variety of diagnostic mathematics tests to identify knowledge and skills needed for
postsecondary education courses.
(3) The testing program shall be developed and conducted by a public university. The
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education], with the advice of the Department of Education, shall develop a process
to solicit, review, and select a proposal for the development and implementation of
the computer website-based testing program. The authority[council] shall approve
the location of the program at a public university no later than September 1, 2000.
The university shall be the fiscal agent for the testing program and shall receive the
funds appropriated by the General Assembly.
(4) The program shall be available to all interested Kentucky public and private high
school students in grades ten (10) and eleven (11). Student participation in the
program shall be voluntary, and program test scores shall not be:
(a) Placed on a student's high school transcript; or
(b) Used by postsecondary education institutions in the admissions process.
(5) The computer website testing program shall be available to all Kentuckians for
evaluation of an individual's mathematics knowledge and skills.
(6) The program shall encourage the active participation of all public and private high
schools in Kentucky.
(7) The computer website testing program shall:
(a) Develop or adopt appropriate tests to determine the level of mathematics
knowledge of high school students in relation to the standards of placement
tests given at the community and technical colleges and undergraduate public
universities. In the development or adoption of the tests, consideration shall
be given to the program of studies and the minimum requirements for high
school graduation established in KRS 156.160 and the alignment of these
Page 369 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
standards with postsecondary course standards;
(b) Develop a structure to permit each participating student the opportunity to
take the computer-based test at school in the presence of school personnel or
at the student's home in the presence of his or her parents or guardian;
(c) Score the completed tests and provide the test scores and diagnostic
information on a student's knowledge and skills electronically to the student
and the high school upon completion of the test in the form of electronic mail
or printable files or screens.
(d) Provide the following information for up to three (3) participating
postsecondary education institutions specified by the student as a possible
college choice:
1. The student's test score;
2. A list of mathematics courses required for the student's intended major
at a postsecondary education institution;
3. A list of any remedial courses the student might be required to take
based on the student's current level of mathematics knowledge as
demonstrated on the test;
4. The estimated cost of the remedial courses the student might be required
to take; and
5. The high school courses and the specific mathematical concepts or
functions a student should consider studying in order to address any
deficiencies;
(e) Encourage the chair of the mathematics department or the academic dean at
each of the participating postsecondary education institutions specified by the
student as a possible college choice to send a personalized letter to the student
that:
1. Encourages the student to take additional high school mathematics
Page 370 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
courses to address deficiencies in mathematics knowledge; or
2. Congratulates the student who does well on the test for his or her
achievement and encourages continued study in mathematics; and
(f) Develop and implement a strategy to raise awareness and encourage
participation in the program, targeting high school students, parents, high
school faculty and administrators, mathematics departments or faculty at
postsecondary education institutions, and the general public.
(8) The Kentucky Department of Education shall provide assistance as necessary to the
Kentucky Early Mathematics Testing Program to implement the provisions of this
section and KRS 158.801.
(9) The public university that conducts the testing program shall submit an annual
report to the Kentucky Board of Education and the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] regarding its activities,
and the effects of the program on levels of remediation required by participating
students.
Section 164. KRS 158.807 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the Kentucky data research initiative, a partnership between
elementary and secondary schools and postsecondary education research
institutions to maximize research capabilities through computer resources. The
initiative shall be jointly facilitated by the Kentucky Department of Education and
the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education].
(2) The purposes of the data research initiative are to expand the availability of
computing resources not available at the research institutions at a relatively low
cost, to do education outreach to students and teachers in Kentucky's K-12 system,
to expand the research institutions' presence throughout the state, and to maximize
the use of computer assets that have already been purchased in K-12 systems but
Page 371 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
are often underused.
(3) By December 1, 2005, the commissioner of the Department of Education and the
executive director[president] of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] shall convene appropriate
postsecondary education and elementary and secondary educators and
administrators to determine how this initiative might be developed, funded, and
utilized to enhance research capabilities in the sciences and health-related fields or
other appropriate fields of research.
Section 165. KRS 158.840 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly hereby finds that reading and mathematics proficiency are
gateway skills necessary for all Kentucky students to achieve the academic goals
established in KRS 158.6451. It is the General Assembly's intent that:
(a) All students in kindergarten through grade three (3) having difficulty in
reading and mathematics receive early diagnosis and intervention services
from highly trained teachers;
(b) All students in kindergarten through grade three (3) needing to make
accelerated progress toward proficiency in mathematics based on data from
valid and reliable universal screening and diagnostic assessments receive
high-quality, evidence-based mathematics instruction and intervention aligned
to the Kentucky academic standards for mathematics;
(c) All students demonstrate proficiency in reading and mathematics as they
progress through the relevant curricula and complete each assessment level
required by the Kentucky Board of Education for the state assessment
program established under KRS 158.6453 and in compliance with the
requirements of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No.
114-95, or its successor; and
(d) Students who are struggling in reading and mathematics or are not at the
Page 372 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
proficient level on statewide assessments shall be provided evidence-based
and developmentally appropriate diagnostic and intervention services, and
instructional modifications necessary to learn.
The General Assembly, the Kentucky Board of Education, the Kentucky
Department of Education, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education], colleges and universities, local
boards of education, school administrators, school councils, teachers, parents and
families, and other educational entities, such as the Education Professional
Standards Board, P-16 councils, the statewide reading research center established
under KRS 164.0207, and the Center for Middle School Academic Achievement
must collaborate if the intentions specified in this subsection are to be met.
Intensive focus on student achievement in reading and mathematics does not negate
the responsibility of any entity to help students obtain proficiency in other core
curriculum content areas.
(2) The General Assembly's role is to set policies that address the achievement levels of
all students and provide resources for the professional growth of teachers and
administrators, assessing students' academic achievement, including valid and
reliable universal screening and diagnostic assessment and instructional
interventions, technology innovations, targeted reading and mathematics statewide
initiatives, research and the distribution of research findings, services for students
beyond the regular school day, and other services needed to help struggling
learners.
(3) The Kentucky Board of Education shall regularly review and modify, when
appropriate, its statewide assessment policies and practices to enable local school
districts and schools to carry out the provisions of the statewide assessment and
accountability system, required under KRS 158.6453 to improve student
achievement in mathematics and reading.
Page 373 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(4) The Kentucky Department of Education shall:
(a) Provide assistance to schools and teachers, including publicizing professional
development opportunities, methods of measuring effective professional
development, the availability of high quality instructional materials, and
developmentally appropriate, valid, and reliable screening and diagnostic
assessments of student competency in mathematics and reading. The
department shall provide access to samples of units of study, annotated
student work, diagnostic instruments, and research findings, and give
guidance on parental engagement;
(b) Work with state and national educators and subject-matter experts to identify
student reading and mathematical skills in each subject area that align with the
state content standards adopted under KRS 158.6453 and identify teaching
strategies in each subject area that can be used explicitly to develop the
identified reading and mathematical skills under this paragraph;
(c) Encourage the development of comprehensive middle and high school
adolescent reading and mathematics plans to be incorporated into the curricula
of each subject area to improve the reading comprehension and mathematical
skills of all students;
(d) Conduct an annual review of the state grant programs it manages and make
recommendations, when needed, to the Interim Joint Committee on Education
for changes to statutory requirements that are necessary to gain a greater
return on investment;
(e) Provide administrative support and oversight to programs to train classroom
coaches and mentors to help teachers with reading and mathematics
instruction; and
(f) Require no reporting of instructional plans, formative assessment results, staff
effectiveness processes, or interventions implemented in the classroom,
Page 374 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
except for:
1. Interventions implemented under KRS 158.305(2) and 158.8402;
2. Funds provided under KRS 158.792 or 158.844; or
3. Schools that are identified for comprehensive support and improvement
and fail to exit comprehensive support and improvement status after
three (3) consecutive years of implementing the turnaround intervention
process as described in KRS 160.346.
(5) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education], in cooperation with the Education Professional Standards Board, shall
exercise its duties and functions under KRS 164.020 to ensure that teacher
education programs are fulfilling the needs of Kentucky for highly skilled teachers.
The authority[council] shall:
(a) Coordinate the federal and state grant programs it administers with other
statewide initiatives relating to improving student achievement in reading and
mathematics to avoid duplication of effort and to make efficient use of
resources;
(b) No later than November 1 of each year, submit an annual report to the
Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee
on Education and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue, summarizing the compliance of each teacher preparation program
for alignment to early childhood education or elementary regular education
standards and to the instructional requirements set forth in KRS 164.306(1)
and 164.3061; and
(c) Require that an external evaluator provide an annual analysis of the ability of
teacher preparation programs to properly train and equip teacher preparation
program students with the literacy and mathematics content knowledge and
skills to educate students in kindergarten through grade three (3).
Page 375 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(6) The Education Professional Standards Board shall exercise its duties and
responsibilities under KRS 161.030 and 161.048 to ensure highly qualified
teachers.
(7) Colleges and universities shall:
(a) Utilize institution-wide resources to work with elementary and secondary
educators and other entities to align curriculum content to ensure that students
who achieve proficiency on standards established at the prekindergarten
through secondary levels will require no remediation to successfully enter a
postsecondary education program;
(b) Provide quality undergraduate teacher preparation programs to ensure that
those preparing to teach reading or mathematics at all grade levels have the
necessary content knowledge, assessment and diagnostic skills, and teaching
methodologies and that teachers in all subject areas have the requisite skills
for helping students at all grade levels develop critical strategies and skills for
reading and comprehending subject matter;
(c) Deliver evidence-based continuing education for teachers in reading and
mathematics through institutes, graduate level courses, and other professional
development activities that support a statewide agenda for improving student
achievement in reading and mathematics;
(d) Conduct or assist with research on best practices in assessment, intervention
strategies, teaching methodologies, costs and effectiveness of instructional
models, and other factors as appropriate to reading and mathematics;
(e) Provide staff to consult and provide technical assistance to teachers, staff, and
administrators at elementary, middle, and secondary school sites;
(f) Assume active roles in the statewide initiatives referenced in KRS 156.553
and 158.842; and
(g) Develop written procedures for measuring the effectiveness of activities
Page 376 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
outlined in paragraphs (a) to (f) of this subsection.
(8) School councils at all school levels are encouraged to identify and allocate
resources to qualified teachers to become coaches or mentors in mathematics or
coaches or mentors in reading with a focus on improving student achievement in
their respective schools.
(9) Local school boards and superintendents shall provide local resources to
supplement or match state and federal resources to support teachers, school
administrators, and school councils in helping students achieve proficiency in
reading and mathematics.
(10) Local school superintendents shall provide leadership and resources to the
principals of all schools to facilitate curriculum alignment, communications, and
technical support among schools to ensure that students are academically prepared
to move to the next level of schooling.
Section 166. KRS 158.842 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Committee for Mathematics Achievement is hereby created for the purposes of
developing a multifaceted strategic plan to improve student achievement in
mathematics at all levels of schooling, prekindergarten through postsecondary and
adult. At a minimum the plan shall address:
(a) Evidence-based curriculum that is aligned prekindergarten through
postsecondary, including consensus among high school teachers and
postsecondary education faculty about expectations, curriculum, and
assessment;
(b) Attitudes and beliefs of teachers about mathematics;
(c) Teachers' knowledge of mathematics;
(d) Diagnostic assessment, intervention services, universal screeners, and
instructional strategies;
(e) Shortages of teachers of mathematics, including incentives to attract strong
Page 377 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
candidates to mathematics teaching;
(f) Statewide institutes that prepare cadres of mathematics leaders in local school
districts, which may include highly skilled retired mathematics teachers, to
serve as coaches and mentors in districts and schools;
(g) Cohesive continuing education options for experienced mathematics
classroom teachers;
(h) Closing the student achievement gap among various student subpopulations;
(i) Curriculum expectations and assessments of students among the various
school levels, prekindergarten, primary, elementary, middle, and high school;
(j) Curriculum expectations and assessments for adult education centers;
(k) Introductory postsecondary education mathematics courses that are
appropriate to the wide array of academic programs and majors;
(l) Research to analyze further the issues of transition from high school or High
School Equivalency Diploma programs to postsecondary education
mathematics; and
(m) The early mathematics testing program under KRS 158.803.
Other factors may be included in the strategic plan as deemed appropriate by the
committee to improve mathematics achievement of Kentucky students.
(2) The committee shall be composed of twenty-three (23) members as follows:
(a) The commissioner of education or his or her designee;
(b) The executive director[president] of the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] or his or her
designee;
(c) The president of the Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and
Universities or his or her designee;
(d) The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet or his or her designee;
(e) Four (4) representatives with a specialty in mathematics or mathematics
Page 378 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
education who have expertise and experience in professional development,
especially with coaching and mentoring of teachers, from any of the public
postsecondary education institutions defined in KRS 164.001. The
representatives shall be selected by mutual agreement of the executive
director[president] of the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] and the commissioner of
education;
(f) One (1) adult education mathematics instructor selected by the secretary of
the Education and Labor Cabinet;
(g) Two (2) elementary, two (2) middle, and two (2) high school mathematics
teachers, appointed by the commissioner of education;
(h) Three (3) school administrators or building-level mathematics instructional
coaches, with one (1) each representing elementary, middle, and high school,
appointed by the commissioner of education;
(i) Two (2) district administrators or district-level mathematics instructional
coaches appointed by the commissioner of education;
(j) The executive director of the Center for Mathematics created under KRS
164.525 or his or her designee;
(k) The executive director of AdvanceKentucky or his or her designee; and
(l) The executive director of the Partnership Institute for Math and Science
Education Reform or his or her designee.
(3) A majority of the membership present shall constitute a quorum.
(4) Each member of the committee, other than members who serve by virtue of their
positions, shall serve for a term of three (3) years or until a successor is appointed
and qualified.
(5) A chair of the committee shall be elected each calendar year. An individual may not
serve as chair for more than three (3) consecutive years. The chair shall be the
Page 379 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
presiding officer of the committee, and coordinate the functions and activities of the
committee.
(6) The committee shall be attached to the Kentucky Department of Education for
administrative purposes. The commissioner of education shall contract with a
mathematics-trained professional to provide part-time staff support to the
committee. The commissioner of education and the executive director[president] of
the authority[council] shall reach consensus in the selection of a person to fill the
position. The person selected shall have a graduate degree, a mathematics or
mathematics education major, and teaching or administrative experience in
elementary and secondary education. The person shall not be a current employee of
any entity represented on the committee. The department shall provide office space
and other resources necessary to support the staff position and the work of the
committee.
(7) The committee, under the leadership of the chair, may organize itself into
appropriate subcommittees and work structures to accomplish the purposes of the
committee.
(8) Members of the committee shall serve without compensation but shall be
reimbursed for necessary travel and expenses while attending meetings at the same
per diem rate promulgated in administrative regulation for state employees under
provisions of KRS Chapter 45. Funds shall be provided school districts to cover the
cost of substitute teachers for those teachers on the committee at each district's
established rate for substitute teachers.
(9) If a vacancy occurs within the committee during its duration, the vacancy shall be
filled in the same manner as set forth in the original appointment.
(10) The committee shall provide a final written report of committee activities and
progress regarding the strategic plan required under subsection (1) of this section to
the Interim Joint Committee on Education and the Legislative Research
Page 380 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Commission by May 1, 2025.
(11) The committee shall have ongoing responsibility for providing advice and guidance
to policymakers in the development of statewide policies and in the identification
and allocation of resources to improve mathematics achievement. In carrying out
this responsibility, the committee shall periodically review the strategic plan and
make modifications as deemed appropriate and report those to the Interim Joint
Committee on Education.
(12) The committee shall collaborate with the Center for Mathematics to ensure that
there is ongoing identification of research and evidence-based intervention
programs for K-12 students who have fallen behind in mathematics, rigorous
mathematics curricula that prepare students for the next level of schooling, research
and evidence-based professional development models that prepare teachers in
mathematics and pedagogy, and strategies for closing the gap between high school
or a High School Equivalency Diploma program and postsecondary mathematics
preparation.
Section 167. KRS 158.844 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The mathematics achievement fund is hereby created to provide developmentally
appropriate diagnostic assessment and intervention services to students, primary
through grade 12, to help them reach proficiency in mathematics on the state
assessments under KRS 158.6453 and in compliance with the "No Child Left
Behind Act of 2001," 20 U.S.C. secs. 6301 et seq., as required under KRS 158.840.
(2) The grant funds may be used to support the implementation of diagnostic and
intervention services in mathematics. The use of funds may include: pay for
extended time for teachers, released time for teachers to serve as coaches and
mentors or to carry out other responsibilities needed in the implementation of
intervention services, payment of substitute teachers needed for the support of
mathematics teachers, purchase of materials needed for modification of instruction,
Page 381 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
and other costs associated with diagnostic and intervention services or to cover
other costs deemed appropriate by the Kentucky Board of Education.
(3) The fund shall:
(a) Provide funding for the Center for Mathematics created in KRS 164.525 and
the costs of training selected teachers in the diagnostic assessment and
intervention skills that are needed to assist struggling students in the primary
program and other grade levels;
(b) Provide renewable, two (2) year local grants to school districts and for
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section; and
(c) Provide operational funding for the Committee for Mathematics Achievement
created in KRS 158.842.
(4) Any funds appropriated to the mathematics achievement fund that are specifically
designated by the General Assembly to support the Center for Mathematics shall be
appropriated to the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] and distributed to the university administering the center,
as determined by the authority[council] under KRS 164.525.
(5) Any moneys in the fund at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be
carried forward to be used for the purposes specified in this section.
(6) Any interest earnings of the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not
lapse.
(7) (a) Any funds appropriated to the mathematics achievement fund and specifically
designated by the General Assembly as funding for grants to local school
districts or to support the Committee for Mathematics Achievement shall be
administered by the Kentucky Department of Education.
(b) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations
relating to the grants for local school districts based on recommendations
from the Committee for Mathematics Achievement, the secretary of the
Page 382 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Education and Labor Cabinet, the commissioner of education, and the Center
for Mathematics established in KRS 164.525. The administrative regulations
shall:
1. Identify eligibility criteria for grant applicants;
2. Specify the criteria for acceptable diagnostic assessments and
intervention programs and coaching and mentoring programs;
3. Establish the minimum annual evaluation process for each grant
recipient;
4. Identify the annual data that must be provided from each grant recipient;
5. Define the application and approval process;
6. Establish matching fund requirements if deemed necessary by the board;
7. Define the obligations for professional development and continuing
education for teachers, administrators, and staff of each grant recipient;
8. Establish the conditions for renewal of a two (2) year grant; and
9. Specify other conditions necessary to implement the purposes of this
section.
(c) As part of the application process, the board shall require that a grant
applicant provide assurances that the following principles will be met if the
applicant's request for funding is approved:
1. Mathematics instruction will be standards-based and utilize research-
based practices;
2. Intervention and support services will supplement, not replace, regular
classroom instruction; and
3. Intervention services will be provided to primary program students and
other students who are at risk of mathematics failure within the school
based upon ongoing assessments of their needs.
(d) If matching funds are required, the school council or, if none exists, the
Page 383 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
principal or the superintendent of schools, shall allocate matching funds.
Funding for professional development allocated to the school council under
KRS 160.345 and for continuing education under KRS 158.070 may be used
to provide a portion or all of a school's required match.
(e) The Department of Education shall make available to schools:
1. Information from the Center for Mathematics regarding diagnostic
assessment and intervention programs and coaching and mentoring
programs of proven-practice in meeting the needs of primary students
and other students who are at risk of failure;
2. Technical assistance to potential applicants and grant recipients;
3. A list of professional development providers offering teacher training in
diagnostic assessment and intervention strategies and coaching and
mentoring; and
4. Information from the Center for Mathematics on how to communicate to
parents effective ways of interacting with their children to improve their
mathematics concepts, skills, and understanding.
(f) The Department of Education shall submit a report to the Interim Joint
Committee on Education no later than September 1 of each year outlining the
use of grant funds. By November 1, 2007, the Department of Education with
input from the Committee for Mathematics Achievement and the Center for
Mathematics shall conduct a statewide needs assessment of the resources
needed in each school to help each child achieve proficiency in mathematics
by the year 2014 and report to the Interim Joint Committee on Education an
estimate of the cost and a specific timeline for meeting the goal established by
the Commonwealth.
Section 168. KRS 160.348 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The Kentucky Department of Education shall make available to middle and
Page 384 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
high schools information concerning the prerequisite content necessary for
success in secondary courses, Advanced Placement or AP courses, and
International Baccalaureate or IB courses. The department shall provide
sample syllabi, instructional resources, and instructional supports for teachers
that will assist in preparing students for more rigorous coursework.
Instructional supports shall include professional development for assisting
students enrolled in the Kentucky Virtual High School or other virtual
learning settings.
(b) Each secondary school-based decision making council shall offer a core
curriculum of AP, IB, dual enrollment, or dual credit courses, using either or
both on-site instruction or electronic instruction through the Kentucky Virtual
High School or other on-line alternatives. In addition, each school-based
decision making council shall comply with any additional requirements for
AP, IB, dual enrollment, and dual credit courses that may be established
cooperatively by the Kentucky Department of Education, the Education
Professional Standards Board, and the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] in accordance
with the definitions in KRS 158.007.
(2) Each secondary school-based decision making council shall establish a policy on
the recruitment and assignment of students to AP, IB, dual enrollment, and dual
credit courses that recognizes that all students have the right to participate in a
rigorous and academically challenging curriculum. All students who are willing to
accept the challenge of a rigorous academic curriculum shall be admitted to AP
courses, including AP courses offered through the Kentucky Virtual High School
and accepted for credit toward graduation under KRS 158.622(3)(a), IB courses,
dual enrollment courses, and dual credit courses, if they have successfully
completed the prerequisite coursework or have otherwise demonstrated mastery of
Page 385 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
the prerequisite content knowledge and skills as determined by measurable
standards. If a school does not offer an AP course in a particular subject area, the
school shall permit a qualified student to enroll in the AP course offered by the
Kentucky Virtual High School and receive credit toward graduation under KRS
158.622(3)(a).
(3) Effective with the 2008-2009 school year and thereafter, students enrolled in AP or
IB courses in the public schools shall have the cost of the examinations paid by the
Kentucky Department of Education.
Section 169. KRS 160.730 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Parents or eligible students may challenge the content of a student record to ensure
that the record or report is not inaccurate, misleading, or otherwise in violation of
privacy or other rights of the student. The right to challenge shall also provide the
opportunity for rebuttal to, and the correction, deletion, or expunction of, any
inaccurate, misleading, or inappropriate information.
(2) A challenge to the record may take the form of an informal discussion among the
parents, student, and school officials. Any agreement between these parties shall be
reduced in writing, signed by all parties, and placed in the student's records. If no
agreement can be reached, either party may request a formal hearing to the
challenge which shall be conducted in accordance with procedures established by
rules and regulations of the Department of Education and the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] for
educational institutions under their jurisdiction. The rules and regulations shall
provide that a formal hearing be conducted within a reasonable time after the
request for a hearing; and an official of the educational institution who has no direct
interest in the outcome of the challenge shall conduct the hearing and render a
decision on the challenge within a reasonable time after the hearing. All parties to
the challenge shall be afforded a full and fair opportunity to present evidence
Page 386 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
relevant to the issues raised. Furthermore, school officials shall take the necessary
action to implement the decision.
Section 170. KRS 161.027 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Education Professional Standards Board, pursuant to KRS 161.028, shall by
administrative regulation establish requirements for a preparation program in
institutions of higher education for all new applicants for principal certification and
establish criteria for admission to the program.
(2) The Education Professional Standards Board and the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] shall evaluate the
preparation programs for principals and maintain only those institutional programs
that can demonstrate both the quality and the capability to enroll adequate numbers
of students to justify the resources necessary for maintenance of a quality program.
(3) The Education Professional Standards Board shall develop or select appropriate
assessments for applicants seeking certification as principals, including an
assessment of the ability to apply knowledge, instructional leadership, management,
and supervision skills.
(4) The Education Professional Standards Board shall establish the minimum score for
successful completion of assessments and shall establish a reasonable fee to be
charged applicants for the actual cost of administration of the assessments. The
Education Professional Standards Board shall provide for confidentiality of
assessment scores.
(5) The Education Professional Standards Board shall develop an internship program
which shall provide for the supervision, assistance, and assessment of beginning
principals and assistant principals. The internship shall not be required of applicants
who have completed, within a ten (10) year period prior to making application, at
least two (2) years of successful experience as a principal in a school situation. The
Education Professional Standards Board, by administrative regulation, shall
Page 387 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
establish the internship program.
(6) The certification of principals shall require the successful completion of the
examinations required by subsection (3) of this section. A one (1) year certificate
may be given to a person who has:
(a) A comparable certificate from another state; or
(b) All other qualifications except the assessments and is selected as a principal or
assistant principal in a district where the superintendent certifies to the
Education Professional Standards Board that there is a limited number of
applicants to meet the requirements.
Upon successful completion of the assessments, a certificate shall be issued for an
additional four (4) years. A person employed in Kentucky as a principal or assistant
principal who was certified in another state and practiced in that state for two (2) or
more years is exempt from taking the assessment described in subsection (3)(a) of
this section.
(7) Upon successful completion of the approved preparation program and the
assessments, the Education Professional Standards Board shall issue to the
applicant a statement of eligibility for internship valid for five (5) years. If the
applicant does not participate in an internship program within the five (5) year
period, the applicant shall reestablish eligibility by repeating and passing the
assessments in effect at that time or by completing a minimum of six (6) graduate
hours, directly related to instructional leadership, management, or supervision, at a
regionally or nationally accredited institution. The option for renewal through
completion of graduate hours shall be available only for the first reestablishment of
eligibility. Upon obtaining employment for an internship position as principal or
assistant principal within the period of eligibility, the applicant shall be issued the
appropriate one (1) year certificate for the position.
(8) All applicants for principal certification, after successfully completing the
Page 388 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
assessments, shall successfully complete the internship program described in
subsection (5) of this section for principal certification. If the principal's or assistant
principal's internship performance is judged to be less than satisfactory pursuant to
administrative regulations developed by the Education Professional Standards
Board, the applicant for principal certification shall be provided with an opportunity
to repeat the internship one (1) time if the applicant is employed by a school district
as a principal or assistant principal.
(9) Following successful completion of the internship program, the principal certificate
shall be extended for four (4) years. Renewal of the certificate shall require the
completion of a continuing education requirement as prescribed by the Education
Professional Standards Board.
Section 171. KRS 161.028 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Education Professional Standards Board is recognized to be a public body
corporate and politic and an agency and instrumentality of the Commonwealth, in
the performance of essential governmental functions. The Education Professional
Standards Board has the authority and responsibility to:
(a) Establish standards and requirements for obtaining and maintaining a teaching
certificate;
(b) Set standards for, approve, and evaluate college, university, and school district
programs for the preparation of teachers and other professional school
personnel. College or university programs may be approved by the board for a
college or university with regional institutional level accreditation or national
institutional level accreditation that is recognized by the United States
Department of Education and is eligible to receive federal funding under 20
U.S.C. secs. 1061 to 1063. Program standards shall reflect national standards
and shall address, at a minimum, the following:
1. The alignment of programs with the state's core content for assessment
Page 389 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
as defined in KRS 158.6457;
2. Research-based classroom practices, including effective classroom
management techniques;
3. Emphasis on subject matter competency of teacher education students;
4. Methodologies to meet diverse educational needs of all students;
5. The consistency and quality of classroom and field experiences,
including early practicums and student teaching experiences;
6. The amount of college-wide or university-wide involvement and support
during the preparation as well as the induction of new teachers;
7. The diversity of faculty;
8. The effectiveness of partnerships with local school districts; and
9. The performance of graduates on various measures as determined by the
board;
(c) Conduct an annual review of diversity in teacher preparation programs;
(d) Provide assistance to universities and colleges in addressing diversity, which
may include researching successful strategies and disseminating the
information, encouraging the development of nontraditional avenues of
recruitment and providing incentives, waiving administrative regulations
when needed, and other assistance as deemed necessary;
(e) Discontinue approval of programs that do not meet standards or whose
graduates do not perform according to criteria set by the board;
(f) Issue, renew, revoke, suspend, or refuse to issue or renew; impose
probationary or supervisory conditions upon; issue a written reprimand or
admonishment; or any combination of actions regarding any certificate;
(g) Develop specific guidelines to follow upon receipt of an allegation of sexual
misconduct by an employee certified by the Education Professional Standards
Board. The guidelines shall include investigation, inquiry, and hearing
Page 390 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
procedures which ensure the process does not revictimize the alleged victim
or cause harm if an employee is falsely accused;
(h) Receive, along with investigators hired by the Education Professional
Standards Board, training on the dynamics of sexual misconduct of
professionals, including the nature of this abuse of authority, characteristics of
the offender, the impact on the victim, the possibility and the impact of false
accusations, investigative procedures in sex offense cases, and effective
intervention with victims and offenders;
(i) Recommend to the Kentucky Board of Education the essential data elements
relating to teacher preparation and certification, teacher supply and demand,
teacher attrition, teacher diversity, and employment trends to be included in a
state comprehensive data and information system and periodically report data
to the Interim Joint Committee on Education;
(j) Submit reports to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission and
inform the public on the status of teaching in Kentucky;
(k) Devise a credentialing system that provides alternative routes to gaining
certification and greater flexibility in staffing local schools while maintaining
standards for teacher competence;
(l) Develop a professional code of ethics;
(m) Charge reasonable fees for the issuance, reissuance, and renewal of
certificates that are established by administrative regulation. The proceeds
shall be used to meet a portion of the costs of the issuance, reissuance, and
renewal of certificates, and the costs associated with disciplinary action
against a certificate holder under KRS 161.120;
(n) Waive a requirement that may be established in an administrative regulation
promulgated by the board. A request for a waiver shall be submitted to the
board, in writing, by an applicant for certification, a postsecondary institution,
Page 391 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
or a superintendent of a local school district, with appropriate justification for
the waiver. The board may approve the request if the person or institution
seeking the waiver has demonstrated extraordinary circumstances justifying
the waiver. Any waiver granted under this subsection shall be subject to
revocation if the person or institution falsifies information or subsequently
fails to meet the intent of the waiver;
(o) Promote the development of one (1) or more innovative, nontraditional or
alternative administrator or teacher preparation programs through public or
private colleges or universities, private contractors, the Department of
Education, or the Kentucky Commonwealth Virtual University and waive
administrative regulations if needed in order to implement the program;
(p) Grant approval, if appropriate, of a university's request for an alternative
program that enrolls an administrator candidate in a postbaccalaureate
administrator preparation program concurrently with employment as an
assistant principal, principal, assistant superintendent, or superintendent in a
local school district. An administrator candidate in the alternative program
shall be granted a temporary provisional certificate and shall be a candidate in
the Kentucky Principal Internship Program, notwithstanding provisions of
KRS 161.030, or the Superintendent's Assessment process, notwithstanding
provisions of KRS 156.111, as appropriate. The temporary certificate shall be
valid for a maximum of two (2) years, and shall be contingent upon the
candidate's continued enrollment in the preparation program and compliance
with all requirements established by the board. A professional certificate shall
be issued upon the candidate's successful completion of the program,
internship requirements, and assessments as required by the board;
(q) Employ consultants as needed;
(r) Enter into contracts. Disbursements to professional educators who receive less
Page 392 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
than one thousand dollars ($1,000) in compensation per fiscal year from the
board for serving on an assessment validation panel or as a test scorer or
proctor shall not be subject to KRS 45A.690 to 45A.725;
(s) Sponsor studies, conduct research, conduct conferences, and publish
information as appropriate; and
(t) Issue orders as necessary in any administrative action before the board.
(2) (a) The board shall be composed of seventeen (17) members. The secretary of the
Education and Labor Cabinet and the executive director[president] of the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary
Education], or their designees, shall serve as ex officio voting members. The
Governor shall make the following fifteen (15) appointments:
1. Nine (9) members who shall be teachers representative of elementary,
middle or junior high, secondary, special education, and secondary
vocational classrooms;
2. Two (2) members who shall be school administrators, one (1) of whom
shall be a school principal;
3. One (1) member representative of local boards of education; and
4. Three (3) members representative of postsecondary institutions, two (2)
of whom shall be deans of colleges of education at public universities
and one (1) of whom shall be the chief academic officer of an
independent not-for-profit college or university.
(b) The members appointed by the Governor shall be confirmed by the Senate
under KRS 11.160. If the General Assembly is not in session at the time of the
appointment, persons appointed shall serve prior to confirmation, but the
Governor shall seek the consent of the Senate at the next regular session or at
an intervening extraordinary session if the matter is included in the call of the
General Assembly.
Page 393 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(c) Each appointed member shall serve a three (3) year term. A vacancy on the
board shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment within
sixty (60) days after it occurs. A member shall continue to serve until his or
her successor is named. Any member who, through change of employment
status or residence, or for other reasons, no longer meets the criteria for the
position to which he or she was appointed shall no longer be eligible to serve
in that position.
(d) Members of the board shall serve without compensation but shall be permitted
to attend board meetings and perform other board business without loss of
income or other benefits.
(e) A state agency or any political subdivision of the state, including a school
district, required to hire a substitute for a member of the board who is absent
from the member's place of employment while performing board business
shall be reimbursed by the board for the actual amount of any costs incurred.
(f) A chairman shall be elected by and from the membership. A member shall be
eligible to serve no more than three (3) one (1) year terms in succession as
chairman. Regular meetings shall be held at least semiannually on call of the
chairman.
(g) The commissioner of education shall serve as executive secretary to the board
and may designate staff to facilitate his or her duties.
(h) To carry out the functions relating to its duties and responsibilities, the board
is empowered to receive donations and grants of funds; to appoint consultants
as needed; and to sponsor studies, conduct conferences, and publish
information.
Section 172. KRS 161.165 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Department of Education in cooperation with the Education
Professional Standards Board, the Kentucky Board of Education, local school
Page 394 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
districts, universities, and colleges, and the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] shall review and revise as needed
the strategic plan for increasing the number of minority teachers and administrators
in the Commonwealth. The plan shall include, but not be limited to,
recommendations on ways to:
(a) Identify methods for increasing the percentage of minority educators in
proportion to the number of minority students;
(b) Establish programs to identify, recruit, and prepare as teachers minority
persons who have already earned college degrees in other job fields;
(c) Create awareness among secondary school guidance counselors of the need
for minority teachers.
(2) The Kentucky Department of Education and the Education Professional Standards
Board shall promote programs that increase the percentage of minorities who enter
and successfully complete a four (4) year teacher preparation program and provide
support to minority students in meeting qualifying requirements for students
entering a teacher preparation program at institutions of higher education.
(3) The Kentucky Department of Education with input from the Education Professional
Standards Board shall periodically submit a report to the Interim Joint Committee
on Education that evaluates the results of these efforts and includes accompanying
recommendations to establish a continuing program for increasing the number of
minorities in teacher education.
Section 173. KRS 161.167 is amended to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2001, the Kentucky Department of Education, with help from
representatives of the Education Professional Standards Board,[ the Council on
Postsecondary Education,] the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority,
the Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities, public and
private not-for-profit postsecondary institutions, and local educational agencies,
Page 395 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
shall develop a plan, including timelines for implementation, for a multidimensional
recruitment and information program, to encourage persons to enter the teaching
profession and to seek employment in Kentucky.
(2) The program shall not supplant or diminish current efforts required in KRS
161.165.
(3) The components of the program shall include:
(a) Early recruitment programs to inform middle and high school students about
the potential of teaching as a career;
(b) Programs to encourage paraprofessionals in schools, as well as other
nontraditional students, to pursue additional education to become teachers;
(c) Programs to enlist highly skilled career employees in specific content areas to
pursue teaching as a second career;
(d) Options for recruiting persons with liberal arts and sciences majors and
current students with nondeclared majors into nontraditional and accelerated
teacher preparation programs;
(e) Marketing strategies for informing the public of the importance of high
quality teaching to student achievement, the value of teachers to society as a
whole, the benefits and rewards of teaching, and the options for entering
teacher preparation, including scholarship information; and
(f) Expanding the Kentucky Department of Education's electronic bulletin board
for certified vacancies in local school districts to include an option for
potential teachers to voluntarily post their availability for education positions
within the state.[
(4) No later than March 15, 2001, the Department of Education shall present a status
report of the recruitment and information program to the Interim Joint Committee
on Education; and no later than October 15, 2001, the Department of Education
shall present to the Interim Joint Committee on Education and the Interim Joint
Page 396 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue a summary report with
recommendations.]
Section 174. KRS 164.038 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) There is hereby created an endowment fund as defined in KRS 273.600 called
the endowed research fund to be administered by the authority[council] for
the purposes of funding the work of research consortiums selected by the
authority[council] in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.
(b) The endowed research fund shall contain moneys received from the general
fund, federal funds, and any other proceeds from contributions, gifts, or grants
made available for the purposes of the fund.
(c) Moneys deposited in the endowed research fund are hereby appropriated for
the purposes under this section.
(d) All moneys in the endowed research fund shall be endowed in accordance
with KRS 273.600 to 273.645.
(e) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, moneys in the endowed research fund at the
close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next
fiscal year. Any interest earnings of the fund shall be transferred quarterly on
a pro rata basis to the five (5) consortium accounts created in paragraph (g) of
this subsection.
(f) Notwithstanding KRS 42.500, moneys in the endowed research fund shall be
invested in accordance with endowment management best practices.
(g) The endowed research fund shall contain five (5) consortium accounts. Each
consortium account shall be reserved for funding the research consortium
assigned to the account by the authority[council] in accordance with
subsection (2) of this section. Each consortium account shall contain interest
earnings from the endowed research fund transferred quarterly under
paragraph (e) of this subsection by the authority[council], federal funds, and
Page 397 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
any other proceeds from contributions, gifts, or grants made available for the
purposes of the account.
(2) The authority[council] shall solicit, accept, and review joint funding applications
submitted by two (2) or more Kentucky public universities to receive funding from
a consortium account. Each joint funding application shall be reviewed using
criteria established by the authority[council] in accordance with subsection (6) of
this section. The authority[council] shall select five (5) high-quality research
consortiums to receive funding from a consortium account. Each research
consortium selected by the authority[council] shall be assigned to a unique
consortium account within the fund for a term of five (5) years.
(3) Moneys in the five (5) consortium accounts shall constitute seed money for the
research consortium assigned to the account by the authority[council] to perform
initial research and to prepare proposals to seek grant money from public and
private sources in larger funding amounts.
(4) Prior to the expiration of a research consortium's term of eligibility under
subsection (2) of this section to receive funding from a consortium account, the
authority[council] shall review the performance of the research consortium to
determine whether:
(a) The term of eligibility of the research consortium should be renewed for up to
five (5) additional years; or
(b) The research consortium's eligibility to receive funding from the endowed
research fund should be terminated.
(5) The authority[council] shall maintain a research consortium assigned to each of the
five (5) accounts within the endowed research fund. If a research consortium's
eligibility to receive funding from the endowed research fund is terminated, the
authority[council] shall solicit, accept, and review joint funding applications to fill
the vacancy in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.
Page 398 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(6) The authority[council] shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with this subsection and KRS Chapter 13A to administer this section. The
administrative regulations shall include metrics to evaluate joint funding
applications submitted by two (2) or more Kentucky public universities in
accordance with subsection (2) of this section. The metrics shall include but not be
limited to the research consortium's:
(a) Impact upon human quality of life advancements, prioritizing innovations that
advance medicine, health, or economic development; and
(b) 1. Additional funding sources for seed money to perform initial research
and to prepare proposals to seek grant money from public and private
sources in larger funding amounts; and
2. Anticipated future funding sources and amounts.
(7) The authority[council] may expend up to four percent (4%) of all interest earnings
of the endowed research fund on the costs of managing and administering the
endowed research fund.
Section 175. KRS 164.2802 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Nuclear Energy Development Authority is hereby established and
attached to the University of Kentucky Center for Applied Energy Research for
administrative purposes. The mission of the Kentucky Nuclear Energy
Development Authority shall be to:
(a) Serve as the nonregulatory, trusted state government agency on nuclear
energy issues and development in the Commonwealth; and
(b) Support and facilitate the development of the nuclear energy ecosystem across
the Commonwealth in a collaborative manner that:
1. Enhances the Commonwealth's economy;
2. Offers energy production and economic development opportunities that
are safe;
Page 399 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
3. Protects the environment across the Commonwealth;
4. Supports community voices, especially in underrepresented or
historically impacted areas;
5. Increases energy education; and
6. Prepares a future workforce.
(2) The Kentucky Nuclear Energy Development Authority shall be governed by an
advisory board consisting of the following twenty-two (22) voting members and
eight (8) nonvoting members:
(a) Seven (7) state government members or their designees who shall be voting
members:
1. The director of the University of Kentucky Center for Applied Energy
Research, who shall serve as chair;
2. The secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet;
3. The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development;
4. The chair of the Public Service Commission;
5. The executive director[president] of the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education];
6. The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet; and
7. The director of the Division of Emergency Management;
(b) Fifteen (15) at-large members who shall be voting members:
1. A representative from each of the four (4) investor-owned electric
utilities operating in the Commonwealth, designated by the president of
each investor-owned electric utility, unless two (2) or more of the
investor-owned electric utilities are operated under common ownership,
in which case only one (1) representative shall be designated for the
commonly owned utilities;
2. Three (3) representatives of electric cooperatives designated by the chief
Page 400 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
operating officer of the Kentucky Association of Electric Cooperatives,
as follows:
a. One (1) of whom shall represent distribution cooperatives; and
b. Two (2) of whom shall represent each of the generation and
transmission electric cooperatives operating in the
Commonwealth, unless they are operated under common
ownership, in which case only one (1) representative shall be
designated for the commonly owned generation and transmission
electric cooperatives;
3. A representative of the Tennessee Valley Authority, designated by its
chief nuclear officer;
4. A representative of municipal utilities, designated by the executive
director of the Kentucky League of Cities;
5. A representative of nuclear site remediation services, designated by the
director of business services for the Four Rivers Nuclear Partnership or
by another organization that provides nuclear site remediation services;
6. A representative for environmental interests, designated by the
executive director of the Kentucky Conservation Committee;
7. A representative of manufacturers, designated by the president of the
Kentucky Association of Manufacturers;
8. A representative for commercial interests, designated by the president of
the Kentucky Chamber of Commerce;
9. A mayor of a city, designated by the executive director of the Kentucky
League of Cities, who lives in an "energy community" as that term is
used in the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022, Pub. L. No. 117-169, and as
it is defined in the latest guidance by the Internal Revenue Service; and
10. A county judge/executive, designated by the executive director of the
Page 401 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Kentucky Association of Counties, who lives in an "energy community"
as that term is used in the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022, Pub. L. No.
117-169, and as it is defined in the latest guidance by the Internal
Revenue Service; and
(c) Eight (8) nonvoting members:
1. The president of the Nuclear Energy Institute, or designee;
2. A representative from a national nuclear educational nonprofit
organization, designated by the chair and confirmed by a majority of the
voting members;
3. A representative from a United States Department of Energy National
Laboratory with expertise in nuclear energy policy issues, designated by
the chair and confirmed by a majority of the voting members;
4. A representative from a nongovernmental nuclear policy advocacy
organization, designated by the chair and confirmed by a majority of the
voting members;
5. Two (2) members of the Senate, who shall serve as ex officio members,
designated by the President of the Senate; and
6. Two (2) members of the House of Representatives, who shall serve as
ex officio members, designated by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives.
(3) State government members named in subsection (2)(a) of this section and members
of the General Assembly named in subsection (2)(c)5. and 6. of this section shall
serve on the advisory board during the terms of their appointed or elected state
government positions. After the initial appointments, all other members of the
advisory board shall serve terms of four (4) years. Members shall be eligible to
succeed themselves and shall serve until their successors are appointed. A vacancy
occurring during the term of any member shall be filled in the same manner as the
Page 402 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
original appointment.
(4) A majority of the voting members of the advisory board shall constitute a quorum
for the purposes of conducting business. The advisory board shall meet at least
quarterly, or more often at the call of the chair.
(5) Members of the advisory board shall not be paid for their service as board
members, and they shall not be reimbursed for any expenses relating to their
attendance of board meetings.
(6) The advisory board shall hire a director of the authority who shall possess the skills
and experience necessary to lead the authority effectively, promote the safe and
responsible development of nuclear energy, and achieve the authority's purposes
described in subsection (7) of this section.
(7) The purposes of the authority shall be to:
(a) Assist interested communities in understanding advanced nuclear
opportunities, including the importance of secure, firm, cost-competitive
power for customers and for economic development opportunities, as well as
the potential for direct and indirect economic benefits associated with the
employment and tax revenue generated from nuclear energy projects;
(b) Provide information to the public on the history of nuclear energy
technologies in the Commonwealth, the status of existing nuclear energy
projects within the Commonwealth, and the potential benefits and concerns
associated with nuclear energy technologies;
(c) Develop the capacity for nuclear energy economic development in the
Commonwealth, which shall include providing information to educational
institutions on the types of career opportunities that will be available with the
development of nuclear energy, building strong relationships with economic
development professionals, promoting existing economic development
incentives applicable to nuclear energy development, and seeking out new
Page 403 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
grants and other financial support for nuclear energy development;
(d) Seek greater clarity and certainty with stakeholders on financial support for
early nuclear site permitting, the process for obtaining a nuclear power facility
certificate of public convenience and necessity, and the recovery of
construction work in progress for nuclear energy projects;
(e) Work with communities that have previously hosted nuclear-related activities
and other communities facing a transition away from fossil fuels to empower
those communities with the resources and information necessary to engage
with regulators, developers, and decisionmakers on new nuclear power
facilities, nuclear component manufacturing facilities, and fuel cycle facilities;
(f) Strengthen engagement with the federal Nuclear Regulatory Commission by
reviewing current safety and security practices implemented at different types
of nuclear energy facilities under their purview, promoting the streamlining of
permitting efforts, and supporting the siting of interim and permanent nuclear
storage facilities via the continued use of consent-based siting;
(g) Build the organizational capacity to engage and potentially convene a
consortium of stakeholders interested in nuclear energy technologies that
would consist of utilities, environmental advocates, electric cooperatives, and
major industrial companies in order to share best practices, including how to
share risk associated with developing and constructing new nuclear power
plants within the Commonwealth;
(h) Engage with the United States Department of Energy National Laboratories,
academic institutions, and private companies on efforts to develop deployable
technologies to reprocess or recycle spent nuclear fuel; and
(i) Maintain awareness of potential events that could initiate or accelerate the
development of new nuclear energy technologies within the Commonwealth
to allow the public to benefit from these projects.
Page 404 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(8) The authority, with the approval of the advisory board, shall:
(a) Propose and adopt bylaws for the management and operation of the authority;
(b) Develop and adopt a strategic plan for carrying out the purposes of the
authority described in subsection (7) of this section;
(c) Create and update at least once every two (2) years a nuclear energy economic
impact analysis for the Commonwealth;
(d) Employ necessary staff to carry out the functions of the authority; and
(e) By December 1, 2025, and each December 1 thereafter, submit a report to the
Governor and the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim
Joint Committees on Natural Resources and Energy, Appropriations and
Revenue, and Economic Development and Workforce Investment providing a
summary of the authority's activities and achievements since its last report and
offering recommendations for the support and expansion of the nuclear energy
ecosystem in the Commonwealth.
Section 176. KRS 164.7011 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 164.7011 to 164.7021:
(1) "Advisory committee" means the Kentucky Aerospace, Aviation, and Defense
Investment Fund Advisory Committee established in KRS 164.7013;
(2) "Aviation" means the operation, maintenance, or manufacturing of aircraft or other
aerospace equipment, aerospace initiatives and efforts, and defense-related products
related to aerospace and aviation;
(3) "Aviation industry partner" means a grantor to the fund that the authority[council]
determines customarily employs individuals with an eligible aviation or aerospace
credential in a relevant aviation role in the usual course of the grantor's business;
(4) "Aviation program":
(a) Means an education or training program located in Kentucky that issues
eligible aviation or aerospace credentials or is a specific requirement to
Page 405 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
earning an eligible aviation or aerospace credential, including but not limited
to a public high school vocational program; and
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, does not include a flight
training program unless that program is a certified pilot school regulated by
the Federal Aviation Administration in accordance with 14 C.F.R. pt. 141 or
is a public high school vocational program;
(5) "Council" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education];
(6) "Dedicated moneys" means a gift, grant, or donation to the fund that is subject to
restrictions imposed by a private grantor under KRS 164.7015;
(7) "Eligible aviation credential" means:
(a) Any license or certification issued by the Federal Aviation Administration;
(b) A Bachelor of Science in aviation issued by a postsecondary education
institution overseen or licensed by the authority[council] and located in
Kentucky;
(c) Any engineering degree issued by a postsecondary education institution
overseen or licensed by the authority[council] and located in Kentucky; or
(d) A career and technical education license or certification determined by the
authority[council], in collaboration with the advisory committee, to be in high
demand and relevant to the aerospace industry;
(8) "Fund" means the Kentucky aerospace, aviation, and defense investment fund
established in KRS 164.7013;
(9) "Grantor" means an individual or an entity that gifts, grants, or donates moneys to
the fund;
(10) "Immediate family" means an individual's parents, siblings, spouse, and children;
(11) "Kentucky resident" means a Kentucky resident as defined by the
authority[council] pursuant to KRS 164.020(8); and
Page 406 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(12) "Public aviation program" is an aviation program that is a public high school
vocational program or institution that is a member of Kentucky's public
postsecondary education system.
Section 177. KRS 164.7013 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to incentivize collaboration between
aviation programs, aviation industry partners, and the Commonwealth to grow and
strengthen the education and training pipeline of aviation professionals within
Kentucky by:
(a) Improving the ability of a broad variety of Kentucky's aviation programs to
meet the workforce demands and capacity of the Commonwealth;
(b) Raising awareness of and interest in a broad variety of aviation occupations;
(c) Reducing the barriers of access to the aviation programs necessary to pursue
these occupations, including financial barriers;
(d) Improving pathways between high school career and technical programs and
aviation programs; and
(e) Developing strategies for aviation industry partners to support career growth
and development for their employees.
(2) (a) The Kentucky Aerospace, Aviation, and Defense Investment Fund Advisory
Committee is hereby created to be administered by the authority[council].
The advisory committee shall be responsible for advising the
authority[council] on the implementation of KRS 164.7011 to 164.7021.
(b) The advisory committee shall be composed of the following twelve (12)
members:
1. The president of the authority[council], who shall serve as chair of the
advisory committee;
2. The commissioner of the Department of Aviation in the Transportation
Cabinet;
Page 407 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
3. Ten (10) members appointed by the chair of the authority[council], of
whom:
a. One (1) member shall be selected from a list of three (3)
candidates nominated by the Kentucky Association of
Manufacturers who possess professional experience and expertise
with aviation manufacturing;
b. One (1) member shall have professional experience and expertise
as an aviation engineer;
c. One (1) member shall have professional experience and expertise
with Department of Defense contracts related to aviation;
d. One (1) member shall have professional experience and expertise
with Department of Defense contracts related to aerospace;
e. One (1) member shall have professional experience and expertise
with airport management or Federal Aviation Administration
airport compliance and classifications;
f. One (1) member shall be a member from the Kentucky Aviation
Association;
g. One (1) member shall be a licensed air transport pilot;
h. One (1) member that is a licensed airframe and powerplant
mechanic; and
i. Two (2) members shall be employees of a public aviation
program.
(c) Members appointed under paragraph (b)3. of this subsection shall serve for
terms of two (2) years, and any vacancy on the advisory committee shall be
filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the
original appointment. An appointed member shall continue to serve until
reappointed or replaced.
Page 408 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(d) The majority of the voting members shall constitute a quorum, and all
meetings shall be conducted in accordance with the Open Meetings Act, KRS
61.805 to 61.850.
(e) A member of the advisory committee shall not receive compensation or
benefits for the member's service, but a member appointed under paragraph
(b)3. of this subsection shall receive per diem and travel expenses consistent
with the reimbursement policy for state employees.
(3) There is hereby created a trust and agency account called the Kentucky aerospace,
aviation, and defense investment fund to be administered by the Council for
Postsecondary Education for the purpose of funding:
(a) Public and private partnerships to provide aviation training scholarships in
accordance with KRS 164.7015 to reduce the financial barriers of Kentucky
residents seeking eligible aviation credentials;
(b) Public and private partnerships to provide aviation and aerospace equipment
grants in accordance with KRS 164.7017 to enhance Kentucky's aviation
programs' ability to meet the workforce demands and capacity of the
Commonwealth; and
(c) The authority's[council's] administrative, research, consulting, fundraising,
planning, and analysis costs of administering KRS 164.7011 to 164.7021.
(4) (a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to encourage private financial and
philanthropic support of the Kentucky aerospace, aviation, and defense
investment fund, as the aerospace, aviation, and defense industries directly
benefit from a well-trained workforce capable of meeting their employment
needs and the needs of the Commonwealth. To the extent allowed by
applicable laws, the fund may directly accept gifts, grants, or donations
subject to restrictions imposed by a grantor.
(b) 1. The Kentucky aerospace, aviation, and defense investment fund shall
Page 409 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
consist of two (2) accounts.
2. There shall be an appropriation account containing all moneys
appropriated by the General Assembly and any federal funds received
for this purpose.
3. There shall be a grantor account containing all moneys received in the
form of gifts, grants, or donations subject to restrictions imposed by a
grantor, or any other moneys made available for the purposes of the
fund.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any moneys appropriated to the fund by the
General Assembly that remain in the fund at the end of any fiscal year prior to
the 2029-2030 fiscal year shall not lapse.
(d) Any moneys remaining in the appropriation account at the end of fiscal year
2029-2030 shall be forfeited and shall lapse to the general fund.
(e) Any moneys remaining in the grantor fund at the end of the 2029-2030 fiscal
year shall be returned to each grantor proportionally based on the amount
donated by the grantor in relation to the total amount donated by all grantors.
(5) Subject to available funds, the fund shall consist of any:
(a) Appropriations designated for the fund;
(b) Funds, grants, and receipts from the authority's[council's] fundraising
activities on behalf of the fund;
(c) Federal funds; and
(d) Other moneys made available for the purposes of the fund.
(6) Any interest earnings of the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall lapse
only as provided in subsection (4) of this section. Moneys in the fund are hereby
appropriated for the purposes set forth in this section.
(7) The portion of the fund expended towards the authority's[council's] costs of
administering KRS 164.7011 to 164.7021 shall not exceed one-half of one percent
Page 410 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(0.5%) of all gross moneys in the fund or seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000)
annually, whichever is less.
(8) (a) The authority[council] shall promulgate administrative regulations by August
1, 2024, in accordance with this subsection and KRS Chapter 13A to
administer KRS 164.7011, 164.7013, 164.7015, and 164.7017.
(b) At least thirty (30) days before filing an administrative regulation with the
regulations compiler, the authority[council] shall first submit the draft
administrative regulation, a detailed implementation plan, and other
documents required to be filed by KRS Chapter 13A to the members of the
Interim Joint Committee on Education and the Interim Joint Committee on
Transportation for review and comment.
(c) The authority[council] shall consider any comments and recommendations
provided by the members of the Interim Joint Committee on Education and
the Interim Joint Committee on Transportation before filing the administrative
regulation.
(9) A member of the advisory committee shall recuse himself or herself from any vote
related to any aviation program or industry partner:
(a) Owned by the member or an immediate family of a member;
(b) That employs the member or immediate family member of the member; or
(c) That would otherwise result in a direct benefit, financial or otherwise, to that
member or an immediate family member of that member.
Section 178. KRS 164.7015 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The authority[council] shall reserve at least sixty-five percent (65%) of all net
moneys in the fund for partnership proposals between aviation programs and
aviation industry partners to provide aviation training scholarships to Kentucky
residents enrolled in aviation programs.
(2) In accepting partnerships, the authority[council] shall collaborate with the advisory
Page 411 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
committee to evaluate each partnership proposal to determine if the proposal meets
the requirements of this section and administrative regulations promulgated by the
authority[council]. The administrative regulations shall create a process to
prioritize accepting partnerships to proposals targeted to reduce the workforce
demand of a specific eligible aviation credential that is determined by the
authority[council], in collaboration with the advisory committee, to be among the
highest in demand in the Commonwealth based on objective criteria.
(3) A partnership shall require a written partnership contract between an aviation
program, aviation industry partner, and the authority[council]. The partnership
contract shall:
(a) Prohibit any disbursement of moneys from the fund until the moneys
appropriated by the General Assembly to be distributed are matched, at least
dollar for dollar, with moneys deposited to the fund by the aviation industry
partner;
(b) Require the aviation program to use all moneys distributed to the aviation
program pursuant to the partnership contract to issue direct aviation training
scholarships to Kentucky students enrolled in the aviation program;
(c) If applicable to an aviation program, require that the aviation training
scholarship application process encourage applicants to complete the Free
Application for Federal Student Aid; and
(d) Meet all other requirements set forth in this section and administrative
regulations, including but not limited to any reporting requirements to the
authority[council].
(4) Disbursements of moneys from the fund to support aviation training scholarships
shall be made directly to an aviation program pursuant to the terms of the
partnership contract.
(5) An aviation program that enters a partnership contract shall solicit, accept, and
Page 412 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
review aviation training scholarship applications submitted by students enrolled in
the aviation program. A partnership contract may require that an aviation program
do so in collaboration with the aviation industry partner. The aviation program shall
award aviation training scholarships pursuant to any scholarship criteria set forth in
the partnership contract, this section, and administrative regulations. The decisions
of the aviation program in the issuance of scholarships shall be final.
(6) An aviation training scholarship issued by an aviation program pursuant to a
partnership contract shall be made directly to a recipient pursuant to a written
scholarship contract between the recipient and the aviation program. The
scholarship contract shall not restrict the recipient's ability to utilize the scholarship
for the total cost of attendance. Each recipient of a scholarship shall:
(a) Agree in the written contract to be employed within Kentucky's aviation
industry for a contract period of one (1) year for each academic year funded
by the scholarship, up to a maximum of two (2) total years; and
(b) Sign a promissory note as evidence of the scholarship and the obligation to
repay the scholarship amount upon failure to complete terms of the contract.
(7) A grantor may place restrictions upon a contribution to the fund requiring specific
criteria for an aviation training scholarship or scholarships funded by the grantor's
dedicated moneys, including but not limited to criteria restricting employment at the
aviation industry partner for the contract period.
(8) The aviation training scholarship contract shall grant the aviation program, the
Commonwealth, or the aviation industry partner the authority to initiate recoupment
proceedings for the recovery of the total amount of all aviation training scholarships
awarded to an individual that fails to complete the terms of a contract entered into
in accordance with subsection (6) of this section, together with reasonable attorney
fees and interest at a compound rate not to exceed eight percent (8%) per annum
from the date of disbursement from the fund.
Page 413 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
Section 179. KRS 164.7017 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The authority[council] shall reserve up to thirty-five percent (35%) of all net
moneys in the fund for aviation equipment partnership contracts between public
aviation programs and aviation industry partners to provide aviation and aviation
equipment grants for a public high school vocational program or public
postsecondary education institution to maintain, acquire, or lease aviation or
aviation equipment.
(2) An aviation equipment partnership shall require a written partnership contract
between a public aviation program, aviation industry partner, and the
authority[council]. The partnership contract shall:
(a) Prohibit any disbursement of moneys from the fund until the moneys
appropriated by the General Assembly to be distributed are matched, at least
dollar for dollar, with moneys deposited to the fund by the aviation partner;
(b) Require a public aviation program to use all moneys of an aviation equipment
grant to maintain, acquire, or lease aviation or aviation equipment;
(c) Prohibit the aviation industry partner from maintaining any ownership interest
in aviation or aviation equipment maintained, acquired, or leased with the
funds from the aviation equipment grant;
(d) Prohibit the aviation industry partner from receiving direct or indirect
compensation for the maintenance or purchase of aviation or aviation
equipment above the fair market value cost of the services or equipment; and
(e) Meet all other requirements set forth in this section and administrative
regulation, including but not limited to any reporting requirements to the
authority[council].
(3) (a) The authority[council] shall collaborate with the advisory committee to
solicit, accept, and review proposals for partnership contracts by aviation
industry partners and public aviation programs located in Kentucky. The
Page 414 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
authority[council] shall select proposals for partnership contracts, and
decisions of the authority[council] in these matters shall be final. The
authority[council] may prioritize partnership contracts:
1. Targeted towards maintaining, acquiring, or leasing equipment used by
a public aviation program for a high-demand eligible aviation credential;
2. Based upon the financial advantages afforded to a public aviation
program; or
3. Based upon the number of students that would have access to the
aviation or aviation equipment maintained, acquired, or leased by a
public aviation program with funds from an aviation equipment grant.
(b) Disbursements of moneys from the fund to support aviation equipment grants
shall be made directly to a public aviation program pursuant to the terms of
the partnership contract.
(4) The authority[council] shall require the public aviation program to submit proof
that the entire amount of the aviation equipment grant is invested in the
maintenance, acquisition, or lease of aviation or aviation training equipment utilized
by students enrolled in a public aviation program. A public aviation program that
fails to submit the proof required by the authority[council] shall return the entire
amount of the grant to the fund.
Section 180. KRS 164.7019 is amended to read as follows:
(1) By December 1 of each year, the authority[council] shall collaborate with the
advisory committee to submit a written report to the Legislative Research
Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Education, the Interim
Joint Committee on Transportation, and the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue Budget Review Subcommittee on Education. The
report shall include:
(a) A detailed summary of the authority's[council's] costs throughout the year;
Page 415 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(b) Legislative recommendations to help grow and strengthen the education and
training pipeline of aviation professions within Kentucky;
(c) A detailed overview of the Kentucky aerospace, aviation, and defense
investment fund, including an accounting of all moneys raised and expended;
(d) A detailed analysis of aviation training scholarships awarded pursuant to KRS
164.7015, including but not limited to:
1. The criteria used to award the scholarships;
2. The number of scholarships awarded and the amount of each
scholarship;
3. An overview of the demographic information of scholarship recipients,
including the county of residence;
4. The names of the aviation programs with scholarship recipients and the
type of eligible aviation credential corresponding to each program; and
5. To the extent available, student and program outcomes, including but
not limited to:
a. Graduation rates of the aviation program overall and of
scholarship recipients as compared to an established baseline
within any such program;
b. Employment and employment retention rates of the aviation
program overall and scholarship recipients; and
c. The workforce participation of program graduates practicing in
Kentucky under an eligible aviation credential in relation to the
workforce demand and capacity for that specific eligible aviation
credential; and
(e) A detailed analysis of aviation equipment partnership contracts awarded
pursuant to KRS 164.7017, including but not limited to the following for each
aviation equipment partnership contract:
Page 416 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
1. The amount of the aviation equipment grant;
2. The public aviation program that is a party to the partnership contract
and the eligible aviation credential corresponding to that program;
3. The aviation industry partner or partners that are a party to the
partnership contract and the amount contributed by each aviation
industry partner to the fund;
4. A detailed summary of the aviation or aviation equipment maintained,
acquired, or leased by the public aviation program with moneys from the
aviation equipment grant;
5. Financial documentation of all transactions utilizing moneys from the
aviation equipment grant; and
6. A detailed summary of how the aviation equipment grant will impact the
opportunities and outcomes for students enrolled in public aviation
program.
(2) If the report required by subsection (1) of this section is not filed by December 14
of each year, or a later date jointly approved by the Interim Joint Committee on
Education and the Interim Joint Committee on Transportation, any appropriations to
the fund shall be forfeited and any remaining moneys in the fund appropriated by
the General Assembly shall lapse to the general fund. The authority[council] shall
return any remaining private moneys to its grantor, prorated as necessary.
Section 181. KRS 164.771 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly hereby establishes the Teacher Recruitment Student Loan
Forgiveness Pilot Program to encourage and assist individuals in becoming certified
teachers in Kentucky public schools.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(b) "Eligible program of study" means an undergraduate or graduate program of
Page 417 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
study which is preparatory to teacher certification, as determined by the
authority;
(c) "Eligible student" means a student who:
1. Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States;
2. Is a Kentucky resident, as determined by the participating institution in
accordance with criteria established by the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority[Council on Postsecondary Education] for the
purposes of admission and tuition assessment;
3. Is enrolled at a participating institution; and
4. Meets any other criteria established in administrative regulation
promulgated by the authority;
(d) "Participating institution" means an institution of higher education located in
Kentucky that offers an eligible program of study and has an agreement in
force with the authority providing for administration of the pilot program
established by this section;
(e) "Qualified teaching service" means teaching in a classroom the majority of
each school day for at least eighty (80) days each semester in a public school
of the Commonwealth while satisfying a one (1) year contract, except that an
individual having a disability defined by Title II of the Americans with
Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 12131 et seq., or serious and extended illness,
whose disability or illness, certified by a licensed physician, prevents that
individual from teaching a major portion of each school day, shall be deemed
to perform qualified teaching service by teaching the maximum time
permitted by the attending physician;
(f) "Semester" means a period of about eighteen (18) weeks, which usually
makes up one-half (1/2) of a school year or one-half (1/2) of a participating
institution's academic year; and
Page 418 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(g) "Summer term" means an academic period consisting of one (1) or more
sessions of instruction between a spring and a fall semester.
(3) The authority may, to the extent of appropriations and other funds available to it
pursuant to subsection (9) of this section, provide teacher recruitment awards to
eligible students pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, who initially demonstrate
financial need in accordance with standards and criteria established by the
authority. Each teacher recruitment award shall be evidenced by a promissory note
that requires repayment or cancellation pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.
(4) Teacher recruitment awards shall first be provided to eligible students accepted into
an eligible program of study and then to eligible students who have declared a
major that is an eligible program of study in pursuit of initial teacher certification.
(5) To the extent funds are available, the authority shall provide to eligible students:
(a) Accepted into an eligible program of study, a maximum award of up to five
thousand dollars ($5,000) per semester or summer term; or
(b) Having declared a major that is an eligible program of study, a maximum
award of up to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per semester or
summer term.
(6) (a) The authority shall disburse teacher recruitment awards to eligible students
who agree to render qualified teaching service as certified teachers, are
unconditionally admitted and enrolled in a participating institution, and have
declared a major that is an eligible program of study.
(b) A teacher recruitment award shall not be provided, or a promissory note
cancellation shall not be granted, to any person who is in default on any
obligation to the authority under any program administered by the authority
pursuant to KRS 164.740 to 164.7891 until financial obligations to the
authority are satisfied, except that ineligibility for this reason may be waived
by the authority for cause.
Page 419 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(c) Recipients shall render one (1) year of qualified teaching service for each
semester of award received. The authority shall cancel a promissory note upon
completion of each year of qualified teacher service beginning with the oldest
promissory note.
(d) If the recipient of a teacher recruitment award fails to complete an eligible
program of study at a participating institution or fails to render qualified
teaching service in any semester following certification or recertification,
unless the failure is temporarily waived for cause by the authority, the
recipient shall immediately become liable to the authority for repayment of
the sum of all outstanding promissory notes and accrued interest. Persons
liable for repayment of awards under this paragraph shall be liable for interest
accruing from the dates on which the teacher recruitment awards were
disbursed.
(e) The authority shall establish, by administrative regulation, the terms and
conditions for the award and cancellation and repayment of teacher
recruitment awards, including but not limited to the selection criteria,
eligibility for renewal awards, amount of award payments, deferments, the
rate of repayment, and the interest rate thereon.
(f) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, the maximum interest rate
applicable to repayment of a promissory note under this section shall be eight
percent (8%) per annum, except that if a judgment is rendered to recover
payment, the judgment shall bear interest at the rate of five percent (5%)
greater than the rate actually charged on the promissory note.
(7) A repayment obligation imposed by this section shall not be voidable by reason of
the age of the recipient at the time of receiving the teacher recruitment award.
(8) Failure to meet repayment obligations imposed by this section shall be cause for the
revocation of a person's teaching certificate, subject to the procedures set forth in
Page 420 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
KRS 161.120.
(9) All moneys repaid to the authority under this section shall be deposited into the
Teacher Recruitment Student Loan Forgiveness Pilot Program fund created in
subsection (13) of this section.
(10) The authority may execute appropriate contracts and promissory notes for
administering this section.
(11) (a) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, if available funds are
insufficient for all requested awards for eligible applicants during any fiscal
year, the authority shall give priority consideration to eligible applicants who
previously received teacher recruitment awards.
(b) If funds are insufficient to make all requested renewal awards to eligible
applicants, the authority shall reduce all awards to the extent necessary to
provide awards to all qualified renewal applicants.
(c) If, after awarding all eligible renewal applicants, funds are not depleted, initial
applications shall be ranked according to regulatory selection criteria, and
awards shall be made to eligible applicants until funds are depleted.
(12) The authority shall submit a report on the number of teacher awards provided in
each fiscal year, the program of study in which recipients are enrolled, recipient
retention rates, total number of applications, and award recruitment strategies to the
Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on
Education by December 1 of each year.
(13) (a) The Teacher Recruitment Student Loan Forgiveness Pilot Program fund is
hereby created as a revolving account in the State Treasury to be administered
by the authority for the purpose of providing loan repayment as described in
this section.
(b) The fund shall consist of state general fund appropriations, gifts and grants
from public and private sources, and federal funds. All moneys included in the
Page 421 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
fund shall be appropriated for the purposes set forth in this section.
(c) Any unallotted or unencumbered balances in the trust fund shall be invested
as provided in KRS 42.500(9). Income earned from the investments shall be
credited to the fund.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year
shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year and
continuously appropriated only for the purposes specified in this section.
Section 182. KRS 164.773 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly hereby establishes the Student Teacher Stipend Program to
reduce financial barriers to students in completing educator preparation programs
and entering the educator workforce.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Academic term" means a fall or spring academic semester;
(b) "Approved educator preparation program" means a program approved by the
Education Professional Standards Board for the preparation of teachers and
other professional school personnel;
(c) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(d) "Eligible student" means a student who:
1. Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States;
2. Is a Kentucky resident as determined by the participating institution in
accordance with criteria established by the authority[Council on
Postsecondary Education] for the purposes of admission and tuition
assessment;
3. Is enrolled in an approved educator preparation program at a
participating institution;
4. Is approved for student teaching by the participating institution;
5. Has not previously received a student teacher stipend under this section;
Page 422 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
and
6. Meets any other criteria established in administrative regulation
promulgated by the authority;
(e) "Participating institution" means an institution of higher education located in
Kentucky that offers an approved educator preparation program and executes
an agreement with the authority on terms the authority deems necessary or
appropriate for the administration of the Student Teacher Stipend Program;
and
(f) "Student teacher" has the same meaning as in KRS 161.010.
(3) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority shall administer the Student
Teacher Stipend Program and shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as may be needed for administration of the
program.
(4) (a) Beginning with the 2024-2025 academic year, to the extent funds are
available, the authority may award a student teacher stipend of up to five
thousand dollars ($5,000) to an eligible student during the academic term in
which the student is a student teacher.
(b) If funds are not sufficient to award stipends to all eligible students, awards
shall be determined in accordance with administrative regulations
promulgated by the authority.
(5) For each academic term, by the deadline established by the authority, a participating
institution shall submit to the authority a report of all eligible students for that
academic term. The authority shall disburse stipend funds monthly to the
participating institution to distribute to eligible students.
(6) The participating institution shall notify the authority within five (5) days of the
withdrawal of a previously eligible student from the program and no additional
distributions shall be made to the participating institution for the student.
Page 423 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
(7) Funds awarded to an eligible student under this section shall not be considered
student financial aid in the year the funds are received.
(8) By November 1, 2025, and each November 1 thereafter, the authority shall submit a
report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Committee on Education on the utilization and effectiveness of the Student Teacher
Stipend Program. The Kentucky Center for Statistics shall assist in developing the
report which shall include but not be limited to:
(a) The total number of eligible students and stipend recipients, and the total
award amount by participating institution and program;
(b) The demographic data of stipend recipients, including but not limited to:
1. School district of high school graduation;
2. County and city of residence prior to postsecondary enrollment;
3. The participating institution in which the eligible student is enrolled
while a student teacher; and
4. The school and district in which the eligible student is a student teacher;
and
(c) The data correlation between stipend recipients and nonrecipients entering
and remaining in the educator workforce, including but not limited to student
teaching location and teaching position location.
Section 183. KRS 164A.550 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 164A.555 to 164A.630 unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Governing board" means the board of trustees or board of regents constituting the
corporate bodies established by KRS 164.160 and 164.310 for the purpose of
governing universities and colleges and technical institutions.
(2) "Institutions" means all public supported postsecondary educational institutions in
Kentucky recognized in KRS 164.100, 164.290, 164.580, or 164.810(1)(b)[(a)].
(3) "Affiliated corporation" means a corporate entity which is not a public agency and
Page 424 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1121
which is organized pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 273 over which an
institution exercises effective control, by means of appointments to its board of
directors, and which could not exist or effectively operate in the absence of
substantial assistance from an institution.
(4) "Depository bank" means any bank so designated by the Treasurer of the
Commonwealth as appropriate for receiving public moneys.
Section 184. The following KRS section is repealed:
164.011 Council on Postsecondary Education -- Membership -- Terms -- Meetings.
Section 185. The Council on Postsecondary Education as previously established
is hereby dissolved. All personnel, records, files, equipment, and funds of the Council on
Postsecondary Education shall be transferred to the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority as established in this Act.
Section 186. In order to reflect the abolition of the Council on Postsecondary
Education and the transfer of the council's duties, personnel, materials, and funds to the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority effectuated by this Act, the reviser of
statutes shall replace any remaining or newly enacted references to the Council on
Postsecondary Education in the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the Kentucky Higher
Education Assistance Authority.
Page 425 of 425
XXXX 1/9/2025 2:06 PM Jacketed